RACHEL DYER.
CHAPTER I.
The
early history of New-England, or of
Massachusetts
Bay, rather; now one of the six New-England
States of North America, and that on which the
Plymouth
settlers, or Fathers went ashorethe
shipwrecked
men of mighty age, abounds with proof that
witchcraft was a familiar study, and that witches and
wizards were believed in for a great while, among the
most enlightened part of a large and well-educated
religious
population. The multitude of course had a like
faith; for such authority governs the multitude every
where, and at all times.
The belief was very general about a hundred years
ago in every part of British America, was very common
fifty years ago, when the revolutionary war broke out,
and prevails now, even to this day in the wilder parts of
the New-England territory, as well as in the new States
which are springing up every where in the retreating
shadow of the great western wildernessa wood where
half the men of Europe might easily hide from each
otherand every where along the shores of the solitude,
as if the new earth were full of the seed of empire, as
if dominion were like fresh flowers or magnificent
herbage
,
the spontaneous growth of a new soil wherever
it is reached by the warm light or the cheerful rain of a
new sky.
It is not confined however, nor was it a hundred and
thirty five years ago, the particular period of our story,
to the uneducated and barbarous, or to a portion of the
white people of North-America, nor to the native
Indians
,
a part of whose awful faith, a part of whose
inherited
religion it is to believe in a bad power, in
witchcraft
spells and sorcery. It may be met with wherever
the Bible is much read in the spirit of the New-England
Fathers. It was rooted in the very nature of those who
were quite remarkable in the history of their age, for
learning, for wisdom, for courage and for piety; of men
who fled away from their fire-sides in Europe to the rocks
of another worldwhere they buried themselves alive
in search of truth.
We may smile now to hear witchcraft spoken
seriously
of; but we forget perhaps that a belief in it is like a
belief in the after appearance of the dead among the
blue waters, the green graves, the still starry atmosphere
and the great shadowy woods of our earth; or like the
beautiful deep instinct of our nature for worship,older
than the skies, it may be, universal as thought, and sure
as the steadfast hope of immortality.
We may turn away with a sneer now from the devout
believer in witches, wondering at the folly of them that
have such faith, and quite persuading ourselves in our
great wisdom, that all who have had it heretofore,
however
they may have been regarded by ages that have
gone by, were not of a truth wise and great men; but
we forget perhaps that we are told in the Book of Books,
the Scriptures of Truth, about witches with power to
raise the dead, about wizards and sorcerers that were able
to strive with Jehovah's anointed high priest before the
misbelieving majesty of Egypt, with all his court and
people gathered about his throne for proof, and of others
who could look into futurity with power, interpret the
vision of sleep, read the stars, bewitch and afflict whom
they would, cast out devils and prophesyfalse prophets
were they called, not because that which they said was
untrue, but because that which they said, whether true
or untrue, was not from abovebecause the origin of
their preternatural power was bad or untrue. And we
forget moreover that laws were made about conjuration,
spells and witchcraft by a body of British lawgivers,
renowned for their sagacity, deep research, and grave
thoughtful regard for truth, but a few years agothe
other day as it wereand that a multitude of superior
men have recorded their belief in witchcraftmen of
prodigious powersuch men as the great and good Sir
Mathew Hale, who gave judgment of death upon
several
witches and wizards, at a period when, if we may
believe a tithe of what we hear every day of our lives,
from the mouth of many a great lawyer, there was no
lack of wit or wisdom, nor of knowledge or faithful
enquiry
;
and such men too as the celebrated author of the
Commentaries on the Laws of England, which are, as
every body knows, or should know, and a man must be
exceedingly ignorant not to know the pride of the
British
empire and a pillar of light for the sages of hereafter;
and that within the last one hundred and fifty or two
hundred years, a multitude of men and women have
been tried and executed by authority of British law,
in the heart of England,for having dealt in sorcery and
witchcraft.
We may smilewe may sneerbut would such things
have occurred in the British Parliament, or in the British
courts of law, without some proofwhatever, it was
proof to the understandings of people, who in other
matters
are looked up to by the chief men of this age with
absolute awethat creatures endowed with strange, if
not with preternatural power, did inhabit our earth and
were able to work mischief according to the popular
ideas of witchcraft and sorcery?
We know little or nothing of the facts upon which
their belief was founded. All that we know is but
hearsay
,
tradition or conjecture. They who believed were
eye-witnesses and ear witnesses of what they believed;
we who disbelieve are neither. They who believed
knew all that we know of the matter and much more;
we who disbelieve are not only ignorant of the facts, but
we are living afar off, in a remote age. Nevertheless, they
believed in witchcraft, and we regard all who speak of it
seriously, with contempt. How dare we! What right
have we to say that witches and witchcraft are no more,
that sorcery is done with forever, that miracles are never
to be wrought again, or that Prophecy shall never be
heard again by the people of God, uplifting her voice
like a thousand echoes from the everlasting solitudes of
the sea, or like uninterrupted heavy thunder breaking
over the terrible and haughty nations of our earth?
Why should we not think as well of him who believes
too much, as of him who believes too little? Of him
whose faith, whatever it may be, is too large, as of him
whose faith, whatever it may be, is too small? Of the
good with a credulous temper, as of the great with a
suspicious temper? Of the pure in heart, of the youthful,
of the untried in the ways of the world, who put much
faith in whatever they are told, too much it may be, as
of them who being thoroughly tried in the ways of the
world put no faith in what they hear, and little in what
they see? Of the humble in spirit who believe,
though
they do not perfectly understand, as of the haughty who
will not believe
because
they do not perfectly understand?
3
Of the poor child who thinks a juggler eats fire when
he does not, as of the grown-up sage who thinks a
juggler
does
not
swallow a sword when he
does?
Of the
believer in Crusoe, who sits poring over the story under
a hedge, as of the unbeliever in Bruce who would not
believe, so long as it was new, in the Tale of Abyssinia?
Of those in short who are led astray by self-distrust, or
innocence, or humility, as of them who are led astray by
self-conceit, or corruption, or pride?
In other days, the Lion of the desert would not believe
the horse when he came up out of the bleak north, and
told a story of waters and seas that grew solid, quiet and
smooth in the dead of winter. His majesty had never
heard of such a thing before, and what his majesty had
never heard of before could not be possible. The mighty
lord of the Numedian desert could not believehow
could he?in a cock-and-a-bull-story, about ice and
snow; for to him they were both as a multitude of such
things are to the philosophy of our age, out of the course
of nature.
A solid sea and a fluid earth are alike to such as have
no belief in what is new or contrary to that course of
nature with which they are acquaintedwhatever that
may be. There is no such thing as proof to the
overwise
or over-mighty, save where by reason of what they
already know, there is not much need of other proof.
They would not believe, though one should rise from the
deadthey are too cautious by half; they are not
satisfied
with any sort of testimony; they dare not believe
their own eyesthey do not indeed; for spectres when
they appear to the eye of the philosopher now, are
attributed
altogether to a diseased organ.(1) They care
not for the cloud of witnessesthey withdraw from the
Bible, they scoff at history, and while they themselves
reject every kind of proof, whatever it may be, such
proof as they would be satisfied with in a case of
murder
,
were they to hear it as a jurysuch proof as they
would give judgment of death upon, without fear, proof
under oath by men of high character and severe probity,
eye-witnesses and ear-witnesses of what they swear to
they ridicule those who undertake to weigh it with care,
and pursue with scorn or pity those who shiver through
all their arteries at a story of the preternatural.
As if it were a mark of deplorable fatuity for a babe to
believe now as a multitude of wise and great and gifted
men have heretofore believed in every age of the world!
As if to think it possible for such to have been right in
their belief, were too absurd for excuse nowsuch men
as the holy Greek, the upright immovable Socrates,
who persuaded himself that he was watched over by
a sort of household spirit; such men too as the bald
Csar, and the rock-hearted Brutus, both of whom
spite of their imperial nature and high place among the
warlike and mighty of their age, believed in that, and
shook before that which whether deceitful or not,
substance
or shadow, the very cowards of our day are too
brave to be scared with, too full of courage to put their
trust inafraid as they are of that, which the Roman pair
would have met with a stern smile and a free step; such
men too of a later age, as the profound, wise and pure
Sir Matthew Hale, who put many to death for witchcraft
so clear was the proof, and so clear the nature of the
crimewhile the nature of larceny, the nature of
common
theft was forever a mystery to him, if we may
believe
what we hear out of his own mouth; such men too
as the celebrated Judge Blackstone, who after a thorough
sifting of the law, says--It seems to be most elegible
to conclude that in general there has been such a thing
as witchcraft, though we cannot give credit to any
particular
modern instance of it; such men too as Doctor
Samuel Johnson, L L. D. who saw through all the
hypocricy
and subterfuge of our day, when he said,
speaking
of a superstitious belief, that men who deny it by
their words, confess it by their fearsnothing was ever
so true! we who are most afraid, want courage to own
it; such men too as the Lord Protector of England,
while she was a common wealth; and such as he, the
Desolator
...............From whose reluctant hand,
The thunder-bolt was wrung
for they were both believers in what the very rabble of
our earth deride now; such men, too, as the chief among
poetsByronfor he believed in the words of a poor
old gypsey, and shook with fear, and faltered on the way
to his bridal-chamber, when he thought of the prophecy
she had uttered years and years before, in the morning of
his haughty youth; such men too as the head lawgiver
of our day, the High-Priest of Legislation, the great and
good, the benevolent, the courageous Bentham, who to
this hour is half afraid in the dark, and only able to
satisfy
himself about the folly of such fear, when his
night-cap
is off, by resorting with suitable gravity to his old
refuge
,
the exhaustive mode of reasoning. If a ghost
appear
at all, argues he, it must appear either clothed or
not clothed. But a ghost never appears not clothed,
or naked; and if it appear clothed, we shall have not only
the ghost of a human creaturewhich is bad enough;
but the ghost of a particular kind of cloth of a
particular
fashion, the ghost of a pocket-handkerchief, or a
night-capwhich is too bad.
Thus much for authority: and here, but for one little
circumstance we should take up our narrative, and
pursue
it without turning to the right or the left, until we
came to the sorrowful issue; but as we may have here
and there a reader, in this unbelieving age, who has no
regard for authority, nor much respect for the wisdom
of our ancestors, what if we try to put the whole
argument
into a more conclusive shape? It may require
but a few pages, and a few pages may go far to allay
the wrath of modern philosophy. If we throw aside the
privilege of authorship, and speak, not as a multitude but
as one of the true faith, our argument would stand thus:
In a word, whatever the philosophy of our age may
say, I cannot look upon witchcraft and sorcery as the
unbeliever does. I know enough what the fashion is
now; but I cannot believe, I do not believe that we
know much more of the matter than our great
progenitors
did; or that we are much wiser than a multitude
who have been for ages, and are now, renowned for their
wisdom; or that we are much more pious than our noble
fathers were, who died in their beliefdied
for
their
belief, I should say, and are a proverb to this hour on
account of their piety. Nor can I persuade myself that
such facts would be met with in grave undoubted history,
if they were untrue, as are to be met with in every page
of that which concerns the period of our story; facts
which go to prove not only that a fixed belief in
witchcraft
prevailed throughout Europe as well as America,
and among those with whom there was no lack of
probity
or good sense, or knowledge, it would appear; but
that hundreds of poor creatures were tried for witchcraft
under the authority of British law, and put to death,
under the authority of British law, (and several after
confession) for the practice of witchcraft and sorcery.
May it not be worth our while therefore, to speak
seriously and reverently of our mighty forefathers? to
bear in mind that the proof which they offer is
affirmative
and positive, while that which we rely upon, is
negativea matter of theory? to keep in view,
moreover
,
3*
that if a body of witnesses of equal worth were
equally divided, one half saying that on such a day and
hour, at such a place, when they were all together, such
or such a thing, preternatural or not, mysterious or not,
occurred; while the other half say positively, man for
man, that so far as they heard or saw, or know or
believe
,
no such thing did occur, at such a time or place,
or at any other time or place, whatsoeverstill, even
here, though you may believe both parties, though you
may give entire credit to the words of each, you may be
justified, in a variety of cases, in acting upon the
testimony
of the former in preference to that of the latter.
And why? Because the contradictory words of both
may not be so contradictory as they appearnot so
contradictory
as to neutralize each other on every
hypothesis
;
but may be reconcilable to the supposition that such
or such a fact, however positively denied by one party,
and however mysterious it may seem, really did occur:
and this while they are not reconcilable to the supposition
that such or such a fact really did
not
occur.It being
much more easy to overlook that which is, than to see
that which is not; much more easy to
not
see a shadow
that falls upon our pathway, than to see a shadow where
indeed there is no shadow; much more easy to
not
hear
a real voice, than to hear
no
voice.
If the multitude of trustworthy and superior men,
therefore, who testify to the facts which are embodied
in the following narrative, and which may appear
incredible
to the wise of our day, or out of the course of
nature to the philosophy of our day, like ice or snow to
the Lord of the Desert; if they were positively
contradicted
step by step, throughout, by another like
multitude
of trustworthy and superior menstill, though the
two parties were alike numerous and alike worthy of
credit, and although you might believe the story of each,
and every word of it, and give no preference to either:
Still I say, you might be justified in supposing that
after all, the facts which the former testify to really did
occur. And why? Because
though
both speak true,
that hypothesis may still be supported; while
if
both
speak true, the contrary hypothesis cannot be supported.
Facts may occur without being heard or seen by the
whole of a party who are together at the time they
occur
:
but how are they to be seen or heard, if they do
not occur at all?
I have put a much stronger case than that on which
the truth of the following story is made to depend; for
no such contradiction occurs here, no such positive
testimony
,
no such array of multitude against multitude of
the same worth, or the same age, or the same people.
On the affirmative side are a host herea host of
respectable
witnesses, not a few of whom sealed their testimony
with their blood; on the negative, hardly one either of
a good or a bad character. What appears on the
negative
side is not by facts, but by theory. It is not positive
but conjectural, The negative witnesses are of our age
and of our people; the affirmative were of another age
and of another people. The former too, it should be
remarked were not only not present, but they were not
bornthey were not alive, when the matters which they
deny the truth of, took placeif they ever took place at
all. Now, if oaths are to be answered by conjecture,
bloodshed by a sneer, absolute martyrdom by hypothesis,
much grave testimony of the great and the pious, by a
speculative argument, a brief syllogism, or a jokeof
what use are the rules by which our trust in what we
hear is regulated? our faith whatever it may be, and
whether it concern this world or the next, and whether
it be of the past, the present or the future? Are we to
believe only so far as we may touch and see for
ourselves
?
What is the groundwork of true knowledge?
where the spirit of true philosophy? Whither should
we go for proof; and of what avail is the truth which
we are hoarding up, the truth which we are extracting
year after year by laborious investigation, or fearful
experiment
?
If we do not believe those who go up to the
altar and make oath before the Everlasting God, not as
men do now, one after another, but nation by nation,
to that which is very new to us, or wonderful, why
should posterity believe us when we testify to that which
hereafter may be very new to them or very wonderful?
Is every day to be like every other day, every age like
every other age in the Diary of the Universe?
Earthquake
,
war and revolutionthe overthrow of States and
of empires, are they to be repeated forever, lest men
should not believe the stories that are told of them?
CHAPTER II.
But
enough. It is quite impossible to doubt the
sincerity
of the Plymouth settlers, the Pilgrims, or Fathers
of New-England, who escaping over sea laid the
foundations
of a mighty empire on the perpetual rocks of
New-Plymouth, and along the desolate shores of a new
world, or their belief in witchcraft and sorcery, whatever
we
may happen to believe now; for,at a period of sore and
bitter perplexity for them and theirs, while they were yet
wrestling for life, about four hundred of their hardy brave
industrious population were either in prison for the
alleged
practice of witchcraft, or under accusation for
matters which were looked upon as fatal evidence
thereof
.
By referring to the sober and faithful records of
that age, it will be found that in the course of about
fifteen
months, while the Fathers of New-England were
beset on every side by the exasperated savages, or by
the more exasperated French, who led the former through
every part of the British-American territory, twenty
eight persons received sentence of death (of which
number nineteen were executed) one died in jail, to whom
our narrative relates, and one was deliberately crushed
to deathaccording to British law, because forsooth,
being a stout full-hearted man, he would not make a
plea, nor open his mouth to the charge of sorcery,
before
the twelve, who up to that hour had permitted no
one who did open his mouth to escape; that a few more
succeeded in getting away before they were capitally
charged; that one hundred and fifty were set free after
the outcry was over; and that full two hundred more of
the accused who were in great peril without knowing it,
were never proceeded against, after the death of the
individual whose character we have attempted a sketch
of, in the following story.
Of these four hundred poor creatures, a large part of
whom were people of good repute in the prime of life,
above two-score made confession of their guiltand this
although about one half, being privately charged, had no
opportunity for confession. The laws of nature,it would
seem
were
set asideif not by Jehovah, at least by the
judges acting under the high and holy sanction of
British
law, in this day of sorrow; for at the trial of a
woman
who appears to have been celebrated for beauty and
held in great fear because of her temper, both by the
settlers and the savages, three of her children stood up,
and children though they were, in the presence of their
mother, avowed themselves to be witches, and gave a
particular account of their voyages through the air and
over sea, and of the cruel mischief they had perpetrated
by her advice and direction; for she was endowed, say
the records of the day, with great power and
prerogative
,
and the Father of lies had promised her, at one of
their church-yard gatherings that she should be Queen
of Hell.
But before we go further into the particulars of our
narrative
which relates to a period when the frightful
superstition
we speak of was raging with irresistible power, a
rapid review of so much of the earlier parts of the
New-England
history, as immediately concerns the
breaking
out, and the growth of a belief in witchcraft among
the settlers of our savage country, may be of use to
the reader, who, but for some such preparation, would
never be able to credit a fiftieth part of what is
undoubtedly
true in the following story.
The pilgrims or Fathers of New-England, as they
are now called by the writers of America, were but a
ship-load of pious brave men, who while they were in
search of a spot of earth where they might worship their
God without fear, and build up a faith, if so it pleased
him, without reproach, went ashore partly of their own
accord, but more from necessity, in the terrible winter
of 1620-21, upon a rock of Massachusetts-Bay, to which
they gave the name of New-Plymouth, after that of the
port of England from which they embarked.
They left England forever....England their home and
the home of their mighty fathersturned their backs
forever upon all that was dear to them in their beloved
country, their friends, their houses, their tombs and
their churches, their laws and their literature with all
that other men cared for in that age; and this merely
to avoid persecution for a religious faith; fled away as
it were to the ends of the earth, over a sea the very
name of which was doubtful, toward a shore that was
like a shadow to the navigators of Europe, in search of
a place where they might kneel down before their
Father
,
and pray to him without molestation.
But, alas for their faith! No sooner had these pilgrims
touched the shore of the new world, no sooner were they
established in comparative power and security, than
they fell upon the Quakers, who had followed them over
the same sea, with the same hope; and scourged and
banished them, and imprisoned them, and put some to
death, for not believing as the new church taught in the
new world. Such is the nature of man! The
persecuted
of to-day become the persecutors of to-morrow.
They flourish, not because they are right, but because
they are persecuted; and they persecute because they
have the power, not because they whom they persecute
are wrong.
The quakers died in their belief, and as the great
always
diewithout a word or a tear; praying for the
misguided
people to their last breath, but prophecying
heavy
sorrow to them and to theirsa sorrow without a
namea wo without a shape, to their whole race
forever
;
with a mighty series of near and bitter affliction to
the judges of the land, who while they were uttering
the words of death to an aged woman of the Quakers,
(Mary Dyer) were commanded with a loud voice to set
their houses in order, to get ready the accounts of their
stewardship, and to prepare with the priesthood of all
the earth, to go before the Judge of the quick and the
dead. It was the voice of Elizabeth Hutchinson, the
dear and familiar friend of Mary Dyer. She spoke as
one having authority from above, so that all who heard
her were afraidall! even the judges who were dealing
out their judgment of death upon a fellow creature. And
lo! after a few years, the daughter of the chief judge,
before whom the prophecy had been uttered with such
awful power, was tried for witchcraft and put to death
for witchcraft on the very spot (so says the tradition of
the people) where she stayed to scoff at Mary Dyer,
who was on her way to the scaffold at the time, with
her little withered hands locked upon her bosom....her
grey head lifted up....not bowed in her unspeakable
distress
....but
lifted up, as if in prayer to something visible
above, something whatever it was, the shadow of which
fell upon the path and walked by the side of the aged
martyr; something whatever it was, that moved like a
spirit over the green smooth turf....now at her elbow,
now high up and afar off....now in the blue, bright air;
something whose holy guardianship was betrayed to the
multitude by the devout slow motion of the eyes that
were about to be extinguished forever.
Not long after the death of the daughter of the chief
4
judge, another female was executed for witchcraft, and
other stories of a similar nature were spread over the
whole country, to prove that she too had gone out of
her way to scoff at the poor quaker-woman. This
occurred
in 1655, only thirty-five years after the arrival
of the Fathers in America. From this period, until 1691,
there were but few trials for witchcraft among the
Plymouth
settlers, though the practice of the art was
believed
to be common throughout Europe as well as
America, and a persuasion was rooted in the very hearts
of the people, that the prophecy of the quakers and of
Elizabeth Hutchinson would assuredly be
accomplished
.
It
was
accomplished. A shadow fell upon the earth
at noon-day. The waters grew dark as midnight.
Every
thing alive was quiet with fearthe trees, the birds,
the cattle, the very hearts of men who were gathered
together in the houses of the Lord, every where,
throughout all the land, for worship and for mutual
succor
.
It was indeed a Dark Daya day never to be
thought of by those who were alive at the time, nor by
their children's children, without fear. The shadow of
the grave was abroad, with a voice like the voice of the
grave. Earthquake, fire, and a furious bright storm
followed; inundation, war and stife in the church.
Stars fell in a shower, heavy cannon were heard in the
deep of the wilderness, low music from the sea
trumpets
,
horses, armies, mustering for battle in the deep sea.
Apparitions were met in the high way, people whom
nobody knew, men of a most unearthly stature; evil
spirits going abroad on the sabbath-day. The print of
huge feet and hoof-marks were continually discovered
in the snow in the white sand of the sea-shorenay, in
the solid rocks and along the steep side of high
mountains
,
where no mortal hoof could go; and sometimes
they could be traced from roof to roof on the house-tops,
though the buildings were very far apart; and the shape
of Elizabeth Hutchinson herself, was said to have
appeared
to a traveller, on the very spot where she and
her large family, after being driven forth out of
New-England
by the power of the new church, were put to
death by the savages. He that saw the shape knew it,
and was afraid for the people; for the look of the
woman
was a look of wrath, and her speech a speech of
power.
Elizabeth Hutchinson was one of the most
extraordinary
women of the agehaughty, ambitious and crafty;
and when it was told every where through the Plymouth
colony that she had appeared to one of the church that
expelled her, they knew that she had come back, to be
seen of the judges and elders, according to her oath,
and were siezed with a deep fear. They knew that she
had been able to draw away from their peculiar mode of
worship, a tithe of their whole number when she was
alive, and a setter forth, if not of strange gods, at least of
strange doctrines: and who should say that her
mischievous
power had not been fearfully augmented by
death?
Meanwhile the men of New Plymouth, and of
Massachusetts
Bay, had multiplied so that all the neighborhood
was tributary to them, and they were able to send forth
large bodies of their young men to war, six hundred,
seven hundred, and a thousand at a time, year after
year, to fight with Philip of Mount Hope, a royal
barbarian
,
who had wit enough to make war as the great
men of Europe would make war now, and to persuade
the white people that the prophecy of the Quakers
related
to him. It is true enough that he made war like
a savageand who would not, if he were surrounded as
Philip of Mount Hope was, by a foe whose hatred was
a part of his religion, a part of his very blood and being?
if his territory were ploughed up or laid waste by a
superior
foe? if the very wilderness about him were fired
while it was the burial-place and sanctuary of his mighty
fathers? if their form of worship were scouted, and
every grave and every secret place of prayer laid open
to the light, with all their treasures and all their
mysteries
?
every temple not made with hands, every church
built by the Builder of the Skies, invaded by such a foe
and polluted with the rites of a new faith, or levelled
without mercyevery church and every temple,
whether
of rock or wood, whether perpetual from the first, or
planted as the churches and temples of the solitude are,
with leave to perpetuate themselves forever, to renew
their strength and beauty every year and to multiply
themselves on every side forever and ever, in spite of
deluge and fire, storm, strife and earthquake; every
church and every temple whether roofed as the skies
are, and floored as the mountains are, with great clouds
and with huge rocks, or covered in with tree-branches
and paved with fresh turf, lighted with stars and
purified
with high winds? Would not the man of Europe
make war now like a savage, and without mercy, if he
were beset by a foefor such was the foe that Philip of
Mount Hope had to contend with in the fierce pale men
of Massachusetts Bay,a foe that no weapon of his
could reach, a foe coming up out of the sea with
irresistible
power, and with a new shape? What if armies
were to spring up out of the solid earth before the man
of Europeit would not be more wonderful to him than
it was to the man of America to see armies issuing from
the deep. What if they were to approach in balloons
or in great ships of the air, armed all over as the foe of
the poor savage appeared to be, when the ships of the
water drew near, charged with thunder and with
lightning
,
and with four-footed creatures, and with sudden
death
?
Would the man of Europe make war in such a
case according to what are now called the usages of
war?
The struggle with this haughty savage was regarded
for a time as the wo without a shape, to which the
prophecy referred, the sorrow without a name; for it
occupied the whole force of the country, long and long
after the bow of the red-chief was broken forever, his
people scattered from the face of the earth, and his
royalty
reduced to a shadowa shadow it is true, but still
the shadow of a king; for up to the last hour of his life,
when he died as no king had ever the courage to die, he
showed no sign of terror, betrayed no wish to conciliate
the foe, and smote all that were near without mercy,
whenever they talked of submission; though he had no
hope left, no path for escape, and every shot of the
enemy
was fatal to some one of the few that stood near
him. It was a war, which but for the accidental
discovery
of a league embracing all the chief tribes of the
north, before they were able to muster their strength
for the meditated blow, would have swept away the
white men, literally to the four winds of heaven, and
left that earth free which they had set up their dominion
over by falsehood and by treachery. By and by however,
just when the issue of that war was near, and the fright
of the pale men over, just when the hearts of the church
had begun to heave with a new hope, and the prophecy
of wrath and sorrow was no longer to be heard in the
market-place, and by the way-side, or wherever the
people
were gathered together for business or worship,
with a look of awe and a subdued breathjust when it
came to be no longer thought of nor cared for by the
4*
judges and the elders, to whom week after week and
year after year, it had been a familiar proverb of death
(if bad news from the war had come over night, or news
of trouble to the church, at home or abroad, in Europe
or in America) they saw it suddenly and wholly
accomplished
before their facesevery word of it and every
letter.
The shadow of the destroyer went by....the type was
no more. But lo! in the stead thereof, while every
mother was happy, and every father in peace, and every
child asleep in security, because the shadow and the
type
had
gone bylo! the Destroyer himself appeared!
The shadow of death gave way for the visage of death
filling every heart with terror, and every house with
lamentation. The people cried out for fear, as with one
voice. They prayed as with one prayer. They had no
hope; for they saw the children of those who had
offered
outrage to the poor quaker-woman gathered up, on
every side, from the rest of the people, and after a few
days and a brief inquiry, afflicted in their turn with
reproach
and outcry, with misery, torture and cruel death;
and when they saw this, they thought of the speech of
Elizabeth Hutehinson before the priesthood of the land,
the judges and the people, when they drove her out from
among them, because of her new faith, and left her to
perish for it in the depth of a howling wilderness; her,
and her babes, and her beautiful daughter, and her two
or three brave disciples, away from hope and afar from
succor;and as they thought of this, they were filled
anew with unspeakable dread: for Mary Dyer and
Elizabeth
Hutchinson, were they not familiar, and very dear
friends? were they not sisters in life, and sisters in
death? gifted alike with a spirit of sure prophecy, though
of a different faith? and martyrs alike to the church?
CHAPTER III.
A strange infatuation had already begun to produce
misery in private families, and disorder throughout the
community, says an old American writer, in allusion
to the period of our story, 16912. The imputation
of witchcraft was accompanied with a prevalent belief
of its reality; and the lives of a considerable number of
innocent people were sacrificed to blind zeal and
superstitious
credulity. The mischief began at Naumkeag,
(Salem) but it soon extended into various parts of the
colony. The contagion however, was principally within
the county of Essex. The ra of English learning, had
scarcely commenced. Laws then existed in England
against witches; and the authority of Sir Matthew
Hale, who was revered in New England, not only for
his knowledge in the law, but for his gravity and piety,
had doubtless, great influence. The trial of the witches
in Suffolk, in England, was published in 1684; and
there was so exact a resemblance between the Old
England dmons and the New, that, it can hardly be
doubted the arts of the designing were borrowed, and
the credulity of the populace augmented from the parent
country.
The gloomy state of New England probably
facilitated
the delusion, for `superstition flourishes in times
of danger and dismay.' The distress of the colonist, at
this time, was great. The sea-coast was infested with
privateers. The inland frontiers, east and west, were
continually harassed by the French and Indians. The
abortive expedition to Canada, had exposed the country
to the resentment of France, the effects of which were
perpetually dreaded. The old charter was gone, and
what evils would be introduced by the new, which was
very reluctantly received by many, time only could
determine
,
but fear might forbode. * * How
far these causes operating in a wilderness that was
scarcely cleared up, might have contributed toward the
infatuation, it is difficult to determine. It were
injurious
however, to consider New England as peculiar in
this culpable credulity, with its sanguinary effects; for
more persons have been put to death for witchcraft, in a
single county in England, in a short space of time, than
have suffered for the same cause, in all New-England,
since its first settlement.
Another American writer who was an eye witness of
the facts which are embodied in the following narrative,
says, As to the method which the Salem justices do
take in their examinations, it is truly this: A warrant
being issued out to apprehend the persons that are
charged and complained of by the afflicted children,
(Abigail Paris and Bridget Pope) said persons are
brought before the justices, the afflicted being present.
The justices ask the apprehended why they afflict these
poor children; to which the apprehended answer they
do not afflict them. The justices order the
apprehended
to look upon the said children, which accordingly
they do; and at the time of that look (I dare not say
by
that look as, the Salem gentlemen do) the afflicted
are cast into a fiit. The apprehended are then blinded
and ordered to touch the afflicted; and at that touch,
though not
by
the touch (as above) the afflicted do
ordinarily
come out of their fits. The afflicted persons
then declare and affirm that the apprehended have
afflicted
them; upon which the apprehended persons
though of never so good repute are forthwith committed
to prison on suspicion of witchcraft.
At this period, the chief magistrate of the
New-Plymouth
colony, a shrewd, artful, uneducated man, was not
only at the head of those who believed in witchcraft as
a familiar thing, but he was a head-ruler in the church.
He was a native New-Englander of
low birth
so say
the records of our country,where birth is now, and
ever will be a matter of inquiry and solicitude, of shame
perhaps to the few and of pride to the few, but of inquiry
with all, in spite of our ostentatious republicanism. He
was the head man over a body of men who may be
regarded
as the natural growth of a rugged soil in a time
of religious warfare; with hearts and with heads like
the resolute unforgiving Swiss-protestant of their age,
or the Scotch-covenanter of an age that has hardly yet
gone by. They were the Maccabees of the seventeenth
century, and he was their political chief. They were
the fathers of a new church in a new world, where no
church had ever been heard of before; and he was ready
to buckle a sword upon his thigh and go out against all
the earth, at the command of that new church. They
were ministers of the gospel, who ministered with fire
and sword unto the savages whom they strove to convert;
believers, who being persecuted in Europe, hunted out
of Europe, and cast away upon the shores of America,
set up a new war of persecution hereeven herein the
untroddenalmost unapproachable domain of the Great
Spirit of the Universe; pursued their brethren to death,
scourged, fined, imprisoned, banished, mutilated, and
where nothing else would do, hung up their bodies
between
heaven and earth for the good of their souls;
drove mother after mother, and babe after babe, into the
woods for not believing as their church taught; made
war upon the lords of the soil, the savages who had been
their stay and support while they were strangers, and
sick and poor, and ready to perish, and whom it was
therefore a duty for themafter they had recovered
their strengthto make happy with the edge of the
sword; such war as the savages would make upon the
wild beast-way-laying them by night, and shooting them
to death, as they lie asleep with their young, without so
much as a declaration of war; destroying whithersoever
they went, whatsoever they saw, in the shape of a dark
man, as if they had authority from above to unpeople
the woods of America; firing village after village, in the
dead of the nightin the dead of winter tooand going
to prayer in the deep snow, while their hands were
smoking with slaughter, and their garments stiffening
with bloodthe blood, not of warriors overthrown by
warriors in battle, but of the decrepit, or sick, or
helpless
;
of the aged man, or the woman or the babeset
fire to in their sleep.Such were the men of
Massachusetts-Bay
,
at the period of our story, and he was
their political chief.
He had acquired a large property and the title of
Sir
;
a title which would go a great way at any time among
the people of New-England, who whatever else they
may be, and whatever they may pretend, are not now,
and were not during the governship of Sir William
Phips, at the period we refer to, and we dare say, never
will be, without a regard for titles and birth, and ribbons,
and stars, and garters, and much more too, than would
ever be credited by those who only judge of them by
what they are pleased to say of themselves in their
fourth-of-July orations. His rank and wealth were
acquired
in rather a strange waynot by a course of rude
mercantile adventure, such as the native Yankee is
familiar
with from his birth, through every unheard-of
sea, and along every unheard-of shore; but by fishing up
ingots of gold, and bars of silver, from the wreck of a
Spanish hulk, which had been cast away on the coast of
La Plata, years and years before, and which he had
been told of by Mr. Paris, the minister of Salem,a
worthy, studious, wayward man, who had met with some
account of the affair, while rummaging into a heap of
old newspapers and ragged books that fell in his way.
Another would have paid no attention, it is probable,
to the advice of the peachera man who had grown
old in poring over books that nobody else in that
country
had ever met with or heard of; but the hardy
NewEnglander
was too poor and too anxious for wealth to
throw a chance away; and having satisfied himself in
some degree about the truth of a newspaper-narrative
which related to the ship, he set sail for the mother
country, received the patronage of those, who if they
were not noblemen, would be called partners in every
such enterprise, with more than the privilege of
partners
for
they generally contrive to take the praise and
the profit, while their plebeian associates have to put up
with the loss and the reproach; found the wreck, and
after a while succeeded in weighing a prodigious
quantity
of gold and silver. He was knighted in
consequence
,
we are told; but in consequence of what, it
would be no easy matter to say: and after so short an
absence
that he was hardly missed, returned to his native
country with a new charter, great wealth, a great name,
the title of Sir, and the authority of a chief magistrate.
Such are a few of the many facts which every body
that knew him was acquainted with by report, and
which nobody thought of disbelieving in
British-America
,
till the fury about witches and witchcraft took
possession
of the people; after which they began to shake
their heads at the story, and getting more and more
courage as they grew more and more clear-sighted, they
went on doubting first one part of the tale, and then
another
,
till at last they did not scruple to say of their
worthy Governor himself, and of the aged Mr. Paris,
that one of the twothey did not like to say whichhad
got above their neighbors' heads, after all, in a very
strange waya very strange way indeedthey did not
like to say how; and that the sooner the other was done
with old books, the better it would be for him. He had
a Bible of his own to study, and what more would a
preacher of the Gospel have?
Governor Phips and Matthew Paris were what are
called neighbors in America. Their habitations were
not more than five leagues apart. The Governor lived
at Boston, the chief town of Massachusetts-Bay, and the
preacher at Naumkeag, in a solitary log-house,
completely
sourrounded by a thick wood, in which were
many graves; and a rock held in great awe by the red
men of the north, and avoided with special care by the
whites, who had much reason to believe that in other
days, it had been a rock of sacrifice, and that human
creatures had been offered up there by the savages of
old, either to Hobbamocko, their evil deity, or to
Rawtantoweet
,
otherwise Ritchtau, their great Invisible
Father
.
Matthew Paris and Sir William Phips had each
a faith of his own therefore, in all that concerned
witches and witchcraft. Both were believersbut their
belief was modified, intimate as they were, by the
circumstances
and the society in which they lived. With
the aged, poor and solitary mana widower in his old
age, it was a dreadful superstition, a faith mixed up
with a mortal fear. With the younger and richer man,
whose hope was not in the grave, and whose thoughts
were away from the death-bed; who was never alone
perhaps for an hour of the day; who lived in the very
5
whirl of society, surrounded by the cheerful faces of
them that he most loved on earth, it wore a less
harrowing
shapeit was merely a faith to talk of, and to teach
on the Sabbath day, a curious faith suited to the bold
inquisitive temper of the age. Both were believers, and
fixed believers; and yet of the two, perhaps, the
speculative
man would have argued more powerfullywith
fire and swordas a teacher of what he believed.
About a twelvemonth before the enterprise to La
Plata, whereby the uneducated man of low birth
came to be a ruler and a chief in the land of his
nativity
,
Matthew Paris the preacher, to whom he was
indebted
for a knowledge of the circumstances which led
to the discovery, had lost a young wifea poor girl who
had been brought up in his family, and whom he
married
not
because
of her youth, but in spite of her youth;
and every body knew as he stood by her grave, and saw
the fresh earth heaped upon her, that he would never
hold up his head again, his white venerable head, which
met with a blessing wherever it appeared. From that
day forth, he was a broken-hearted selfish man, weary
of life, and sick with insupportable sorrow. He began
to be afraid with a strange fear, to persuade himself that
his Father above had cast him off, and that for the rest
of his life he was to be a mark of the divine displeasure.
He avoided all that knew him, and chiefly those he had
been most intimate with while he was happy; for their
looks and their speech, and every change of their breath
reminded him of his poor Margaret, his meek beautiful
wife. He could not bear the very song of the birds
nor the sight of the green trees; for she was buried in
the summer-time, while the trees were in flower, and
the birds singing in the branches that overshadowed her
grave; and so he withdrew from the world and shut
himself up in a dreary solitude, where neglecting his
duty as a preacher of the gospel, he gave up his whole
time to the education of his little daughterthe child of
his old age, and the live miniature of its motherwho
was
like
a child, from the day of her birth to the day of
her death. His grief would have been despair, but for
this one hope. It was the sorrow of old agethat
insupportable
sorrowthe sorrow of one who is ready to
cry out with every sob, and at every breath, in the
desolation
of a widowed heart, whenever he goes to the
fireside or the table, or sees the sun set, or the sky
change with the lustre of a new day, or wakes in the
dead of the night from a cheerful dream of his wife
his dear, dear wife, to the frightful truth; finding the
heavy solitude of the grave about him, his bridal
chamber
dark with the atmosphere of death, his marriage
bedhis homehis very heart, which had been
occupied
with a blessed and pure love a moment before,
uninhabited
forever.
His family consisted now of this one child, who was
in her tenth year, a niece in her twelfth year, and two
Indians who did the drudgery of the house, and were
treated as members of the family, eating at the same
table
and of the same food as the preacher. One was a
female who bore the name of Tituba; the other a
praying
warrior, who had become a by-word among the
tribes of the north, and a show in the houses of the
white men.
The preacher had always a belief in witchcraft, and
so had every body else that he knew; but he had never
been afraid of witches till after the death of his wife.
He had been a little too ready perhaps to put faith in
every tale that he heard about apparition or shadow,
star-shooting or prophecy, unearthly musick, or spirits
going abroad through the very streets of Salem village,
and over the green fields, and along by the sea shore,
the wilderness, the rock and the hill-top, and always at
noon-day, and always without a shadowshapes of
death, who never spoke but with a voice like that of the
wind afar off, nor moved without making the air cold
about them; creatures from the deep sea, who are
known to the pious and the gifted by their slow smooth
motion over the turf, and by their quiet, grave,
unchangeable
eyes. But though he had been too ready to
believe in such things, from his youth up, he had never
been much afraid of them, till after he found himself
widowed forever, as he drew near, arm in arm with an
angel, to the very threshold of eternity; separated by
death, in his old age, from a good and beautiful, and
young wife, just when he had no other hopeno other
joynothing but her and her sweet image, the babe, to
care for underneath the sky. Are we to have no
charity
for such a manweak though he appeara man
whose days were passed by the grave where his wife
lay, and whose nights were passed literally in her
death-bed
;
a man living away and apart from all that he
knew, on the very outskirts of the solitude, among those
who had no fear
but
of shadows and spirits, and
witchcraft
and witches? We should remember that his faith
after all, was the faith, not so much of the man, as of the
age he lived in, the race he came of, and the life that he
led. Hereafter, when posterity shall be occupied with
our doings, they may wonder at our faithperhaps at
our credulity, as we now wonder at his.
But the babe grew, and a new hope flowered in his
heart, for she was the very image of her mother; and
there was her little cousin too, Bridget Pope, a child of
singular beauty and very tall of her agehow
could
he
be unhappy, when he heard their sweet voices ringing
together?
5*
CHAPTER IV.
Bridget Pope was of a thoughtful serious turnthe
little Abby the veriest romp that ever breathed.
Bridget
was the elder, by about a year and a half, but she
looked five years older than Abby, and was in every
way a remarkable child. Her beauty was like her
stature
,
and both were above her age; and her aptitude for
learning was the talk of all that knew her. She was a
favorite every where and with every bodyshe had such
a sweet way with her, and was so unlike the other
children
of her ageso that when she appeared to merit
reproof, as who will not in the heyday of innocent
youth, it was quite impossible to reprove her, except
with a mild voice, or a kind look, or a very affectionate
word or two. She would keep away from her slate and
book for whole days together, and sit for half an hour at
a time without moving her eyes off the page, or turning
away her head from the little window of their
school-house
(a log-hut plastered with blue clay in stripes and
patches, and lighted with horn, oiled-paper and
isinglass
)
which commanded a view of Naumkeag, or Salem
village, with a part of the original woods of North
Americahuge trees that were found there on the first
arrival of the white man, crowded together and covered
with moss and dropping to pieces of old age; a
meeting-house
with a short wooden spire, and the figure of death
on the top for a weather-cock, a multitude of cottages
that appeared to be lost in the landscape, and a broad
beautiful approach from the sea.
Speak softly to Bridget Pope at such a time, or look
at her with a look of love, and her quiet eyes would fill,
and her childish heart would run overit would be
impossible
to say why. But if you spoke sharply to her,
when her head was at the little window, and her thoughts
were away, nobody knew where, the poor little thing
would grow pale and serious, and look at you with such
a look of sorrowand then go away and do what she
was bid with a gravity that would go your heart. And
it would require a whole day after such a rebuke to
restore
the dye of her sweet lips, or to persuade her that
you were not half so angry as you might have appeared.
At every sound of your voice, at every step that came
near, she would catch her breath, and start and look up,
as if she expected something dreadful to happen.
But as for Abigail Paris, the pretty little blue-eyed
cousin of Bridget Pope, there was no dealing with her
in that way. If you shook your finger at her, she would
laugh in your face; and if you did it with a grave air,
ten to one but she made you laugh too. If you scolded
her, she would scold you in return but always in such a
way that you could not possibly be angry with her; she
would mimic your step with her little naked feet, or the
toss of your head, or the very curb of your mouth
perhaps
,
while you were trying to terrify her. The little
wretch!everybody was tired to death of her in half an
hour, and yet everybody was glad to see her again.
Such was Abigail Paris, before Bridget Pope came to
live in the house with her, but in the course of about half
a year after that, she was so altered that her very
playfellows
twitted her with being afeard o' Bridgee Pope.
She began to be tidy in her dress, to comb her bright
hair, to speak low, to keep her shoes on her feet, and
her stockings from about her heels, and before a
twelvemonth
was over, she left off wading in the snow, and
grew very fond of her book.
They were always together now, creeping about
under
the old beach-trees, or hunting for hazle nuts, or
searching for sun-baked apples in the short thick grass,
or feeding the fish in the smooth clear seaBridget
poring over a story that she had picked up, nobody
knows where, and Abigail, whatever the story might be,
and although the water might stand in her eyes at the
time, always ready for a roll in the wet grass, a dip in
the salt wave, or a slide from the very top of the
haymow
.
They rambled about in the great woods together
on tip-toe, holding their breath and saying their prayers
at every step; they lay down together and slept
together
on the very track of the wolf, or the she-bear; and if
they heard a noise afar off, a howl or a war-whoop,
they crept in among the flowers of the solitary spot and
were safe, or hid themselves in the shadow of trees that
were spread out over the whole sky, or of shrubbery that
appeared to cover the whole earth
Where the wild grape hangs dropping in the shade,
O'er unfledged minstrels that beneath are laid;
Where the scarlet barberry glittered among the sharp
green leaves like threaded bunches of coral, where at
every step the more brilliant ivory-plums or clustered
bunch-berries rattled among the withered herbage and
rolled about their feet like a handful of beads,where
they delighted to go even while they were afraid to speak
above a whisper, and kept fast hold of each other's
hands, every step of the way. Such was their love,
such their companionship, such their behaviour while
oppressed with fear. They were never apart for a day,
till the time of our story; they were together all day and
all night, going to sleep together and waking up
together
,
feeding out of the same cup, and sleeping in the same
bed, year after year.
But just when the preacher was ready to believe that
his Father above had not altogether deserted himfor
he was ready to cry out with joy whenever he looked
upon these dear children; they were so good and so
beautiful, and they loved each other so entirely; just
when there appeared to be no evil in his path, no
shadow
in his way to the grave, a most alarming change
took place in their behavior to each other. He tried to
find out the cause, but they avoided all inquiry. He
talked with them together, he talked with them apart,
he tried every means in his power to know the truth,
but all to no purpose. They were afraid of each
other
,
and that was all that either would say. Both
were full of mischief and appeared to be possessed with
a new temper. They were noisy and spiteful toward
each other, and toward every body else. They were
continually hiding away from each other in holes and
corners, and if they were pursued and plucked forth to
the light, they were always found occupied with mischief
above their age. Instead of playing together as they
were wont, or sitting together in peace, they would
creep away under the tables and chairs and beds, and
behave as if they were hunted by something which
nobody
else could see; and they would lie there by the hour,
snapping and snarling at each other, and at everybody
that passed near. They had no longer the look of
health, or of childhood, or of innocence. They were
meagre and pale, and their eyes were fiery, and their
fingers were skinny and sharp, and they delighted in
devilish tricks and in outcries yet more devilish. They
would play by themselves in the dead of the night, and
shriek with a preternatural voice, and wake everybody
with strange laughtera sort of smothered giggle, which
would appear to issue from the garret, or from the top
of the house, while they were asleep, or pretending to
be dead asleep in the great room below. They would
break out all over in a fine sweat like the dew on a rose
bush, and fall down as if they were struck to the heart
with a knife, while they were on the way to meeting or
school, or when the elders of the church were talking to
them and every eye was fixed on their faces with pity
or terror. They would grow pale as death in a moment,
and seem to hear voices in the wind, and shake as with
an ague while standing before a great fire, and look
about on every side with such a piteous look for children,
whenever it thundered or lightened, or whenever the sea
roared, that the eyes of all who saw them would fill
with tears. They would creep away backwards from
each other on their hands and feet, or hide their faces
in the lap of the female Indian Tituba, and if the
preacher
spoke to them, they would fall into a stupor, and
awake with fearful cries and appear instantly covered
all over with marks and spots like those which are left
by pinching or bruising the flesh. They would be struck
dumb while repeating the Lord's prayer, and all their
features would be distorted with a savage and hateful
expression.
The heads of the church were now called together,
and a day of general fasting, humiliation and prayer
was appointed, and after that, the best medical men of
the whole country were consulted, the pious and the
gifted, the interpreters of dreams, the soothsayers, and
the prophets of the Lord, every man of power, and every
woman of power,but no relief was had, no cure, no
hope of cure.
Matthew Paris now began to be afraid of his own
child. She was no longer the hope of his heart, the joy
of his old age, the live miniature of his buried wife. She
was an evil thingshe was what he had no courage to
think of, as he covered his old face and tore his white
hair with a grief that would not be rebuked nor appeased.
A new fear fell upon him, and his knees smote together,
and the hair of his flesh rose, and he saw a spirit, and
the spirit said to him look! And he looked, and lo! the
truth appeared to him; for he saw neighbour after
neighbour flying from his path, and all the heads of the
church keeping aloof and whispering together in a low
voice. Then knew he that Bridget Pope and Abigail
Paris were bewitched.
A week passed over, a whole week, and every day and
every hour they grew worse and worse, and the solitude
in which he lived, more dreadful to him; but just when
there appeared to be no hope left, no chance for escape,
just when he and the few that were still courageous
enough to speak with him, were beginning to despair,
and to wish for the speedy death of the little sufferers,
dear as they had been but a few weeks before to
everybody
that knew them, a discovery was made which threw
the whole country into a new paroxysm of terror. The
savages who had been for a great while in the habit of
going to the house of the preacher to eat and sleep
without
money and without price, were now seen to keep
aloof and to be more than usually grave; and yet when
they were told of the children's behaviour, they showed
no sort of surprise, but shook their heads with a smile,
and went their way, very much as if they were prepared
for it.
When the preacher heard this, he called up the two
Indians before him, and spoke to Tituba and prayed to
know why her people who for years had been in the habit
of lying before his hearth, and eating at his table, and
coming in and going out of his habitation at all hours of
the day and night, were no longer seen to approach his
door.
Tituppa no sayTituppa no know, she replied.
But
as
she replied, the preacher saw her make a sign
to Peter Wawpee, her Sagamore, who began to show
his teeth as if he knew something more than he chose to
tell; but before the preacher could rebuke him as he
deserved
,
or pursue the inquiry with Tituba, his daughter
screamed out and fell upon her face and lay for a long
while as if she were death-struck.
The preacher now bethought him of a new course, and
after watching Tituba and Wawpee for several nights,
became satisfied from what he saw, that she was a
woman
of diabolical power. A part of what he saw, he
was afraid even to speak of; but he declared on oath
before
the judges, that he had seen sights, and heard noises
that took away his bodily strength, his hearing and his
breath for a time; that for nearly five weeks no one of her
tribe, nor of Wawpee's tribe had slept upon his hearth, or
eaten of his bread, or lifted the latch of his door either
by night or by day; that notwithstanding this, the very
night before, as he went by the grave-yard where his
poor wife lay, he heard the whispering of a multitude;
that having no fear in such a place, he made a search;
and that after a long while he found his help Tituba
concealed
in the bushes, that he said nothing but went his
way, satisfied in his own soul however that the voices he
heard were the voices of her tribe; and that after the
moon rose he saw her employed with a great black
Shadow on the rock of death, where as every body knew,
sacrifices had been offered up in other days by another
people to the god of the Paganthe deity of the savage
employed in a way that made him shiver with fright
where he stood; for between her and the huge black
shadow there lay what he knew to be the dead body of
his own dear child stretched out under the awful trees
her image rather, for
she
was at home and abed and
asleep at the time. He would have spoken to it if he
couldfor he saw what he believed to be the shape of
his wife; he would have screamed for help if he could,
but he could not get his breath, and that was the last he
knew; for when he came to himself he was lying in his
own bed, and Tituba was sitting by his side with a cup
of broth in her hand which he took care to throw away
the moment her back was turned; for she was a
creature
of extraordinary art, and would have persuaded him
that he had never been out of his bed for the whole day.
The judges immediately issued a warrant for Tituba
and Wawpee, both of whom were hurried off to jail, and
after a few days of proper inquiry, by torture, she was
put upon trial for witchcraft. Being sorely pressed by
the word of the preacher and by the testimony of Bridget
Pope and Abigail Paris, who with two more afflicted
children (for the mischief had spread now in every
quarter
)
charged her and Sarah Good with appearing to
them at all hours, and in all places, by day and by night,
when they were awake and when they were asleep, and
with tormenting their flesh, Tituba pleaded guilty and
confessed before the judges and the people that the poor
children spoke true, that she was indeed a witch, and
that, with several of her sister witches of great power
among whom was mother Good, a miserable woman who
lived a great way off, nobody knew whereand
passed
the greater part of her time by the sea-side, nobody
knew how, she had been persuaded by the black man to
pursue and worry and vex them. But the words were
hardly out of her mouth before she herself was taken
with a fit, which lasted so long that the judges believed
her to be dead. She was lifted up and carried out into
the air; but though she recovered her speech and her
6
strength in a little time, she was altered in her looks
from that day to the day of her death.
But as to mother Good, when they brought her up for
trial, she would neither confess to the charge nor pray
the court for mercy; but she stood up and mocked
the jury and the people, and reproved the judges for
hearkening to a body of accusers who were collected
from all parts of the country, were of all ages, and swore
to facts, which if they ever occurred at all, had occurred
years and years beforefacts which it would have been
impossible for her to contradict, even though they had
all been, as a large part of them obviously were, the
growth of mistake or of superstitious dread. Her
behavior
was full of courage during the trial; and after
the trial was over, and up to the last hour and last
breath of her life, it was the same.
You are a liar! said she to a man who called her
a witch to her teeth, and would have persuaded her to
confess and live. You are a liar, as God is my judge,
Mike! I am no more a witch than you are a wizard,
and you know it Mike, though you be so glib at prayer;
and if you take away my life, I tell you now that you
and yours, and the people here, and the judges and the
elders who are now thirsting for my blood shall rue the
work of this day, forever and ever, in sackcloth and
ashes
;
and I tell you further as Elizabeth Hutchinson told
you, Ah ha!.... how do you like the sound of that
name, Judges? You begin to be afraid I see; you are
all quiet enough now!.... But I say to you
nevertheless
,
and I say to you here, even here, with my last
breath, as Mary Dyer said to you with her last breath,
and as poor Elizabeth Hutchinson said to you with
hers, if you take away my life, the wrath of God shall
pursue you!you and yours!forever and ever! Ye
are wise men that I see, and mighty in faith, and ye
should be able with such faith to make the deep boil like
a pot, as they swore to you I did, to remove mountains,
yea to shake the whole earth by a wordmighty in faith
or how could you have swallowed the story of that
knife-blade, or the story of the sheet? Very wise are
you, and holy and fixed in your faith, or how could you
have borne with the speech of that bold man, who
appeared
to you in court, and stood face to face before
you, when you believed him to be afar off, or lying at
the bottom of the sea, and would not suffer you to take
away the life even of such a poor unhappy old creature
as I am, without reproving you as if he had authority
from the Judge of judges and the King of kings to stay
you in your faith!
Poor soul but I do pity thee! whispered a man
who stood near with a coiled rope in one hand and a
drawn sword in the other. It was the high-sheriff.
Her eyes filled and her voice faltered for the first
time, when she heard this, and she put forth her hand
with a smile, and assisted him in preparing the rope,
saying as the cart stopped under the large beam, Poor
soul indeed!You are too soft-hearted for your office,
and of the two, you are more to be pitied than the poor
old woman you are a-going to choke.
Mighty in faith she continued, as the high-sheriff
drew forth a watch and held it up for her to see that she
had but a few moments to live. I address myself to
you, ye Judges of Israel! and to you ye teachers of
truth! Believe ye that a mortal woman of my age, with
a rope about her neck, hath power to prophesy? If ye
do, give ear to my speech and remember my words. For
death, ye shall have death! For blood, ye shall have
bloodblood on the earth! blood in the sky! blood in
the waters! Ye shall drink blood and breathe blood,
you and yours, for the work of this day!
Woman, woman! we pray thee to forbear! cried
a voice from afar off.
I shall not forbear, Cotton Matherit is your voice
that I hear. But for you and such as you, miserable
men that ye are, we should now be happy and at peace
one with another. I shall not forbearwhy should I?
What have I done that I may not speak to the few that
love me before we are parted by death?
Be prepared womanif you
will
die, for the clock
is about to strike said another voice.
Be prepared, sayest thou? William Phips, for I
know the sound of thy voice too, thou hard-hearted
miserable
man! Be prepared, sayest thou? Behold
stretching forth her arms to the sky, and lifting herself
up and speaking so that she was heard of the people on
the house-tops afar off, Lo! I am ready! Be ye also
ready, for now!now!even while I speak to you, he
is preparing to reward both my accusers and my
judges
.
He!who!
Who, brother Joseph? said somebody in the
crowd.
Why the Father of lies to be sure! what a question
for you to ask, after having been of the jury!
Thou scoffer!
Paul! Paul, beware!
Harkwhat's that! Lord have mercy upon us!
The Lord have mercy upon us! cried the people,
giving way on every side, without knowing why, and
looking toward the high-sea, and holding their breath.
Pho, pho, said the scoffer, a grey-haired man
who stood leaning over his crutch with eyes full of pity
and sorrow, pho, pho, the noise that you hear is only the
noise of the tide.
Nay, nay, Elder Smith, nay, nay, said an associate of
the speaker. If it is only the noise of the tide, why have
we not heard it before? and why do we not hear it now?
just now, when the witch is about to be
True... true.... it may not be the Evil one, after all.
The Evil one, Joe Libby! No, no! it is God
himself
,
our Father above! cried the witch, with a loud
voice, waving her arms upward, and fixing her eye upon
a group of two or three individuals who stood aloof,
decorated
with the badges of authority. Our Father above,
I say! The Governor of governors, and the Judge of
judges!... The cart began to move here...
He
will
reward
you for the work of this day! He will refresh you
with blood for it! and you too Jerry Pope, and you too
Micajah Noyes, and you too Job Smith, and you....
and you.... and you....
Yea of a truth! cried a woman who stood apart from
the people with her hands locked and her eyes fixed
upon
the chief-judge. It was Rachel Dyer, the
grandchild
of Mary Dyer. Yea of a truth! for the Lord will
not hold him guiltless that spilleth his brother's blood, or
taketh his sister's life by the lawand her speech was
followed by a shriek from every hill-top and every
house-top
,
and from every tree and every rock within sight of
the place, and the cart moved away, and the body of the
poor old creature swung to and fro in the convulsions of
death.
6*
CHAPTER V.
It is not a little remarkable that within a few days
after
the death of Sarah Good, a part of her pretended
prophecy, that which was directed by her to the man
who called her a witch at the place of death, was
verified
upon him, letter by letter, as it were.
He was way-laid by a party of the Mohawks, and
carried
off to answer to the tribe for having reported of
them that they ate the flesh of their captives.It would
appear that he had lived among them in his youth, and
that he was perfectly acquainted with their habits and
opinions and with their mode of warfare; that he had
been well treated by their chief, who let him go free at
a time when he might lawfully have been put to death,
according to the usages of the tribe, and that he could
not possibly be mistaken about their eating the flesh of
their prisoners. It would appear too, that he had been
watched for, a long while before he was carried off; that
his path had been beset hour after hour, and week after
week, by three young warriors of the tribe, who might
have shot him down, over and over again if they would,
on the step of his own door, in the heart of a populous
village, but they would not; for they had sworn to trap
their pray alive, and to bring it off with the hide and the
hair on; that after they had carried him to the territory
of the Mohawks, they put him on trial for the charge
face to face with a red accuser; that they found him
guilty, and that, with a bitter laugh, they ordered him to
eat of the flesh of a dead man that lay bleeding on the
earth before him; that he looked up and saw the old
chief who had been his father when he belonged to the
tribe, and that hoping to appease the haughty savage,
he took some of the detestable food into his mouth, and
that instantlyinstantlybefore he could utter a prayer,
they fell upon him with clubs and beat him to death.
Her prophecy therefore did appear to the people to
be accomplished; for had she not said to this very man,
that for the work of that day, He should breathe blood
and eat blood?
Before a week had passed over, the story of death,
and the speech of the prophetess took a new shape, and
a variety of circumstances which occurred at the trial,
and which were disregarded at the time, were now
thought of by the very judges of the land with a secret
awe; circumstances that are now to be detailed, for they
were the true cause of what will not be forgotten for
ages in that part of the world....the catastrophe of our
story.
At the trial of Sarah Good, while her face was turned
away from her accuser, one of the afflicted gave a loud
scream, and gasping for breath, fell upon the floor at
the feet of the judges, and lay there as if she had been
struck down by the weight of no mortal arm; and being
lifted up, she swore that she had been stabbed with a
knife by the shape of Sarah Good, while Sarah Good
herself was pretending to be at prayer on the other side
of the house; and for proof, she put her hand into her
bosom and drew forth the blade of a penknife which was
bloody, and which upon her oath, she declared to have
been left sticking in her flesh a moment before, by the
shape of Sarah Good.
The Judges were thunderstruck. The people were
mute with terror, and the wretched woman herself
covered
her face with her hands; for she knew that if she
looked upon the sufferers, they would shriek out, and
foam at the mouth, and go into fits, and lie as if they
were dead for a while; and that she would be
commandded
by the judges to go up to them and lay her hands
upon their bodies without speaking or looking at them,
and that on her doing so, they would be sure to revive,
and start up, and speak of what they had seen or
suffered
while they were in what they called their agony.
The jury were already on their way out for
consultation
they
could not agree, it appeared; but when they
saw this, they stopped at the door, and came back one
by one to the jury box, and stood looking at each other,
and at the judges, and at the poor old woman, as if they
no longer thought it necessary to withdraw even for
form sake, afraid as they all were of doing that, in a case
of life and death, for which they might one day or other
be sorry. A shadow was upon every visage of the twelve
the shadow of death; a look in the eyes of everybody
there, a gravity and a paleness, which when the poor
prisoner saw, she started up with a low crya cry of
reproacha cry of despairand stood with her hands
locked, and her mouth quivering, and her lips apart
before
Godlips white with fear, though not with the
fear of death; and looked about her on every side, as if
she had no longer a hope leftno hope from the jury, no
hope from the multitude; nay as if while she had no
longer a hope, she had no longer a desire to live.
There was a dead preternatural quiet in the house
not a breath could be heard now, not a breath nor a
murmur
;
and lo! the aged foreman of the jury stood forth
and laid his hands upon the Book of the Law, and lifted
up his eyes and prepared to utter the verdict of death;
but before he could speak so as to he heard, for his
heart was over-charged with sorrow, a tumult arose
afar off like the noise of the wind in the great woods of
America; or a heavy swell on the sea-shore, when a surge
after surge rolls booming in from the secret reservoir of
waters, like the tide of a new deluge. Voices drew near
with a portentous hoof-clatter from every sideeast,
west, north and south, so that the people were mute with
awe; and as the dread clamor approached and grew
louder and louder every moment, they crowded together
and held their breath, they and the judges and the
preachers and the magistrates, every man persuaded in
his own soul that a rescue was nigh. At last a
smothed
war-whoop was heard, and then a sweet cheerful
noise like the laugh of a young child high up in the air
and then a few words in the accent of authority, and a
bustle outside of the door, which gave way as if it were
spurned with a powerful foot; and a stranger appeared
in the shadow of the huge trees that over-hung the
door-way
like a summer clouda low, square-built swarthy
man with a heavy tread, and a bright fierce look,
tearing
his way through the crowd like a giant of old, and
leading a beautiful boy by the hand.
What, ho! cried he to the chief judge, walking up to
him, and standing before him, and speaking to him with
a loud clear voice. What ho! captain Robert Sewall!
why do ye this thing? What ho, there! addressing
himself
to the foreman of the jurywhy speed ye so to the
work of death? and you, master Bailey! and you
governor
Phips! and you doctor Mather, what business
have ye here? And you ye judges, who are about to
become
the judges of life and death, how dare ye! Who
gave you power to measure and weigh such mystery? Are
ye gifted menall of youevery man of youspecially
gifted from above? Are you Thomas Fiskwith your
white hair blowing about your agitated mouth and your
dim eyes, are
you
able to see your way clear, that you
have the courage to pronounce a verdict of death on your
aged sister who stands there! And you Josh Carter,
senior
!
and you major Zach Trip! and you Job
Saltonstall
!
Who are ye and what are ye, men of war, that ye
are able to see spirits, or that ye should become what ye
arethe judges of our afflicted people! And who are we,
and what were our fathers, I beseech you, that we should
be base enough to abide upon earth but by your leave!
The judges looked at each other in consternation.
Who is it!....who is it! cried the people as they
rushed forward and gathered about him and tried to get
a sight of his face. Who
can
it be!
BurroughsBurBurBurroughs, I
do
believe!
whispered a man who stood at his elbow, but he spoke
as if he did not feel very sure of what he said.
Not George Burroughs, hey?
I'd take my oath of it neighbour Joe, my Bible-oath
of it, leaning forward as far as he could reach with
safety
,
and shading his eyes with his large bony hand
Well, I
do
say! whispered another.
I see the scar!as I live, I do! cried another, peering
over the heads of the multitude, as they rocked to the
heavy pressure of the intruder.
But how altered he is!....and how old he looks!....
and shorter than ever! muttered several more.
Silence there! cried the chief judgea
militia-captain
,
it is to be observed, and of course not altogether so
awyer-like as a judge of our day would be.
Silence there! echoed the High Sheriff.
Never see nobody so altered afore, continued one of
the crowd, with his eye fixed on the judgeI
will
say
that much, afore I stop, Mr. Sheriff Berry, an' (dropping
his voice) if you dont like it, you may lump it.... who
cares for you?
Wellan' who cares for you, if you come to that.
Officer of the court, how now! cried the chief judge
in a very loud sharp voice.
Here I be mister judgeI ain't deef.
Take that man away.
I say....you! cried the High-Sheriff, getting up and
fetching the man a rap over the head with his white-oak
staff....do you hear that?
Hear what?
What Mr. judge Sewall says.
I don't care for Mr. judge Sewall, nor you nyther.
Away with him Sir! out with him! are we to suffer
this outrage on the dignity of the court.... in the House
of the Lordaway with him, Sir.
Here's the devil to pay and no pitch hotwhispered
a sailor-looking fellow, in a red baize shirt.
An' there's thirteen-pence for you to pay, Mr.
Outlandishman
,
said a little neighbour, whose duty it was
to watch for offenders in a small way, and fine them for
swearing, drinking, or kissing their wives on the sabbath
day.
What for?
Why, for that air oath o'yourn.
What oath?
Why, you said here's the devil to pay!
Hahahaand there's thirteen-pence for
you
to
pay.
You be darned!
An' there's thirteen-pence more for you, my ladha
haha
The officer now drew near the individual he was
ordered
to remove; but he did so as if a little afraid of his
manwho stood up face to face with the judge, and
planted his foot as if he knew of no power on earth able
to move him, declaring he would'nt budge a peg, now
they'd come to that; for the house they were in had been
paid for out of the people's money, and he'd as much
right there as they had; but havin' said what he had to
say on the subject, and bein' pooty considr'ble easy on
that score now, if they'd mind their business he'd mind
his; and if
they'd
behave, he would.
Very well, said the chief judge, who knew the man to
be a soldier of tried bravery. Very well! you may stay
where you are; I thought we should bring you to your
senses, neighbour Joe.
Here the stranger broke away from the crowd and
leaped upon the platform, and setting his teeth and
smiting
the floor with a heavy iron-shod staff, he asked the
judges why they did not enforce the order? why with
courage to take away life, they had no courage to
defend
their authority. How dare ye forgive this man!
said he; how dare you bandy words with such a
fellow
!
What if you
have
been to the war with him? Have
ye not become the judges of the land? With hardihood
enough to undertake the awful representation of
majesty
,
have ye not enough to secure that majesty from
outrage
?
We know our own duty sir.
No such thing sir! you do notif you do, it shall be
the worse for you. You are afraid of that man
Afraid sir!Who are you!
Yesyou are afraid of that man. If you are not, why
allow him to disturb the gravity of such an hour as this?
Know your own powerBid the High-sheriff take him
into custody.
A laugh here from the sturdy yeoman, who having paid
his quota for building the house, and fought his share of
the fight with the Indians, felt as free as the best of
them.
Speak but the word, Sirs, and I will do what I see
your officer hath not valor enough to do. Speak but the
word, Sirs! and I that know your power, will obey it,
(uplifting the staff as he spoke, while the fire flashed
from his eyes, and the crowd gave way on every side as
if it were the tomahawk or the bow of a savage)speak
but the word I say! and I will strike him to the earth!
George BurroughsI pray thee! said a female, who
sat in a dark part of the house with her head so muffled
up that nobody could see her faceI pray thee, George!
do not strike thy brother in wrath.
Speak but the word I say, and lo! I will stretch him
at your feet, if he refuse to obey me, whatever may be
the peril to me or mine.
I should like to see you do it, said the man. I care
as little for you, my boy,throwing off his outer-garb as
he spoke, and preparing for a trial of strength on the
spotas little for you, George Burroughs, if that
is
your
name, as I do for your master.
Will you not speak! You see how afraid of him
they all are, judges; you know how long he has braved
your authoritybeing a soldier forsooth. Speak, if ye
are wise; for if ye do not
George! George!....No, no, George! said somebody
at his elbow, with a timid voice, that appeared to belong
to a child.
The uplifted staff dropped from his hand.
7
CHAPTER VI.
Here the venerable Increase Mather stood up, and
after a short speech to the people and a few words to the
court, he begged to know if the individual he saw before
him was indeed the George Burroughs who had
formerly
been a servant of God.
Formerly, sir! I am so now, I hope.
The other sat down, with a look of inquietude. You
appear to be much perplexed about me. You appear
even to doubt the truth of what I say. Surely....surely
....there are some here that know me. I know you,
Doctor Mather, and you, Sir William Phips, and you....
and you....and you; addressing himself to many that
stood nearit is but the other day that we were
associated
together; and some of us in the church, and others
in the ministry; it is but the other day that
Here the Judges began to whisper together.
That you knew me as well as I knew you. Can I
be so changed in a few short years? They have been
years of sorrow to be sure, of uninterrupted sorrow, of
trial and suffering, warfare and wo; but I did not
suppose
they had so changed me, as to make it over-hard
for my very brothers in the church to know me
It
is
Burroughs, I do believe, said another of the
judges.But who is that boy with you, and by what
authority are you abroad again, or alive, I might say,
if you are the George Burroughs that we knew?
By what authority, Judges of Israel! By authority
of the Strong Man who broke loose when the spirit of
the Lord was upon him! By authority of one that hath
plucked me up out of the sea, by the hair of my head,
breathed into my nostrils the breath of new life, and
endowed
me with great power
The people drew back.
You have betrayed me; I will be a hostage for you
no longer.
Betrayed you!
Yes! and ye would have betrayed me to death, if I
had not been prepared for your treachery
The man is mad, brother Sewall.
You have broken the treaty I stood pledged for; you
have not been at peace for a day. You do not keep
your faith. We do keep ours. You are churchmen...
we are savages; we I say, for you made me ashamed
years and years ago of my relationship to the white
man; years and years ago! and you are now in a fair
way to make me the mortal and perpetual foe of the
white man. The brave Iroquois are now ready for
battle
with you. War they find to be better than peace
with such as you
Who is that boy?
Ask him. Behold his beauty. Set him face to face,
if you dare, with the girl that spoke to the knife just
now.
And wherefore? said one of the jury.
Wherefore, Jacob Elliotwherefore! Stay you in
that box, and watch the boy, and hear what he has to
say, and you shall be satisfied of the wherefore.
Be quick Sir. We have no time to lose
No time to loseHow dare ye! Is there indeed
such power with you; such mighty power....and you not
afraid in the exercise of it! No time to lose!
Hereafter
,
when you are upon your death-bed, when every
moment of your life is numbered as every moment of
her
life is now....the poor creature that stands there,
what will you say if the words of that very speech ring
in your ears? Believe methere is no such hurry. It
will be time enough to-morrow, judges, a week hence or
a whole year to shed the blood of a miserable woman
for witchcraft. For witchcraft! alas for the credulity
of man! alas for the very nature of man!
Master Burroughs! murmured a
compassionate-looking
old man, reaching over to lay his hand on his arm,
as if to stop him, and shaking his head as he spoke.
Oh but I do pity you; sages though you are
continued
Burroughs, without regarding the interposition.
For witchcraft! I wonder how you are able to keep
your countenances! Do you not perceive that mother
Good, as they call her, cannot be a witch?
How so? asked the judge.
Would she abide your search, your trial, your
judgment
,
if she had power to escape?
Assuredly not brother, answered a man, who rose up
as he spoke as if ready to dispute before the people, if
permitted by the judges.... assuredly not, brother, if
she had power to escape. We agree with you there.
But we know that a period must arrive when the power
that is paid for with the soul, the power of witchcraft
and sorcery shall be withdrawn. We read of this and
we believe it; and I might say that we see the proof
now before us
Brother, I marvel at you
If the woman be unexpectedly deserted by the
Father of lies, and if we pursue our advantage now, we
may be able both to succeed with her and overthrow him,
and thereby (lowering his voice and stooping toward
Burroughs) and thereby deter a multitude more from
entering into the league of death.
Speak low.... lowermuch lower, deacon Darby,
or we shall be no match for the Father of lies: If he
should happen to overhear you, the game is up, said
another.
For shame, Elder Smith
For shame! cried Burroughs. Why rebuke his
levity
,
when if we are to put faith in what you say, ye are
preparing to over-reach the Evil One himself? You
must play a sure game, (for it
is
a game) if you hope to
convict him of treachery in a case, where according to
what you believe, his character is at stake.
Brother Burroughs!
Brother Willard!
Forbear, I beseech you.
I shall not forbear. If the woman is a witch, how do
you hope to surprise her?.... to entrap her?.... to
convict her? And if she is not a witch, how can she
hope to go free? None but a witch could escape your
toils.
Ah Sir.... Sir! O, Mr. Burroughs! cried the poor
woman. There you have spoken the truth sir; there
you have said just what I wanted to say. I knew it....
I felt it.... I knew that if I was guilty it would be
better
for me, than to be what you know me to be, and what
your dead wife knew me to be, and both of your dead
wives, for I knew them botha broken-hearted poor
old woman. God forever bless you Sir! whatever may
become of mehowever this may end, God forever
bless you, Sir!
Be of good faith Sarah. He whom you serve will be
nigh to you and deliver you.
Oh SirSirDo not talk so. They misunderstand
youthey are whispering togetherit will be the death
of me; and hereafter, it may perhaps be a trouble to
you. Speak out, I beseech you! Say to them whom it
7*
is that you mean, whom it is that I serve, and who it is
that will be nigh to me and deliver me.
Who it is, poor heart! why whom should it be but
our Father above! our Lord and our God, Sarah?
Have thou courage, and be of good cheer, and put all
thy trust in him, for he hath power to deliver thee.
I haveI doI am no longer afraid of death sir.
If they put me to death nowI do not wish to liveI
am tired and sick of life, and I have been so ever since
dear boy and his poor fatherI told them how it would
be if they went away when the moon was at the full
they were shipwrecked on the shore just underneath the
window of my chamberif they put me to death
now, I shall die satisfied, for I shall not go to my grave
now, as I thought I should before you came, without a
word or a look of pity, nor any thing to make me
comfortable
.
Judgesmay the boy speak?
Speak? speak? to be sure he may, muttered old Mr.
Wait Winthrop, addressing himself to a preacher who
sat near with a large Bible outspread upon his knees.
What say you? what say you Brother Willard, what
says the Book?no harm there, I hope; what can he
have to say though, (wiping his eyes) what
can
such a
lad have to say? What say you major Gidney; what
say you(half sobbing) dreadful affair this, dreadful
affair; what can he possibly have to say?
Not much, I am afraid, replied Burroughs, not very
much; but enough I hope and believe, to shake your
trust in the chief accuser. Robert Evelethherethis
wayshall the boy be sworn, Sir?
Swornsworn?to be surewhy not? very odd
thoughvery
very
swear the boyvery odd, I
confess
never
saw a likelier boy of his agehow old is he?
Thirteen Sir
Veryveryof his height, I should saywhat can
he know of the matter though? what can such a boy
know ofofhoweverwe shall seeis the boy sworn?
there, there
The boy stepped forth as the kind-hearted old man
too kind-hearted for a judgeconcluded his perplexing
soliloquy, one part of which was given out with a very
decided air, while another was uttered with a look of
pitiable indecisionstepped forth and lifted up his right
hand according to the law of that people, with his large
grey eyes lighted up and his fine yellow hair blowing
about his head like a glory, and swore by the Everlasting
God, the Searcher of Hearts, to speak the truth.
Every eye was riveted upon him, for he stood high
upon a sort of stage, in full view of everybody, and face
to face to all who had sworn to the spectre-knife, and
his beauty was terrible.
Stand back, stand back.... what does that child do
there? said another of the judges, pointing to a poor
little creature with a pale anxious face and very black
hair, who had crept close up to the side of Robert
Eveleth
,
and sat there with her eyes lifted to his, and her
sweet lips apart, as if she were holding her breath.
Why, what are you afeard of now, Bridgee Pope? said
another voice. Get away from the boy's feet, will you
.... why don't you move?.... do you hear me?
No.... I do not, she replied.
You do not! what did you answer me for, if you didn't
hear me?
Why.... why.... don't you see the poor little
thing's bewitched? whispered a bystander.
Very true.... very true.... let her be, therefore, let
her stay where she is.
Poor babe! she don't hear a word you say.
O, but she dooze, though, said the boy, stooping down
and smoothing her thick hair with both hands; I know
her of old, I know her better than you do; she hears
every word you say.... don't you be afeard, Bridgee
Pope;
I'm
not a goin' to be afeard of the Old Boy
himself
....
Why Robert Eveleth! was the reply.
Well, Robert Eveleth, what have you to say? asked
the chief-judge.
The boy stood up in reply, and threw back his head
with a brave air, and set his foot, and fixed his eye on
the judge, and related what he knew of the knife. He
had broken it a few days before, he said, while he and
the witness were playing together; he threw away a part
of the blade, which he saw her pick up, and when he
asked her what she wanted of it, she wouldn't say....
but he knew her well, and being jest outside o' the door
when he heard her screech, and saw her pull a piece of
the broken blade out of her flesh and hold it up to the
jury, and say how the shape of old mother Good, who
was over tother side o' the house at the time, had
stabbed
her with it, he guessed how the judge would like to
see the tother part o' the knife, and hear what he had to
say for himself, but he couldn't get near enough to speak
to nobody, and so he thought he'd run off to the
school-house
,
where he had left the handle o' the knife, an' try
to get a mouthful o' fresh air; and so.... and so....
arter he'd got the handle, sure enough, who should he
see but that are man there (pointing to Burroughs)
stavin' away on a great black horse with a clubthat
very club he had now.Whereupon, added the boy,
here's tother part o' the knife, judgeI say.... you
.... Mr. judge.... here's tother part o' the knife....
an' so he stopped me an' axed me where the plague I
was runnin to; an' so I up an' tells him all I know about
the knife, an' so, an' so, an' so, that air feller, what
dooze he do, but he jounces me up on that air plaguy
crupper and fetches me back here full split, you see, and
rides over everything, and makes everybody get out o'
the way, an'
will
make me tell the story whether or no
.... and as for the knife now, if you put them are two
pieces together, you'll see how they match.... O, you
needn't be makin' mouths at me, Anne Putnam! nor you
nyther, Marey Lewis! you are no great shakes, nyther
on you, and I ain't afeard o' nyther on you, though the
grown people be; you wont make
me
out a witch in a
hurry, I guess.
Boy.... boy.... how came you by that knife?
How came I by that knife? Ax Bridgy Pope; she
knows the knife well enough, tooI guessdon't you,
Bridgy?
I guess I do, Robert Eveleth, whispered the child, the
tears running down her cheeks, and every breath a sob.
You've seen it afore, may be?
That I have, Robert Eveleth; but I never expected to
see.... to see.... to see it again.... alive.... nor you
neither.
And why not, pray? said one of the judges.
Why not, Mr. Major! why, ye see 'tis a bit of a
keep-sake
she gin me, jest afore we started off on that are
vyage arter the goold.
The voyage when they were all cast away, sir....
after they'd fished up the gold, sir....
Ah, but the goold was safe then, Bridgy
But I knew how 'twould be Sir, said the poor girl
turning to the judge with a convulsive sob, and pushing
away the hair from her face and trying to get up, I
never
expected to see Robert Eveleth again SirI said so
toonor the knife eitherI said so before they went
away .
So she did Mr. Judge, that's a fact; she told me so
down by the beach there, just by that big tree that
grows over the top o'the new school-house thereYou
know the one I meanthat one what hangs over the
edge o'the hill just as if 'twas a-goin' to fall into the
water
she
heard poor mother Good say as much when
her Billy would go to sea whether or no, at the full o'the
moon .
Ah!
That she did, long afore we got the ship off.
Possible!
Ay, to be sure an' why not?She had a bit of a
dream ye seesuch a dream too! such a beautiful
dream you never heardabout the lumps of goold, and
the joes, and the jewels, and the women o'the sea, and
about aI say, Mr. Judge, what if you ax her to tell it
over nowI dare say she would; would'n't you
Bridgy
?
You know it all now, don't you Bridgy?
No, no Robertno, no; it's all gone out o'my head
now.
No matter for the dream, boy, said a judge who was
comparing the parts of the blade togetherno matter
for the dreamthese are undoubtedlylook here
brother
,
looklookmost undoubtedly parts of the same
blade.
Of a truth?
Of a truth, say you?
Yea verily, of a truth; pass the knife therepass the
knife. Be of good cheer woman of sorrow .
Brother! brother! .
Well brother, what's to pay now?
Perhaps it may be well brother
perhaps
I say, to
have the judgment of the whole court before we bid the
prisoner be of good cheer.
How wonderful are thy ways, O Lord! whispered
Elder Smith, as they took the parts of the blade for him
to look at.
Very true brothervery truebut who knows how
the affair may turn out after all?
Poohpooh!if you talk in that way the affair is
all up; for whatever should happen, you would
believe
it a trick of the father of liesI dare say now .
The knife speaks for itself, said a judge.
Very true brothervery true. But he who had
power
to strive with Aaron the High Priest, and power to
raise the dead before Saul, and power to work
prodigies
of old, may not lack power to do thisand more,
much more than thisfor the help of them that serve
him in our day, and for the overthrow of the righteous
.
Pooh, pooh Nathan, pooh, poohthere's no escape
for any body now; your devil-at-a-pinch were enough
to hang the best of us.
Thirteen pence for you, said the little man at the
desk.
Here a consultation was held by the judges and the
elders which continued for half the daythe incredible
issue may be told in few words. The boy, Robert
Eveleth
,
was treated with favor; the witness being a large
girl was rebuked for the lie instead of being whipped;
the preacher Burroughs from that day forth was
regarded
with unspeakable terror, and the poor old
woman
she
was put to death in due course of law.
CHAPTER VII.
Meanwhile other charges grew up, and there was a
dread everywhere throughout the whole country, a deep
fear in the hearts and a heavy mysterious fear in the
blood of men. The judges were in array against the
people, and the people against each other; and the
number
of the afflicted increased every day and every hour,
and they were sent for from all parts of the Colony.
Fasting and prayer preceded their steps, and
whithersoever
they went, witches and wizards were sure to be
discovered. A native theologian, a very pious and very
learned writer of that day, was employed by the
authorities
of New England to draw up a detailed account of
what he himself was an eye witness of; and he says of
the unhappy creatures who appeared to be bewitched, all
of whom he knew, and most of whom he saw every day
of his life, that when the fit was on, they were distorted
and convulsed in every limb, that they were pinched
black and blue by invisible fingers, that pins were stuck
into their flesh by invisible hands, that they were scalded
in their sleep as with boiling water and blistered as with
fire, that one of the afflicted was beset by a spectre with
a spindle that nobody else could see, till in her agony
she snatched it away from the shape, when it became
instantly visible to everybody in the room with a quick
flash, that another was haunted by a shape clothed in a
white sheet which none but the afflicted herself was able
to see till she tore a piece of it away, whereupon it grew
visible to others about her, (it was of this particular
story
that Sarah Good spoke just before she was turned off)
that they were pursued night and day by withered hands
little outstretched groping hands with no bodies nor
arms to them, that cups of blue fire and white smoke of
a grateful smell, were offered them to drink while they
were in bed, of which, if they tasted ever so little, as they
would sometimes in their fright and hurry, their bodies
would swell up and their flesh would grow livid, much
as if they had been bit by a rattle snake, that burning
rags were forced into their mouths or under their
armpits
,
leaving sores that no medicine would cure, that
some were branded as with a hot iron, so that very deep
marks were left upon their foreheads for life, that the
spectres generally personated such as were known to
the afflicted, and that whenever they did so, if the shape
or spectre was hurt by the afflicted, the person
represented
by the shape was sure to be hurt in the same way,
that, for example, one of the afflicted having charged a
woman of Beverly, Dorcas Hoare, with tormenting her,
and immediately afterwards, pointing to a far part of the
room, cried out, there!there! there she goes now!
a man who stood near, drew his rapier and struck at the
wall, whereupon the accuser told the court he had given
the shape a scratch over the right eye; and that Dorcas
Hoare being apprehended a few days thereafter, it was
found that she had a mark over the right eye, which
after a while she confessed had been given her by the
rapier; that if the accused threw a look at the witnesses,
the latter, though their eyes were turned another way,
would know it, and fall into a trance, out of which they
would recover only at the touch of the accused, that
oftentimes the flesh of the afflicted was bitten with a
peculiar
set of teeth corresponding precisely with the teeth
of the accused, whether few or many, large or small,
8
broken or regular, and that after a while, the afflicted
were often able to see the shapes that tormented them,
and among the rest a swarthy devil of a diminutive
stature, with fierce bright eyes, who carried a book in
which he kept urging them to write, whereby they would
have submitted themselves to the power and authority
of another Black Shape, with which, if they were to be
believed on their oaths, two or three of their number had
slept.
In reply to these reputed facts however, which appear
in the grave elaborate chronicles of the church, and are
fortified by other facts which were testified to about the
same time, in the mother country, we have the word of
George Burroughs, a minister of God, who met the
accusers
at the time, and stood up to them face to face, and
denied the truth of their charges, and braved the whole
power of them that others were so afraid of.
Man! man! away with her to the place of death!
cried he to the chief judge, on hearing a beautiful
woman
with a babe at her breast, a wife and a mother
acknowledge
that she had lain with Beelzebub. Away
with her! why do you let her live! why permit her to
profane the House of the Lord, where the righteous are
now gathered together, as ye believe? why do ye spare
the few that confesswould ye bribe them to live?
Would ye teach them to swear away the lives and
characters
of all whom they are afraid of? and thus to
preserve
their own? Look there!that is her childher
only childthe babe that you see there in the lap of that
aged womanshe has no other hope in this world,
nothing
to love, nothing to care for but that babe, the
manchild
of her beauty. Ye are fathers!look at her
streaming eyes, at her locked hands, at her pale
quivering
mouth, at her dishevelled haircan you wonder now
at anything she says to save her boyfor if she dies, he
dies? A wife and a mother! a broken-hearted wife and
a young mother accused of what, if she did not speak as
you have now made her speak, would separate her and
her baby forever and ever!
Would you have us put her to death? asked one of
the judges. You appear to argue in a strange way.
What is your motive?What your hope?What would
you have us do? suffer them to escape who will not
confess
,
and put all to death who do?
Even so.
Whyif you were in league with the Evil One
yourself
brother George, I do not well see how you could hit
upon a method more advantageous for him.
Hear meI would rather die myself, unfitted as I am
for death, die by the rope, while striving to stay the
mischief-makers
in their headlong career, than be the cause
of death to such a woman as that, pleading before you
though she be, with perjury; because of a truth she is
pleading, not so much
against
life as
for
life, not so
much against the poor old creature whom she accuses of
leading her astray, as for the babe that you see there; for
that boy and for its mother who is quite sure that if she
die, the boy will dieI say that which is true, fathers!
and yet I swear to you by the
Thirteen-pence to you, brother B. for that!
By the God of Abraham, that if her life
Thirteen-pence morefaith!
The same to yousaid the outlandishman. Sharp
work, hey?
Foolfoolif it depended upon me I say, her life and
that of her boy, I would order them both to the scaffold!
Ye are amazed at what you hear; ye look at each other
in dismay; ye wonder how it is that a mortal man hath
courage to speak as I speak. And yethear me!
Fathers of New-England, hear me! beautiful as the boy
is, and beautiful as the mother is, I would put the mark
of death upon her forehead, even though his death were
certain to follow, because if I did so, I should be sure
that a stop would be put forever to such horrible stories.
I thought so, said major GidneyI thought so, by my
troth, leaning over the seat and speaking in a whisper to
judge Saltanstall, who shook his head with a mysterious
air, and saidnothing.
Ye would save by her death, O, ye know not how much
of human life!
Brother Burroughs!
Brother Willard!what is there to shock you in what
I say? These poor people who are driven by you to
perjury, made to confess by your absurd law, will they
stop with confession? Their lives are at stakewill they
not be driven to accuse? Will they not endeavor to make
all sure?to fortify their stories by charging the
innocent
,
or those of whom they are afraid? Will they stop
where you would have them stop? Will they not rather
come to believe that which they hear, and that of which
they are afraid?to believe each other, even while they
know that what they themselves do swear is untrue?
May they not strive to anticipate each other, to show
their zeal or the sincerity of their faith?And may they
not, by and byI pray you to consider thismay they
not hereafter charge the living and the mighty as they
have hitherto charged the dead, and the poor, and the
weak?
Well
Well!
Yeswell!what more have you to say?
What more! why, if need be, much more! You drive
people to confession, I sayyou drive them to it, step
by step, as with a scourge of iron. Their lives are at
stake, I
will
say-yet more-I mean to say much more now;
now that you will provoke me to it. I say now that
youyouye judges of the land!
you
are the cause of
all that we suffer! The accused are obliged to accuse.
They have no other hope. They lieand you know it,
or should know itand you know, as well as I do, that
they have no other hope, no other chance of escape. All
that have hitherto confessed are alive now. All that
have denied your charges, all that have withstood your
mighty temptationthey are all in the graveallall
Brotherwe have read in the Scriptures of Truth,
or at least I have, that of old, a woman had power to
raise the dead. If she was upon her trial now, would
you not receive her confession? I wait your reply.
Receive it, governor Phips! nononot without
proof that she had such power.
Proofhow?
How! Ye should command her to raise the dead for
proofto raise the dead in your presence. You are
consulting together; I see that you pity me.
Nevertheless
,
I say again, that if these people are what they say
they are, they should be made to prove it by such awful
and irresistible proofah!what are ye afraid of,
judges?
We are not afraid.
Ye are afraidye areand of that wretched old
woman there!
What if we call for the proof nowwill you endure
it?
Endure it! Yeswhatever it may be. Speak to
her. Bid her do her worstI have no fearyou are
quaking with fear. I defy the Power of Darkness;
you would appear to tremble before it. And here I set
my footand here I call for the proof! Are they indeed
witches?what can be easier than to overthrow such
an adversary as I am? Why do ye look at me as if I were
madyou are prepared to see me drop down perhaps,
8*
or to cry out, or to give up the ghost? Why do ye
shake your heads at me? What have I to fear? And
why is it I beseech you, that
you
are not moved by the
evil-eye of that poor woman? Why is it, I pray you,
fathers and judges, that they alone who bear witness
against her are troubled by her look?
Brother Sewall, said one of the judges who had been
brought up to the law; Master Burroughs, I take it, is
not of counsel for the prisoner at the bar?
Assuredly not, brother.
Nor is he himself under the charge?
The remark is proper, said Burroughs. I am aware
of all you would say. I have no right perhaps to open
my mouth
No right, perhaps?no
right
brother B., said
Winthrop
no
right, we believe?butif the prosecutors
will suffer it?why, whywe have no objection, I
suppose
I
am surehave we brother G.?
None at all. What say you Mr. Attorney-general?
Say Sir! What do I say Sir! why Sir, I say Sir,
that such a thing was never heard of before! and I say
Sir, that it is against all rule Sir! If the accused
require
counsel, the court have power to assign her
suitable
counselsuch counsel to be of the law, Sir!and
being of the law Sir, he would have no right Sir, you
understand Sir,no right Sirto address the jury, Sir
as you did the other day Sirin Rex versus Good,Sir,
none at all Sir!
Indeedwhat may such counsel do then?
Do Sir! do!why Sir, he may cross-examine the
witnesses.
Really!
To be sure he may Sir! and what is more, he may
argue points of law to the court if need be.
Indeed!
Yesbut only points of law.
The court have power to grant such leave, hey?
Yes, that we have, said a judge. You may speak us
a speech now, if you will; but I would have you confine
yourself to the charge.
Here the prosecutor stood up, and saying he had
made out his case, prayed the direction of the court
No, no, excuse me, said Burroughs; no, no, you have
taught me how to proceed Sir, and I shall undertake for
the wretched woman, whatever may be thought or said
by the man of the law.
Proceed Mr. Burroughsyou are at liberty to proceed.
Well Martha, said BurroughsI am to be your
counsel
now. What have you to say for yourself?
The lawyers interchanged a sneer with each other.
Menothin' at all, Sir.
Have you nobody here to speak for you?
For me!Lord bless you, no! Nobody cares for poor
Martha.
No witnesses?
Witnesses!no indeed, but if you want witnesses,
there's a power of witnesses.
Where?
Therethere by the box there
Poor Martha! You do not understand me; the
witnesses
you see there belong to the other side.
Well, what if they do?
Have you no witnesses of your own, pray?
Of my own! Lord youthere nowdon't be cross
with me. How should poor Martha knowthey never
told me;what are they good for?
But is there nobody here acquainted with you?
And if there was, what would that prove? said a man
of the law.
My stars, no! them that know'd me know'd enough
to keep away, when they lugged me off to jail.
And so there's nobody here to say a kind word for
you, if your life depended on it?
No Sirnobody at allnobody cares for Martha.
Gracious Godwhat unspeakable simplicity!
O, I forgot Sir, I forgot! cried Martha, leaning over
the bar and clapping her hands with a cry of childish
joy. I did see neighbor Joe Trip, t'other day, and I told
him he ought to stick by me
Well where is hewhat did he say?
Why he said he'd rather not, if 'twas all the same to
me.
He'd rather notwhere does he live?
And I spoke to three more, said a bystander, but they
wouldn't come so fur, some was afeared, and some
wouldn't take the trouble.
Ah! is that you, Jeremiah?how d'ye do, how d'ye
do?all well I hope at your house?an' so they
wouldn't come, would they?I wish they would though,
for I'm tired o' stayin' here; I'd do as much for
them
Hear you that judges! They would not come to
testify
in a matter of life and death. What are their names?
where do they live?they shall be made to come.
You'll excuse me, said the prosecutor. You are the
day after the fair; it's too late now.
Too late! I appeal to the judgestoo late!would
you persuade me Sir, that it is ever too late for mercy,
while there is yet room for mercy? I speak to the
judgesI pray them to make use of their power, and
to have these people who keep away at such a time
brought hither by force.
The court have no such power, said the
Attorney-General
.
How Sir! have they not power to compel a witness
to attend?
To be sure they haveon the part of the crown.
On the part of the crown!
Yes.
And not on the part of a prisoner?
No.
No! can this be the law?
Even so, said a judge.
Well, wellpoor Martha!
What's the matter now?what ails you, Mr.
Burroughs
?
Martha
Sir!
There's no hope Martha.
Hope?
No Martha, no; there's no hope for you. They
will
have you die.
Die!me!
Yes, poor Marthayou.
Me!what for?what have I done?
O that your accusers were not rock, Martha!
Rock!
O that your judges could feel! or any that anybody
who knows you would appear and speak to your piety
and your simplicity!
Law Sirhow you talk!
Why as for that now, said Jeremiah Smith, who stood
by her, wiping his eyes and breathing very hard; here
am I, Sir, an' ready to say a good word for the poor
soul, if I die for it; fact is, you see, Mr. Judge Sewall
I've know'd poor Martha Coryhai'nt I Martha?
So you have Jerry Smith.
Ever since our Jeptha warn't more'n so high,
Stop Sir, if you please, you are not sworn yet, said
one of the judges.
Very trueswear him, added another.
You'll excuse me, said the Attorney-general. I say,
youwhat's your name?
Jerry Smith.
And you appear on the side of the prisoner at the bar,
I take it?
Well, what if I do?
Why in that case, you see, you are not to be sworn,
that's all.
Not sworn! cried Burroughs. And why not Sir?
Why we never allow the witnesses that appear against
the crown, to take the oath.
Against the crown Sir! what on earth has the crown
to do here?what have we to do with such absurdity?
Have a care, brother Burroughs!
Do you know Sirdo you know that, if this man be
not allowed to say what he has to say on oath, less
credit will be given to what he says?
Can't help that Sir.Such is the law.
Judgesjudgesdo ye hear that?
can
this be the
law? Will you give the sanction of oaths to whatever
may be said here against life?and refuse their
sanction
to whatever may be said for life? Can such be the
law?
The judges consulted together and agreed that such
was the law, the law of the mother-country and
therefore
the law of colonies.
Of a truth, said Burroughs, in reply; of a truth, I
can perceive now why it is, if a man appear to testify in
favor
of human life that he is regarded as a witness
against
the crown.God help such crowns, I say!
Brother!dear brother!
God help such crowns, I say! What an idea of
kingship
it gives! What a fearful commentary on the
guardianship
of monarchs! How much it says in a word or
two of their fatherly care! He who is
for
the subject,
even though a life be at stake, is therefore
against
the
king!
Beware of that Sir.You are on the very threshold
of treason.
Be it so.If there is no other way, I will step over
that threshold .
If you do Sir, it will be into your grave.
Sir!
Dear brother, I beseech you!
Enoughenough-I have nothing more to donothing
more to say, Sirnot another word, Sirforgive me
SirIIIthe tears of the aged I cannot bear; the
sorrow of such as are about to go before God, I am not
able, I never was able to bear. I beseech you,
however
,
to look with pity upon the poor soul therepoor
Martha!let her gray hairs plead with you, as your gray
hairs plead with meIIproceed, Mr.
Attorney-General
.
I have nothing more to say?
Nothing more to say!
With submission to the courtnothing.
Do you throw up the case then? said a judge.
Throw up the case! no indeedno!But if Mr.
Counsellor Burroughs here, who has contrived in my
humble opinion, to make the procedure of this court
appearthat is to saywith all due submission
appear
to be not much better than a laughing-stock to the
to theto my brethren of the barif Mr. Burroughs,
I say, if he has nothing more to sayI beg leave to say
that is to saythat I have nothing more to say .
Saysaysaywhispered one of his brethren of the
barwhat say you to that Mr. Burroughs?
CHAPTER VIII.
What
should
I say? replied Burroughs. What would
you have me say? standing up and growing very pale.
What would you have me say, you that are of counsel
for the prisoner, you! the judges of the court? You
that appear to rejoice when you see the last hope of the
prisoner about to be made of no value to her, by the
trick and subterfuge of the law. Why do you not speak
to her?Why do you not advise me? You know that
I depend upon the replyYou know that I have no
other hope, and that she has no other hope, and yet you
leave us both to be destroyed by the stratagem of an
adversary
.
How shall I proceed? Speak to me, I
entreat
you! Speak to me judges! Do not leave me to
grope out a path blind-folded over a precipicea path
which it would require great skill to treadO, I
beseech
you! do not leave me thus under the awful, the
tremendous accountability, which, in my ignorance of
the law, I have been desperate enough to undertake!
Here by my side are two men of the lawyet have you
assigned her, in a matter of life and death, no counsel.
They are afraid I seeafraid not only to rise up and
speak for the wretched woman, but they are afraid even
to whisper to me. And you, ye judges! are you also on
the side of the prosecutor and the witnessesare you
all for the king?all!all!not so much as one to
say a word for the poor creature, who being pursued
for
the king, is treated as if she were pursued
by
the
kingpursued by him for sacrifice! What! no
answer
not
a word! What am I to believe?....that you
take pride in the exercise of your terrible power? that
you look upon it as a privilege?....that you regard me
now with displeasure....that if you could have your own
way, you would permit no interference with your
frightful
prerogative?....O that I knew in what way to
approach
the hearts of men! O that I knew how to
proceed
in this affair! Will nobody advise me!
SirSir!allow me, said a man of the law who sat
near, allow me Sir; I can bear it no longerit is a
reproach
to the very name of lawbutbut (lowering his
voice) if you will suffer me to suggest a step or two for
your considerationyou have the courage and the
power
I
have notmy brethren here have notyou have
and you may perhaps be able tohush, hushto
bring her off.
Speak out, Sirspeak out, I beseech you. What am
I to do?
Lower if you pleaselowerlowererer
we must not be overheardBrother Trap's got a quick
ear. Now my notion isallow me(whispering) the
jury are on the watch; they have heard you with great
anxietyand great pleasureif you can manage to keep
the hold you have got for half an hourhushhushno
matter howthe poor soul may escape yet
I'll address the jury
By no manner of means! That will not be suffered
you cannot address the jury
Good God! what shall I do!
Thirteen-pence morecarry fivepaid to watchman.
I'll put you in the way (with a waggish leer.) Though
you are not allowed to address the jury, you are allowed
to address the courthey?(chucking him with his
9
elbow)the court you seeheysh!sh!you
understand
ithey?
Nohow cool you are!
Coolyou'd be cool too, if you understood the law.
Neverneverin a case of life and death.
Life and death? poheverything is a case of life and
death, Sirto a man o' the laweverythingall cases
are alike, Sirheyprovidedaa
Provided what, Sir?
Where the quid is the same.
The quid?
The quid pro quo
How can you, Sir?your levity is aI begin to be
afraid of your principleswhat am I to do?
Dojust keep the court in play; keep the judges
at work, while I run over to the shop for an authority
or two I have there which may be of use.You have the
jury with you nowlay it on thickyou understand the
play as well as I do now
Stopstopam I to say to the judges what I would
say to the jury, if I had leave?
Precisely! butbuta word in your earso as
to be heard by the jury.Tuttut
The head-prosecutor jumped up at these words, and
with a great show of zeal prayed the judges to put a
stop to the consultation, a part of which was of a
character
of
a characterthat is to say, of a character
Burroughs would have interrupted him, but he was
hindered by his crafty law-adviser, who told him to let
the worthy gentleman cut his own throat in his own
way, now he was in the humor for it.
Burroughs obeyed, and after his adversary had run
himself out of breath, arose in reply, and with a gravity
and a moderation that weighed prodigiously with the
court, called upon the chief-judge to put a stop to such
gladiatorial controversy
What would you have us do? said the judge.
I would have you do nothing more than your duty
Here the coadjutor of Burroughs, after making a sign
to him to face the jury, slid away on tip-toe.
I would have you rebuke this temper. Ye are the
judges of a great people. I would have you act, and I
would have you teach others to act, as if you and they
were playing together, in every such casenot for your
own livesthat were too much to ask of mortal man;
but for another's life. I would have you and your
officers
behave here as if the game that you play were what
you all know it to be, a game of life and deatha trial,
not of attorney with attorney, nor of judge with judge,
in the warfare of skill, or wit, or trick, or stratagem,
for fee or characterbut a trial whereby the life here,
and the life hereafter it may be, of a fellow-creature is
in issue. YeamoreI would have you teach the king's
Attorney-general, the prosecutor himself, that
representative
though he be of majesty, it would be more
dignified
and more worthy of majesty, if he could contrive to
keep his temper, when he is defeated or thwarted in his
attack on human life. We may deserve death all of us,
but we deserve not mockery; and whether we deserve
death or not, I hope we deserve, under our gracious
Lord and Master, to be put to death according to law
That'll do!that'll do!whispered the lawyer, who
had returned with his huge foliosthat'll do my boy!
looking up over his spectacles and turning a leafthat'll
do! give it to 'em as hot as they can sup itI shall be
ready for you in a crackpush on, push onwhat a
capital figure you'd make at the bardon't stopdon't
stop.
Why, what on earth can I say!
Talktalktalkno matter what you saydon't
give them time to breathepop a speech into 'em!
A speech!
Ay, or a sermon, or a whar-whoop, or a prayerany
thinganythingif you do but keep the ball upno
matter what, if the jury can hear youthey are all agog
nowthey are pricking up their ears at younow's
your time!
Very wellJudges!
Proceed.
Judges. I am a traveller from my youth up. I have
journied over Europe; I have journied over America
I am acquainted with every people of both hemispheres,
and yet, whithersoever I go, I am a stranger. I have
studied muchthought muchand am already a show
among those who watched over my youth. I am still
young, though I appear old, much younger than you
would suppose me to be, did you not know me
Here he turned to the lawyerI never shall be able to
get through this; I don't know what I am saying.
Nor ISo much the betterdon't give up
A youtha lad in comparison with with you, ye
judges, you that I now undertake to reprovea
spectacle
and a show among men. They follow me every
where, (I hope you'll soon be ready) they pursue me
day after dayand week after weekand month after
month
And year after yearby jings, that'll do!
And year after year; they and their wives, and
their little ones
And their flocks and their herds, and their
man-servants
and their maid-servants, whispered the lawyer.
Do be quiet, will you.They pursue me however, not
because of their veneration or their love, but only that
they may study the perpetual changes of my countenance
and hear the language of one to whom all changes and
all languages are alike, and all beneath regard. They
follow me too, not because they are able to interpret
the look of my eyes, or to understand the meaning of my
voice, but chiefly because they hear that I have been
abroad in the furthermost countries of all the earth,
because they are told by grave men, who eatch their
breath when they speak of me, though it be in the House
of the Lord, as you have seen this very day, that I have
been familiar with mysterious trial and savage
adventure
,
up from the hour of my birth, when I was dropped
in the wilderness like the young of the wild-beast, by
my own mother
I sayBrother B.I say thoughwhispered the
lawyer
,
in much perplexityI say thoughwhat are you
at now?
You
are not on trialare you?
Yesyeslet me alone, I beseech you....
Fire away....fire away....you've got possession of the
jury, and that's half the battle....fire away.
Peace....peace, I pray you....Judges! whenever I go
abroad....wherever I go....the first place into which I set
my foot, is the tribunal of death. Go where I may, I go
first in search of the courts....the courts of
justice
, I
should say, to distinguish them from all other courts
Good!
And I go thither because I have an idea that
nations
are to be compared with nations, not in every
thingnot altogether, but only in a few things; and
because
after much thought, I have persuaded myself that
matters of religion, politics and morals, are inadequate
for the chief purposes of such comparisonthe
comparison
of people with people, though not for the
comparison
of individual with individual perhaps; and that a
variety of matters which regard the administration of
law, in cases affecting either life or liberty, are in their
9*
very nature adequate, and may be conclusive. We may
compare court with court and law with law; but how
shall we compare opinion with opinion, where there is
no unchangeable record of either? goodness with
goodness
where
goodness itself may be but a thing of
opinion
or hearsay, incapable of proof, and therefore
incapable
of comparison?
Very fairvery fairbut what on earth has it to do
with our case?
Wait and you shall see; I begin to see my way clear
nowwherefore judges, I hold that the liberty of a
people
and therefore the greatness of a people may be
safely
estimated by the degree of seriousness with which a
criminal is arraigned, or tried, or judged, or punished.
Very trueand very well spun out, brother B....
but a non sequitur nevertheless. That wherefore, with
which you began the period was a bit of a
Pray
pray
don't interrupt me; you will be
overheard
you
will put me out.In a word, ye Judges
of Israel! I have had a notion that arbitrary power
would betray itself in every case, and every-where on
earth, by its mode of dealing wlth liberty and life
being
,
I persuade myself, more and more summary and
careless, in proportion as it is more and more absolute
of a truth, not as it is more and more obsolute by
character
.
You had for a time, while the northern savages
were at your door, a downright military government.
You know therefore that my words are true. Your
government
was called freeto have called it arbitrary,
would have offended you; yet for a season you dealt
with human life as the Turk would. You know, for
you have seen the proof, that in proportion to the growth
of power in those who bear sway among you, the
forms and ceremonies which fortify and hedge in, as it
were, the life and liberty of the subject, are either
disregarded
or trampled on.
Oh ho!I see what you are driving at now!
For my own part, I love to see the foreheads of
them who are appointed to sit in the high-places and
give judgment forever upon the property or character,
life or liberty of their fellow man.
Property or characterlife or libertyof a fellow
man! Very fairvery fair indeed.
Expressive at least of decent sorrow, if not of
profound
awe. I would have them look as if they were
afraidas if they trembled under the weight of their
tremendous authority; as if they were deeply and
clearly
and reverentially sensible of what they have
undertaken
to dowhich is, to deal with the creatures of God,
as God himself professes to deal with themaccording
to their transgressionsto do a part of his duty with his
own Imageto shelter the oppressed and to stay the
oppressor
,
not only now and for a time, but hereafter and
forever
Don't stop to breathe now; I shall be at your back in
a jiffy
I would that every man who has to do with the
administration
of law, wherever that law is to touch the
life or liberty of another; and whoever he may be, from
the highest judge in the highest court of all the earth,
down to the humblest ministerial officerI would that
he should feel, or at least appear to feel, that for a time
he is the delegate of JehovahI do not stop to say how,
nor to ask why. That is for others to say.I would
have the judges remarkable for their gravity, not for
their austerity; for their seriousness and for their severe
simplicity, not for a theatrical carriage. I would have
the bar, as you call it, above the trick and subterfuge of
the lawincapable of doing what I see them do every
day of my life; and I would have the bench as you call
it, incapable of suffering what I see them not only suffer,
but take pleasure in, every day of my lifeare you
ready?
Perseverepersevereyou may say what you please
now, said the lawyer, shuffling his papers about with
both hands, chuckling in his sleeve, and whispering
without
appearing to whisper.Have your own way now....
they like to hear the lawyers and the judges, and the law
cut up; it's a new thing to hear in such a place....fire
away, fire away....you see how they enjoy it....you've got
us on the hip now....fire away.
If a criminal be arraigned on a charge that may affect
his life or character, limb or property, or if a witness be
to be sworn, or the oath administered,...I care not how
....I care not why....if you will have oaths....ye should
order silence to be proclaimed by the sound of trumpet.
Pho! pho!
I would have a great bell, one so large that it might
be heard far and wide over the whole townI would
have this tolled on the day of condemnation, if that
condemnation
were to death. And if it must beif you
will have it soif you will that a man be put to death
by the rope or the axe, on the scaffold or over an open
graveas the poor soldier diesI would have him
perish
at nightin the dead of midnightand all the town
should wake up at the tolling of that heavy bell, or at
the roar of cannon, with a knowledge that a
fellow-creature
had that instant passed away from the earth forever
just gonethat very instantbefore the Everlasting
Judge of the quick and the deadthat while they were
holding their breath and before they could breathe again
he would receive the sentence from which there would
be no appeal throughout all the countless ages of eternity.
Very fairvery fairI see the foreman of the jury
shudderkeep him to it
I love theory, but I love practice better
Zounds! what a plunge!
Bear with me, I beseech you. I had come to a
conclusion years and years ago, before I went away
into
the far parts of the earth, Judges and Elders, that
where human life is thought much of, there liberty is;
and that just in proportion to the value of human life
are the number and variety, the greatness and the
strength of the safe-guards forms and ceremonies, which
go to make it secure, if not altogether inaccessible.
Very fairstick to the foremankeep your eye on
his facedon't take it off, and you'll be sure of the jury.
I can hardly see his face now
So much the betterwe'll have candles for them yet;
and if we do, my boy, the game is our own....fire away;
my authorities are almost ready nowfire away.
I journeyed the world over, but I found little to
prove that human life was of much value anywhere
anywhere I should say, except among the barbarians
and the savages. My heart was troubled with fear. I
knew not whither to go, nor where to look. Should I
pursue my way further into the cities of Europe, or go
back into the wilderness of America?At last I heard
of a nationbear with me judgeswhere all men were
supposed by the law to be innocent, until they were
proved
to be guilty, where the very judges were said to
demnation of counsel for the accused, where the verdict of at
least twelve, and in some cases of twenty-four men
their unanimous verdict too, was required for the
condemnation
of such accused; where if a man where
charged with a crime, he was not even permitted to
accuse
himself or to acknowledge the truth, till he had
been put upon his guard by the judgeswho would
even allow him, nay press him to withdraw an avowal,
though it were made by him with serious deliberation;
where the laws were so tender of human life to say all
in a word, and so remarkable for humanity as to be a
perpetual theme for declamation. I heard all this....I
had much reason to believe it....for everybody that I
knew believed it....I grew instantly weary of home....
Lights there! lights....
I could not sleep for the desire I had to see that
country.
You'd better stop awhile, Mr. Burroughs,
whispered
the lawyer.
And I lost no time in going to it.
Pull up where you are....but keep your face toward
the jury.
CHAPTER IX.
Well, continued Burroughs, I departed for the shores
of that other world, where human life was guarded with
such care and jealousy. I inquired for the courts of
justice and for the halls of legislation....I hurried thither;
....I elbowed my way up to the sources of their law, and
I had the mortification to discover that in almost every
case, their courts were contrived, not as I had hoped
from the character of the people, so as to give the
public
an opportunity of seeing the operation of power at
work in the high-places of our earth, for the detection
of guilt and for the security of virtue, but so as to hinder
that operation, whether evil or good, from being viewed
by the public. Everywhere the courts of justice were
paltry....everywhere inconvenient. Seeing this I grew
afraid for the people. I found but one large enough to
accommodate its own officers, and but one which it was
possible for a stranger to enter, even by the aid of money,
without much delay, difficulty and hazard. Ye do not
believe meye cannot believe that such things are, such
courts or such men, or that ever a price hath been fixed
in a proud free country, for which a few and but a few
of a mighty and wise people may see, now and then,
wherefore it is that some one of their number is to be
swept away from the earth forever. What I say is true.
To the Halls of Legislation I proceededto the place
where that law is made of which I have had occasion to
speak this day. I went without my dinner; I paid my
last half-crown to see the makers of the lawand I
came away, after seeingnot the makers of the law, but
the door-keepers of their cageit is true that while I
was there, I was happy enough to see a man, who was
looking at another man, which other man declared that
the wig of the Speaker was distinctly visible
Are you mad?
Be quiet Sir
You have broken the spellthe jury are beginning
to laugh
Leave the jury to mewhat I have to say Sir, may
provoke a smile, but if I do not much mistake, a smile for
the advantage of poor Martha. We have been too
serious
....we
may do better by showing that we have no fear
---if the lawgivers of that country
are
what I say they
are---if the judges are what I say they are, and what I
shall prove them to be---and if the people of that
country
are what I am afraid they are, under such law---why
should we bow to its authority?
Phophopho....You are all at sea now.
Well Judges....I enquired when there would be a trial
to prove the truth of what I had been told, and whither
I should go in search of a Temple of Justice, where I
might see for myself how human life was regarded by the
brave and the free. I found such a temple, and for the
price of another dinner, was carried up into a gallery
and put behind a huge pile of masonry, which as it
stood for a pillar and happened to be neither perforated
nor transparent, gave me but a dreary prospect for my
money....Do not smiledo not, I beseech youI never
was more serious in my life....At last I heard a man
called
up, heard I say, for I could not see him, called up
and charged with I know not what fearful crimeI
caught my breathare you ready Sir?....
Almost....almost....fire awaywriting as fast as he
10
could make the pen fly over the paper....fire away for a
few minutes more....
I caught my breath....I trembled with anxiety....Now
said I to myself, (To the lawyer; I am afraid I shall drop.)
No no, don't drop yet....fire away!
Now, said I to myself, I shall see one of the most
awful and affecting sights in the world. Now shall I
see the great humanity of the law....the law of this
proud nation illustrated.....the very judges becoming
of counsel for the prisoner....and the whole affair
carried
through with unspeakable solemnity. I addressed
myself to a man who stood near me with a badge of
authority
in his hand....the very key wherewith he
admitted
people at so much a head, to see the performance.
Pray, Sir, said I, what is that poor fellow charged with?
He didn't know, not he, some case of murder though,
he thought, (offering me a pinch of snuff as he spoke) or
of highway-robbery, or something of the sort....he would
enquire with great pleasure and let me know. The case
opened. A speech was made by a prosecutor for the
crown, a ready and a powerful speaker. The charge
a capital one. The accused....a poor emaciated
miserable
creature, was on trial for having had in
possession
,
property which had been stolen out of a
dwelling-house
in the dead of night. Well, prisoner at the bar,
what have you to say for yourself? said the judge with
a stern look, after the case had been gone through with
by the prosecutor. Now is your time....speak, said the
judge. I have nothing to say for myself, said the poor
prisoner; nothing more than what I have said four or
five times already. Have you no witnesses? No my
lord
Soh soh, Mr. Burroughs! We understand your
parable
now, cried one of the judges with a look of dismay.
We all know what country that is where a judge is a
lord....have a care Sir; have a care.....Be wary....you
may rue this if you are not.
I shall endure the risk whatever it be....shall I
proceed
?
We have no power to stop you....
No my lord, was the reply of the prisoner. I could
not oblige them to appear; and they would not appear.
How came you by the property? said his lordship. It
was left with me by a man who stopped at my house;
he wanted a little money to carry him to see a sick wife
....and as I did not know him, he left this property in
pledge. Who was that man? I do not know my lord,
I never saw him before....but one of my neighbors in the
same trade with me knew him, and if you had him here,
he would say so.
Judges, you have now heard my story. You know
what I was prepared to see; you know what I expected.
Here was a man who, for aught we know, told the truth.
But he had no witnesseshe had no power to make
them testifyhe had no refugeno hopethe law was
a snare to himthe law of our mother-country.
How so pray?
Property being found in his possessionproperty
which had been stolen, he was to suffer, becausemark
what I say, I beseech you
because he could not prove his
innocence!
Tuttuttutrigmarole! said the prosecutor.
Rigmarole Sirwhat I say is the simple truth. Hear
me through. The moment that poor fellow was found
with the property in his possession, he was concluded
by the law and by the judges of the law to be guilty;
and they called upon him to
prove
that he was
not
guilty
Nature of things, my good brother
Welland if it is the nature of things, why deny the
existence of the fact? Why do you, as all men of the
law have done for ages and still dowhy say over and
over again every day of your lives, that it is the
characteristic
of the law, that law of which you are the
expounders
,
to regard every man as innocent, until he be
proved
to be guilty? Why not say the truth? Why
quibble
with rhetoric? Why not say that where a man is
charged with a crime, you are, in the very nature of
things, under the necessity of taking that for proof
which is not proof? Look you Sirhow came you by
the coat you wear? Suppose I were to challenge that
cloth and put you to the proof, how could you prove that
you purchased it fairly of a fair trader?
I would appeal to the trader
Appeal to the trader! If he had not come honestly
by it Sir, would be ever acknowledge that you had it of
him? or that he had ever seen your face before?
Well thenI would prove it by somebody else.
By somebody else, would you! Are you so very
cautious
do
you never go abroad without having a witness
at your heels? do you never pick up anything in the
street Sir, without first assuring yourself that you are
observed by somebody of good character, who will
appear
of his own accord in your behalf, should you be
arraigned for having stolen property in your possession?
What would you have to say for yourself?your oath
would not be receivedand if it was, there would only
be oath against oathyour oath against that of the trader
of whom you purchased, or the individual of whom you
received the propertyand his oath against yours.How
would you behave with no witnesses to help you out?
or with witnesses who would not appear and could not
be made to appear on your side, though your life were
at stake?nay, for that very reason, for if your property
only were at stake, they might be made to appear
Very well!
Or with witnesses, who having appeared on your
side, are not allowed to make oath to what they say
lest they may be believedto the prejudice of our good
king?
Really, cried one of the judges, really, gentlemen,
you appear to be going very wide of the mark. What
have we to do with your snip-snap and gossip? Are we
to have nothing but speech after speechabout nobody
knows whatnow smacking of outragenow of
treason
?
Are we to stay here all night Sirs of the bar,
while you are whispering together?
With submission to the court, said the
Attorney-general
we
have a case put here, which would seem to
require a word of reply. We are asked what we should
do if we were without witnessesand the court will
perceive that the sympathy of the jury is relied onis
relied on, I say!on the authority of a caseof a case
which!of a case which I never heard of before! The
court will please to observeto observe I say!that the
prisoner at the barat the barhas no witnessesin
which case, I would ask, where is the hardshipwhere
we cannot prove our innocenceour innocence I say!
of a particular, chargewe have only to prove our
character
.
Here the Attorney-general sat down with a smile and
a bow, and a magnificent shake of the head.
Only to prove our character, hey?
To be sure
But howif we have no witnesses
Very fairvery fair, brother B.
What if you were a stranger?what if you had no
character?or a bad one?
It would go hard with me, I dare sayandand
10*
(raising his voice and appealing to the bar with a
triumphant
look) and it
should
go hard with me.
Why then Sirit would go hard with every stranger
in a strange country, for he has no character; and it
would go hard with every man who might be unable to
produce proof, though he had a good character; and
with every man who might be regarded as a profligate
or a suspicious characteras a cheat, or a jew, or a
misbeliever
.
And what have such men to complain of?
JudgesFathersI appeal to you. I have not
much more to say, and what I have to say shall be said
with a view to the case before you. I have always
understood
that if a man be charged with a crime here, he
is to be tried for that particular crime with which he is
charged, and for no other till that be disposed of. I
have always understood moreover, not only in your
courts of law and by your books of law, but by the
courts and by the books of which you are but a copy,
that character is not to be put in issue as a crime
before
you; and that nobody is to be put to death or
punished
merely because he may happen to have no
character
at allnor because he may have a bad one
You have understood no more than is true, said a
judge.
If so....allow me to ask why you and other judges are
in the habit of punishing people of a bad character....
nay of putting such people to death....for doing that
which, if it were done by people of good character, you
would overlook or forgive?
How Sir....Do you pretend that we ever do such
things?
I do....Will you say that you do not?....
Yes....and waive the authority of a judge, and the
irregularity
of your proceedure that you may reply.
Then....if what I hear is true....if it is law I mean....
the judges before me will not regard character?
Why as to
regarding
character....that's another affair
Mr. Burroughs....
I implore you.....take one side or the other! Say
whether you do or do not regard character....I care not
for the degree, nor do I care which side you take. For if
you say that you do, then I say that you act in the teeth
of all your professions; for you declare in every shape,
every man of you, every day of your lives, that nobody
shall be punished by law but for that which he has been
charged with in due course of law....technically charged
with and apprised of....and you never charge a man
with having a bad character....
Well, then....suppose we say that we do
not
regard
character?
When character is not in issue, brother, added the
chief-judge; for it may be put in issue by the traverser
in which case we are bound to weigh the proof on both
sides along with the jury.
If you say that, in your character of judge....and if you
are all agreed in saying that....Lo, I am prepared for
you.
We are agreedwe perceive the truth now.
Lo, my answer!You have heard the whole of our
case. You have heard all the witnesses for the crown;
you have gathered all the proof. Now....bear with me,
judges....bear with me....what I say is a matter of life and
death....we have no witnesses....we have not put the
character
of Martha in issue....all that you know of her, you
know from your witnesses, and they have not said a
syllable
touching her character. Now.....fathers! and
judges!....I ask you if that proof, take it altogether,
would be enough in your estimation, to prove....I beg
you to hear me....would it be enough to convict any one
of your number, if he had no witness to speak for him?
..... Ye are astounded! Ye know not how to reply, nor
how to escape; for ye know in your own souls that such
proof....such proof and no more, would not be enough
to convict any one of you in the opinion of the other six.
Well Sirwhat then?
Why then Sir....then ye Judgesif that poor old
woman
before youif she be not on trial for character
on trial for that which has not been charged to her....
by what you have now said, she is free. Stand up,
on your feet Martha! stand up and rejoice! By what
ye have now said, ye judges, that poor old woman hath
leave to go free!
The judges were mute with surprise, and the lawyer
started upon his feet and clapped Burroughs on the
back, and stood rubbing his hands at the
Attorney-general
and making mouths at the juryCapital!....
Capital
!....never
saw the like, faithnever, never....never
thought of such a view myself....but I say though (in a
whisper) you did begin to put her character in issue
tuttutyes you did, you rogue you....say nothin'
tuttut
Say nothing Sir!excuse me. If I have said that
which is not true, I shall unsay it
Pooh, pooh....your argument's all the same, and
besides
,
you did not go far enough to make Jerry Smith
your witness....pooh, poohwhat a fool you are
But the judges recovered their self-possession, and
laid their heads together and asked Burroughs if he had
anything more to say.
More to sayyesmuch moreenough to keep you
employed for the rest of your lives, ye hard-hearted
inaccessible
men! Whatare ye so bent upon mischief!
Will ye not suffer that aged woman to escape the snare!
Ye carry me back all at once to the spot of which I
spoke. Ye drive me to the parable again. I saw the
judges behave to their prisoner as I now see you behave
to yours; and I would have cried out there as I do here,
with a loud voice....Are ye indeed the counsel for the
prisoner!Why do ye not behave as other counsel do?
But when I looked up and beheld their faces, and about
me, and beheld the faces of the multitude, my courage
was goneI had no hopemy heart died away within
me. They were as mute as you areand their look was
your looka look of death. But where, said I, is the
advocate for the prisoner? why does he not appear?
He has none, was the reply. What, no advocate, no
helpthere is a provision of your law which enables
the very pauper to sue....I have heard so, and surely he
is not so very poor, the man I see at the bar; why do
not the counsel that I see there unoccupiedwhy do
they not offer to help him? They are not paid Sir.
Do they require pay before they will put forth a hand to
save a fellow-creature from death? Of course. But
why do not the court assign counsel to him?The
reply
there was the reply that you have heard here this
day. The accused have no counsel in a matter of life
and death....it is only by courtesy that counsel are
permitted
even to address the court on a point of law, when
they are employed by a prisoner.
But why do I urge all this? Are not we, and were
not they, living in a land of mercy, a land remarkable
for the humanity of her laws? Do not mistake me,
fathers! I would not that the guilty should escape....I
have no such desire. But I would have the innocent
safe, and I would have the guilty, yea the guiltiest in
every case and everywhere, punished according to law.
To know that a man has committed murder is not
enough to justify you in taking his lifeto see him do
the deed with your own eyes, would not be enough to
justify you in putting him to deathwherefore it is that
however certain the guilt of the accused, and however
great his crime, he should have counsel....
Absurd!
Yeacounsel, judgecounsel!
You would allow the guilty every possible chance of
escape.
Even so, judge! every possible chance of escape.
For the guilty have some rights to guardrights the
more precious for being so few, and for being in
perpetual
risk of outrage; the more to be guarded Sir,
because
they are the rights and the privileges of the
wicked
,
who have nothing to hope from the public sympathy,
no hope of pity, no hope of charity. Even so, Judge!
for the innocent are liable to appear otherwise. Even
sofor till the trial lie over, how do we know who is
guilty and who not? How do we knowhow is it
possible
for us to know, till the accused have undergone
their trial, whether they are, or are not unjustly
charged
?
For the innocent as well as for the guilty therefore,
would I have counsel for the accusedyea, counsel,
whatever were the charge, and however probable it
might appearnay the more, in proportion both to the
probability and to the magnitude of the charge.
A fine theory that Sir. You have been abroad to
much purpose, it would appear.
Even so judgeeven so. Such
is
my theory, and I
have
been abroad, I believe, to much purpose; for if
men are to die by the law, I would have them appear to
die by the law. By the law, judgenot by popular
caprice
,
popular indignation or arbitrary power. I would
leave no ground for sorrow, none for self-reproach, none
for misgiving, either to the public or to that portion of
the public who have participated more immediately in
the awful business of death. I would have no such case
on record as that of Mary Dyer....I would have no
Elizabeth Hutchinson offered upno such trials, no
such graves, no such names for the people to be afraid
of and sorry for, ages and ages after the death of a
miserable
infatuated womana prophetess or a witch,
forsooth
George Burroughs!
A prophetess or a witch I say!after she has been
put to death no man is able to say wherefore.
George Burroughs!
Who speaks?
George Burroughs, beware! cried a female who stood
in a dark part of the house, with her head muffled up
a deep shadow was about her and a stillness like death.
I know that voicebe of good cheerI have nearly
done, though not being used to unprepared
public-speaking
,
I have said little that I meant to say, and much
that I did not mean to say; hardly a word however
even of that which I have said or meant to say, as I
would say it, or as I could say it, if I had a little more
experienceor as I could say it now on paper. And if
I feel thisIwho have grown up to a habit if not of
speaking, at least of reading before a multitude; I, who
have been used from my youth up to arrange my
thoughts for the public eye, to argue and to persuade;
what must another, taken by surprise, wholly without
such practice and power, what must heor sheor
that poor woman at the bar feel, where you put her into
my place, and urge her to defend herself to a jury?
Pity her....I implore you....consider what I say and
have mercy upon her!
Before you sit down, brother B....what if you give us
a word or two of the parallel you begun?I see the drift
of it nowa word or two, you understand metake a
mouthful o'waterand if you could manage to slip in a
remark or two about the nature of the proof required in
witchcraft, I'll be after you in a crack, and we'll tire em
out, if we can't do anything better.
I willbe prepared thoughfor I shall say
but
a word
or twoI am weary; sick and weary of thismy throat
is parched, and my very soul in a maze of perplexity.
So much the betterthey can't follow you on t'other
side.
Well, fathers! I pursued the inquiry. I found that
even there, no prisoner could have a compulsory process
to bring a witness
for
him into court, although such
process
could be had, backed by the whole power of the
country, to bring a witness
against
him. And I
discovered
also, that if a witness for the accused were so
obliging as to appear, they would not suffer him to speak
on oath. I turned to the officerI take it, Sir, said I,
that in such a case, you have no punishment for untruth,
and of course, that the witnesses for the wretched man
at the bar are not so likely to be believed as the
witnesses
against him....the latter being on oath?....Precisely.
But is he a lawyer? said I....Who! the prisoner at the
bar....Yes....A lawyerno. Is he accustomed to
public
speaking? He....no, indeed!....Nor to close
argument
,
perhaps? nor to a habit of arranging his ideas on
paper?....I dare say not, was the reply. It would be no
easy matter for a man to preserve his selfpossession....
so at least I should suppose, however much he might be
accustomed to public speaking....if he were on trial
himself, and obliged to defend himself?
There's an authority for you in the books, brother B.
The man who appeareth for himself, (in a loud voice)
for himself, saith my lord.....Coke, hath a fool for his
client....
Saith Lord Coke, hey?
Pooh, pooh, (in a whisper) pooh, pooh; never mind
who says it; give it for his, and let them show the
contrary
,
if they are able.
But if it be a case of life and deathwhere great
coolness
and great precision were needed at every step, he
would be yet more embarrassed? No doubt. And is
not the prosecutor a very able man? Very, Sirvery.
Chosen for that office, out of a multitude of superior men
altogether on account of his ability? Very true, Sir
very trueon account of his ability and experience at
the bar. And yet, Sir, said Iif I understand you, that
poor fellow there, who is now in such grievious
trepidation
,
so weak that he can hardly standhis color coming
and going with every breath, his throat and mouth and
lips dry with excessive anxiety, his head inclined as if
with a continual ringing in his earsif I understand you,
said I, he is now called up to defend himself, to make
speech for speech before a jury, against one of your
most able and eloquent speakers; a man whose
reputation
is at stake on the issuea man whoif he be
thawarted in his way, by a witness, or a fact, or a speech,
or a point of law, will appear to regard the escape of
the prisoner, whatever he may be charged with, and
whether he be innocent or guilty, as nothing better than
a reproach to the law, and high treason to the statea
man, to say all in a word, who dares to behave in a court
of justicein a matter of life and death tooas if the
escape of a prisoner were disloyalty to the kingour
father! and a disgrace to the king's Attorney-general
Will you have done, Sir?
No....no....no!....
You have no power to stop me
. The
jury could not agree. Two of their number were
unwilling
to find the accused guilty. They were sent back
it was in the dead of winter, and they were allowed
neither food, nor fireand so, after a while they were
starved and frozen into unanimity
11
Grant me patience! what would you have, Sir?you
appear to be satisfied with nothingI believe in my soul,
George Burroughs, that you are no better than a
Reformer
A shudder ran through the whole court.
Here was a pretty illustration of what I had been told
by you, and by such as you, and of what I believed
before
I went abroad, about the humanity of the lawthe
humanity of British law! of that very law that ye are
now seeking to administer here, in this remote corner
of the earth. Ye are amazedye do not believe me
and yet every word I have spoken is true; and that
which is law there, ye would make law here. The
judges, we are told, are of counsel for the prisoner
God preserve me from such counsel, I say!.....
Five and one are sixsix-and-sixpence, muttered a
voice.
They never interfered while I was there, in favor of
the prisoner; but they did interfere two or three times,
and with great acuteness too, for it was a trial of wit
among three, to his disadvantage, even as ye have this
day. The accused are held to be innocent there, even
as they are here, till they are proved to be guiltyso
say the lawyers there, and so say the judges, and so say
all the writers on the law, and so they believe, I dare say.
And yet....there as here, the man who happens to be
suspected of a crime is held to be....not innocent of the
charge, but guilty, and is called upon to
prove his
innocence
;
which if he fail to do, judgment follows, and after
two or three days, it may be, death. He had no
counsel
permitted to him where his life was at stake, though
he might have had the best in the whole empire in a
civil case affecting property to the value of a few pounds.
He had no power to bring witnesses....the law would not
allow him witnesses therefore....and if they appeared in
spite of the law, that law put a disqualification upon
whatever they said in favor of the prisoner. And after all
this....O the humanity of the law!....the jury, a part of
whom believed him to be innocent were starved into
finding him guilty. What was I to think of all this?
what of British lawthat very law by authority whereof,
ye are now trying that woman for her lifewhat of the
Here Burroughs dropped into a chair completely out
of breath.
Have you done Sir? said the chief judge.
He signified by a motion of the head that he must
give up.
Very well SirYou cannot say that we have not
heard you patiently; nor that we have hurried the case
of the prisoners at the bar, whatever else you may think
proper to say. You have had such liberty as we never
granted before, as we shall never grant again; you have
had full swing Sirfull swing, and would have been
stopped a good hour ago but for the deplorable situation of
the accused. To tell you the plain truth howeverI did
hopeI did hope I say, that we should hear something
something
to the purpose, before you gave the matter up
Something to the purpose, judge!Have a careyou
know me
Silence!
JudgejudgeI have said more than you six will
ever be able to answer, though you keep your heads
together
to all eternityHow can you answer what I say?
Howin five words....
In five words!
I ask no more to satisfy all that hear memy
brethren
of the bench, the bar, and the peoplebut five
words, I tell you.
And what are they, I do beseech you?....
Thewisdomofourancestors
.
CHAPTER X.
Here the lawyer started up, and after prevailing upon
Burroughs to forbear and be still, argued (with his face
to the jury) five or six points of law, as he called them,
every one of which had been argued over and over again
at every trial of a serious charge that he had ever been
occupied with in the whole course of a long life at the
bar....four being about the propriety of capital
punishments
in general, and two about the propriety of capital
punishments in the particular case of the prisoner at the
barwhom he protested before God (for which he had
to pay thirteen-pence more) he believed to be innocent
of the chargeand what was that charge?nothing
more nor less than the charge of socrcery and witchcraft!
a crime, the very possibility of which, he proceeded to
deny, in the very language he had used about a
twelvemonth
before, while arguing about the impossibility of
marriage in a particular case.
Brotherbrotherwe do not sit here to try the
possibility
of such a thing as witchcraftplease to consider
where you are, and what we are.
Speech after speech followed; and it was near
midnight
,
when the chief judge, after consulting with his
brethren, proceeded to address the jury.
Ye have heard much that in our opinion does not need
a reply, said he, after taking a general view of the case,
with much that a brief reply may be sufficient for, and a
very little, which, as it may serve to perplex you, if we
pass it over without notice, we shall say a few words
upon, though it has little or nothing to do with the case
before you.
The law you have nothing to do with....right or wrong,
wise or foolish, you have nothing to do with the law.
So too....whatever may be the practice abroad or in this
country, and whatever may be the hardship of that
practice
,
you have nothing to do with it. One is the
business
of the legislature....of the law-makers; the other
the business of the courts, and the judges....the
law-expounders
.
You are to try a particular case by a
particular
law; to that, your whole attention is to be directed.
If the law be a bad law, that is neither your business nor
our business. We and you are to do our duty, and leave
theirs to the sovereign legislature.
I propose now to recapitulate the evidence, which I
have taken notes ofshould I be wrong, you will
correct
me. After I have gone through with the evidence,
I shall offer a few brief remarks in reply to the
arguments
which have been crowded into the caseI will
not say for showand which, idle as they are, would
seem to have had weight with you.
The afflicted, you observe, do generally testify that the
shape of the prisoner doth oftentimes pinch them, choke
them, and otherwise afflict them, urging them always to
write in a book she bears about with her. And you
observe
too, that the accusers were struck down with a fit
before you, and could not rise up till she was ordered to
touch them, and that several of their number have had
fits whenever she looked upon them.
But we are to be more particular, and I shall now
read my notes, and I pray you to follow me.
I. Deliverance Hobbs, who confessed herself a witch,
testified that the prisoner tempted her to sign the book
again, and to deny what she had confessed; and that
11*
the shape of the prisoner whipped her with iron rods to
force her to do so, and that the prisoner was at a
general
meeting of witches at a field near Salem village, and
there partook of the sacrament with them.
2. John Cook testified that about five or six years ago,
he was assaulted with the shape of the prisoner in his
chamber, and so terrified that an apple he had in his
hand flew strangely from him into his mother's lap, six
or eight feet distance.
3. Samuel Gray testified that about fourteen years ago,
he waked one night and saw his room full of light and a
woman between the cradle and bed-side; he got up but
found the doors fast, and the apparition vanished
however
the child was so frighted, that it pined away and in
some time died. He confessed that he had never seen
the prisoner before, but was now satisfied that it was her
apparition.
4. John Bly and his wife testified that he bought a
sow of the prisoner's husband, but being to pay the
money to another, she was so angry that she quarrelled
with Bly, and soon after the sow was taken with strange
fits, jumping, leaping and knocking her head against
the fence which made the witnesses conclude the
prisoner
had bewitched it.
5. Richard Coman testified that eight years ago, he
was terrified with the spectre of the prisoner and
others
,
who so oppressed him in his bed that he could not
stir hand nor foot, but calling up somebody to come to
his assistance, as soon as the people of the house spoke,
the spectre vanished and all was quiet.
6. Samuel Shattock testified that in 1680 (twelve
years before the trial) the prisoner often came to his
house on frivolous errands, soon after which his child
was taken with strange fits, and at last lost his
understanding
;
the fits were manifestly epileptic, but the
witness verily believed it was bewitched by the prisoner.
7. John Londor testified that upon some little
controversy
with the prisoner about her fowls, going well to
bed, he awoke in the night and saw the likeness of this
woman greviously oppressing him. Another time he
was troubled with a black pig, but going to kick it, it
vanished. Another time as he was sitting in his room,
a black hobgobling jumped in the room, which spoke
to him these wordsI understand you are troubled in
mind: Be ruled by me and you shall want nothing in
this world. But when he endeavored to strike it, there
was nothing. After this he ran out of his house and
saw the prisoner in her orchard, but had no power to
speak to her, but concluded his trouble was all owing
to her.
8. William Stacy testified that the spectre of the
prisoner had played him several pranks of the same
nature as the former; for examplehaving received
some money of the prisoner for work, he had not gone
above three rods from her when it was gone from him;
some time after, discoursing with the prisoner about
grinding her grist, he had not gone above six rods from
her with a small load in his cart, before the off-wheel
sunk into a hole in plain ground, so that the deponent
was forced to get help for the recovery of it, but
stepping
back to look for the hole, there was none to be
found. Another time, as he was going home on a dark
night, he was lifted up from the ground and thrown
against the stone wall, and after that, he was hoisted up,
and thrown down a bank at the end of his house.
9. John and William Bly testified that being
employed
by the prisoner to take down her cellar-wall, they
found several poppets made of rags and hog's bristles,
with headless pins in them, the points being outwards.
In addition to all this, continued the chief-judge, you
have the testimony of Mr. Park, the magistrate, who
says that when her Paris's daughter and two other
children
accused the prisoner at the bar of afflicting them,
by biting, pricking, strangling, &c. saying that they
saw her likeness in their fits, coming toward them and
bringing them a book to sign, he asked her why she
afflicted
those poor childrento which she replied that
she did not; and that when he asked her who did then?
she answered she did not know
Burroughs groaned aloud.
You will observe her answer, gentlemen of the
jury
....she
did not know, but thought they were poor
distracted
creatures, whereupon the afflicted said that the
Black man was whispering in her ear and that a
yellow-bird
which used to suck between her fingers was
now there; and orders being given to see if there was
any sign, a girl said, it is now too late for she has
removed
a pin and put it on her head; and upon search
there was found a pin sticking upright there. He
testifies
too that when Mrs. Cory had any motion of her
body the afflicted would cry out, when she bit her lip
they would cry out of being bitten, and if she grasped
one hand with the other they would cry out of being
pinched.
You will observe too that a jury of women who were
empanelled to search her body, testify one and all
that they found a preternatural teat upon her body;
but upon a second search three or four hours after, there
was none to be found.
Thus much for the evidence, gentlemen of the jury;
I proceed now to remark on what has been urged for
theofficerofficer....look to your prisoner!
O, I am so tired and so sleepy! said Martha a getting
up, and trying to pass the sheriff, who stood by her with
a drawn sword. Let me go, will you!get out o' the
way and let me gowhat's the use o' keeping me here;
I've told you all 't I know o' the job.
Do
let poor
Martha
go!
Gracious God!Father of Love! cried Burroughs,
what an appeal to the executioners of the law! Did
you not hear it, ye judges? Do you not see her now,
tottering away....the poor bewildered creature.
Have done Sir.
Dear brotherif we are wise we shall not be strict
with him herelet us give the world nothing to complain
of, our duty require it, policy requires itah!
Prisoner at the bargo back to your seat: Officer
officer
She don't hear a word you say, Mr. Judge.
Martha CoryMartha!
Well, here I be, Mister Capun Sewall; what d'ye
want o' me?
Go back to your seat, Martha.
Back there?I shall not
Officer!
The officer took her by the arm to lead her back.
Gently theregentlygently.
There now! cried Martha, in a peevish, querulous
toneThere now; dropping into the seat with her arms
a-kimbo, and poking out her chin at the officer. There
now; I hope that'll satisfy you
Gentlemen of the jury, pursued the judge; You have
now the evidence before you. You have gone through
the whole proof with me, step by stepit is for you to
say what is the value of that proof
Proof, cried Burroughsproof! taking away his
hands from his pale faceand speaking through his
shut teeth. Call you that proof which proves nothing?
that which relates to things that occured, if they ever
occurred at all, years and years ago? that which is only
a sort of guess-work? that which relates to transactions
which the poor soul does not appear to have had either
voice or part in?
Bravely said, George Burroughsbravely put, cried
a female, who stood in the dark part of the house.
Such trivial matters tooso trivial that we should
mock at them, but for the life we lead here, surrounded
by savages, and by death in every shape, and by woods
and waters that were never yet explored by man; beset
on every side by a foe that never sleeps; afar and away
from succor and liable to be surprised every hour of the
day and every hour of the night, and butchered among
our babes and our household-gods. Proof, say you?
can that be proof, I appeal to you judgesthat which,
however false it may be, or however mistaken by
the witnesses, cannot, in the very nature of things, be
explained away nor contradicted; that which calls upon
a poor creature worn out with age and miseryan idiot
for of a truth she is little betterI pray you judges
I pray youon me let your displeasure fall; not on
herI will abide your wrathI see it in your eyes
but I pray youI beseech youcan that be proof,
that
which calls upon a prisoner in such a case to go through
the whole history of her lifehour by hourstep by
step. Nay, speak to me!By your oaths, answer me!
By your oath here, and by your hope hereafter, may
you call upon her, in a matter of life and death, to do
this? And not only to do this, but to account for the
epilepsy
of a babe? for the dreams, the diseases, the very
night-mares of them that now accuse her?
If you do not stop Sir, we shall have to commit you.
Commit me if you dare! You have made me
counsel
for the prisoner, and whatever may be the courtesy
of the bar, whatever you may expectand whatever
may become of meor of youI shall not throw a
chance away. He proceeded to review the whole of the
evidence with a vigor and propriety which after a while
rose up in judgment against him, as if it were
supernatural
;
he then argued upon the nature of the crime
saying it was a charge easily made but hard to disprove,
and that it would require one to be a witch to prove that
she was not guilty of witchcraft
Beware of that man, said the chief judge, with a
mysterious
look. Beware, I tell you; for whoever he may
be, and whatever he may be, he will be sure to lead you
astray, if you are not upon your guard.
Lo,the counsel for the prisoner! Lo the humanity of
the law! cried Burroughs. Who could do more?I
appeal
to you, ye men of Massachusetts-Baycould the
prosecutor himselfcould anybody on earthin aid
of the prisoner at the bar?Put upon your guard in that
way, against the power and art of anotherif you are
not men of a marvellous courage indeedof heroic
probityit would be impossible for him to convince you,
however true were his argument, however conclusive his
facts.
Very true, whispered the foreman of the jury, loud
enough to be overheard by a judge, who rebuked him
with great asperity.
Whatever I might say, thereforehowever true it
might be, and however wise, after that speech, you would
not venture to heed meyou could notsuch a thing
were too much to hope forunless you were indeed,
every
man of you, far, far superior to the race of men
that are about and above you
Talk of art, said the chief judge, in dismay. Talk
of address after that! who ever heard of such artwho
ever heard of such address before?
What a compliment for your understandings!But I
do not give up in despairI shall say the little that I now
have to say, and leave you to decide between usif I
prevail
,
you may have courage enough perhaps to acquit the
prisoner, though you
are
sneered at by the judges.
He proceeded with fresh vigor, and concluded the
work of the day with a speech that appears to have been
regarded by the court and the people as above the
ability
of man. He spoke to the multitude, to the judges, to
the bar, to the juryman by mansaying to each with
a voice and a power that are spoken of still by the
posterity
of them that were there.....You have heard the
whole evidence.Youyou alone, Sir, that I speak too
now, are to decide upon the life or death of the prisoner.
You alone, Sir! and mark me.....if.....though you are but
one of the twelve who are to decide....if you decide for
death....observe what I say....if you so decide Sir, as one
of the twelve....when, if you knew that her life depended
upon you alone, you would have decided otherwise,
mark me....her blood shall be upon your head....her
death at your door!....at yoursand yoursand yours
though each of you be but one of the twelve.
Hear me. I address myself to you, John Peabody.
Are you prepared to saywould you say
guilty
, if her
life depended upon you, and upon you alone?if you
were her only judge?Think of your death-bedof the
Judge whom you are to meet hereafter, you that have so
much need of mercy hereafterask yourselves what
harm would follow her acquital, even though she were
guilty. Then ask yourself what would be your feelings
if you should ever come to know that you have put her
to death wrongfully....So say I to you, Andrew Elliot....
Her life depends upon youupon you alone! You are
in fact her only judgefor youor youor youor
either of you may save her, and if you do not, her blood
will be required hereafter at your handsat the hands
of each of youI have done.
12
CHAPTER XI.
The chief judge would not replycould not perhaps,
till after he and his brothers had prayed together; and
when he did speak, he spoke with a subdued voice,
like one troubled with fear.
Gentlemen of the jury, said he; I have but a few
words to urge in reply.
1. You have been told that one should be a witch to
prove that she is not guilty of witchcraft. I admire the
ingenuity of the speaker; but my answer is, that by the
same rule, a man should be a wizard to prove that he is
not a manslayerhe being
proved
a manslayer. And
yet,
being
proved a manslayer, we put him to death. So
herebeing proved a witch, if you are satisfied by the
proof, we put the prisoner to death, even though it would
require the exertion of diabolical power to overthrow the
proof.
2. You are told by one speaker that we are prone to
believe in the marvellous; and that, therefore, when a
marvellous thing is related, we ought to be on our guard
against that proneness to belief, and require more
proof. Now it appears to me that if we are prone to
a belief in the marvellous, instead of requiring more
proof to witchcraft, we should require less. For why
require much, if less will do?
3. But by another, it has been said that we are
not
prone to belief in the marvellous; that on the contrary,
so prone are we to disbelieve in what may appear
marvellous
,
that proof, which we would be satisfied with in
the ordinary affairs of life, we should pay no regard to,
if it were adduced in favor of what we consider
preternatural
;
and that therefore in the case you are now to
try, you should require more proof than you would in
support of a charge not marvellous. To which we
reply
that
where you have the same number of
witnesses
,
of the same character, in support of a marvellous
charge, you
actually have more proof
, than you would
have in the like testimony of the same witnesses, to a
charge not marvellous. And why?Because by the
supposition of the speaker, as they are prone to a
disbelief
in the marvellous,
they
would have required much
proof, and would not have been persuaded to believe
what they testify to, but upon irresistable proofmore
proof than would have satisfied them in the ordinary
affairs of life.
4. It has been said moreverthat the greater the
crime charged, the more incredible it is; that great
crimes are perpetrated less frequently than small ones;
and that, therefore, more proof should be required of
parricide than of theft. Our reply to which is, that if a
witness declare to a parricide on oath,
you have more
proof
than you would have to a theft sworn to by the
very same witness; that, if the greater the crime, the
less credible it is, you are bound to attach more value to
his testimony where he testifies to parricide than where
he testifies to theft. And why?Because, the greater
the crime charged, the greater the crime of the witness
if he charge falsely; and therefore the less likely is it,
by the supposition, that he does charge falsely.
But here I would have you observe that proof is proof,
and that after all, the proof which at law or otherwise
would be enough to establish one charge, would be
enough to establish any other. In every case you are to
be satisfiedyou are to believe: and in the case now
before you, perhaps it may be well for you to look upon
the two improbabilities which I have now spoken of, as
neutralizing each other. If witchcraft is incredible
it is incredible also that one should falsely charge
another with witchcraft.
5. It has been said too that the witnesses contradict
each other. Be it so. I confess that I see no such
contradiction
but
if I did, I might be called upon to say
that perjured witnesses are remarkable for the
plausibility
and straight-forwardness of their stories; and that
such plausibility and straight-forwardness are now
regarded
,
like unanimity, as a sign of bad-faith by judges
of experience. You are to be told moreover, that where
slight contradictions appear in what may be said by
several witnesses to the same fact, such contradictions
are a sign of good-faithshowing that no preconcerted
story has been told. I might refer, and I may venture
to do so perhaps, in a matter of such awful moment, to
the gospels in proof. It is a mighty argument for their
truth my friends, that no two of them perfectly agree
no two of the whole as they could have agreed, if, as
there have been people wicked enough to say (though
not to believe) they had been prepared for deception
by a body of conspirators
Brotherbrotherput off thy shoes....the ground is
holysaid Governor Phips.
I have....I have
The people groaned aloud.
If you were called upon, each of you,five years from
to-day, to give a particular account of what you now
see and hear, and if each of you depended upon himself,
your stories would be unlike; but if you consulted
together
,
your stories would be sure to approximate. So
much for this head.
6. I have gone so far as to say that proof is proof,
whatever
may be the case; but I do not say that you are to
require at any time, in any case, more proof than the
nature of the case will admit of. In other words, you
are not to insist upon the same sort and degree of proof
in every case. You are to be satisfied with such proof
as you can getif you suppose that none better is left
behind. So says the law
Nonsensefor if that rule is good, you might prove
any-thing
by
any thing, said Burroughs.
Be quiet Sir....few people see spectres; and witches
will do their mischief, not in the light of day, and
before
a multitude, but afar and apart from all but their
associates. You are to be satisfied with less proof
therefore
in such a case, than it would be proper and
reasonable
for you to require in a case of property
And if sowhy not in murder?....murders being
perpetrated
afar and apart from the world
Peace I bid you...Having
How dare you!
Having disposed of what has been urged
respecting
the proof, gentlemen of the jury, I should now leave
the case with you, but for a remark which fell from a
neighbour a few minutes ago. Doctor Mather will now
touch upon what I would gladly pass overthe growth
and origin of the evil wherewith we are afflicted.
Here a man of majestic presence of about fifty years
of age arose, and laying aside his hat, and smoothing
away a large quantity of thick glossy hair, which
parting
on his forehead, fell in a rich heavy mass upon his
broad shoulders, prayed the jury and his brethren of
the church to bear with him for a few moments; he
should try to be very brief. Brother Georgehe did
not question his motive he said, but brother George
Burroughs would have you believe that witches and
wizards
12*
are no longer permitted upon our earth; and that
sorcery, witchcraft, and spells are done with.
Whereto I reply....Firstthat there has been hitherto
throughout all ages and among every people, and is
now a general, if not a universal,belief in witchcraft and
so forth. Now if such universality of belief respecting
the appearance of departed souls after death, has been,
as it certainly has, a great argument for the immortality
of the soul with such as never heard of the Seriptures
of Truth, I would ask why a like universality of belief
respecting witchcraft and sorcery should be thought of
no value, as an argument? Every where the multitude
believe in witchcraft or in that which is of a piece with
it. Spirits and fairies, goblins and wizards, prophets
and witches, astrologers and soothsayers are found
mixed up with the traditionary love and the religious
faith of every people on earth, savage and civilized(so
far as we know, I should say);with that of people who
inhabit the isles of the sea, afar and apart from each
other and from all the rest of the world. I speak
advisedly
.
They believe in spirits, and they believe in a
future statein sorcery and immortality. The wild
Irish have what they call their banshees, and the Scotch
their second-sight, and the French their loup-garoux, or
men turned into wolvesand so also have the Irish;
and a part of our jocular superstition is the posterity of
that which existed among the the terrible Goths.
Maria
a
word that we hear from the lips of the idle and
profane, before they have got reconciled to the
wholesome
severity of our law, was in old Runic a goblin
that seized upon the sleeper and took away all power
of motion. Old Nicka toohe that we are in the
habit of alluding to, in a grave way, as Old Nick, was a
spright who used to strangle such as fell into the water.
Bowas a fierce Gothic captain, the warlike son of
Odin. whose name was made use of in battle to scare a
surprised enemy. Every where indeed, and with every
people, earth sea and air have been crowded with
specters
,
and the overpeopled sky with mighty shadowsI
do not know a
Here the great black horse which Burroughs had left
underneath a tree, trotted up to the very door, and
stood still, with the reigns afloat upon his neck, and
thurst his head in over the heads of the people, who
gave way on every side, as he struck his iron hoofs on
the step, and for a second or two there was a dead quiet
over the whole house. The speaker stopped and
appeared
astonished, for the eyes of the animal in the
strong light of the torches, were like two balls of fire,
and his loose main was blowing forward in the draught
of the door, so as actually to sound aloud.
Why do you stopwhat are you afraid of, Doctor
Mather? Not afraid of old Pompey are you?
Had n't you better tie him up? asked a judge.
NoI have something else to do, but I desire that
somebody at the door will. But nobody would go near
the creature.
History abounds with proof, I say, respecting
witchcraft
and sorcery, witches and wizards, magic, spells
and wicked power. If we put all trust in the records
of history for one purpose, why not for another? If a
witness is worthy of belief in one thingwhy is he not
another? If we find no treachery nor falsehood in a
writer; if we meet with nothing but confirmation of
what he says, when we refer to other writers of the same
people and age, why disbelieve him when he speaks of
that which, being new to our experience, we cannot be
able to judge of? Able and pious men should be
trusted
,
whatever they may say, so long as they are not
contradicted
by other able and pious men
We are to believe not only in witches then, but in
fairies and loups-garoux
Be quiet Sir
Softly judge....And we are to believe that he who in
the course of a tale about the ordinary affairs of
ordinary
life
Have done Sir.
Testifies to a miracle, should be credited as much
for what he says of the miracle as for the rest of the
Be quiet Sir.
As for the rest of the tale....You cannot escape me
brother
Will you be quiet Sir?
No.
The Bible is crowded with proof, continued the
Doctor. Sooth-sayers and sorcerers, interpreters of
dreams, false-prophets, and a witch with power to make
the grave and the sea give up their dead; men whose
little rods became live serpents while they strove with
Aaron the High-priest, multitudes who were clothed
with a mischievous power....all these are spoken of in
the Bible.
It has been said here that credulity is a sign of
ignorance
.
It may be so, my dear friendsbut you must
know as well as I do, that incredulity is everywhere
found among the ignorant. Able men believe much,
because
they are able men. The weak disbelieve much
because they are weak. Who are they that laugh when
they hear that our earth is a globe, and that once in
every
twenty-four hours, it turns completely round
underneath
our feet
Much whispering here, and a look of surprise on every
side of the speaker, encouraged him to a more emphatic
delivery.
Who are they that refuse to believe much that the
learned and the wise, fortified in their wisdom by the
beauty of holiness, and the gravity of age, are
steadfastly
assured of? The truth is that extraordinary
minds have a courage that ordinary minds have not
for they dare to believe what may expose them to
ridicule
.
The longer we live and the more we know, the
more assured we are that impossible things are
possible
To be sure Doctor, said a judge.
That nothing is impossible therefore....Now, my
friends of the juryit appears to me that if witchcraft
had
been a common thing with every people, and in all
ages, we could not possibly have had more evidence of
it, than we have now. We have the records of
History
,sacred
as well as profane. We have a great body of
laws, made year after year, among the most
enlightened
people that ever inhabited the earth, about
conjurations
,
spells and witchraft, and this, in all parts of the
globe and especially in the land of our Fathers;
judgment
of death, day after day, and year after year,
under
that law; confessions without number by people
charged with sorcery and witchcraft, not only in
various
parts of England, but by our very fire-sides and at
our very doors. Added to all this, we have the universal
faith of which I spoke, and altogether, a body of proof,
which if it be falsewould be more wonderful than
witchcraft is
True....true....fearfully and wonderfully true, brother.
But if such things
are
elsewhere why may they not
be here? If they have been heretofore, why may they
not be now, and forever? We do not know, worms that
we are, how the Lord God of Heaven and earth
operates
in His pavillion of thick darknesswe do not
know whether he will or will not work in a given way.
We only know that he may do whatever he will....that
for Him there is no such law as the law of nature.
And if so, why may not witches be employed as the
wicked are, as great warriors are, for scourging the
nations
of our earth, and for the glory of our Father above.
Let us pray.
Prayer followed, and after the prayer, the multitude
sung a psalm together, and the jury withdrew.
They were not gone long, and when they came back
there was but just light enough to see their faces. Not
a breath could be heard....not a whisperand the
foreman
stood up and was about to speak in the name of
the twelve, when Burroughs, who could bear it no
longer
,
leaped upon his feet, and turned to the jury with
tenfold power, and gasping for breath, called upon each
man by name, as he hoped for mercy hereafter, to speak
for himself.
Brother Burroughs!
Brother Moody
Be quiet Master Burroughs.
I will not be quiet, Master Judge
Officer!
I will not be quiet I say! And hereafter you will
remember
my words, and if they prevail with you, men
of Massachusetts-Bay, ye will be ready to cry out for
joy that I was not brow-beaten by your looks; nor
scared
by your threats
Have done Sir.Do your duty Master High-Sheriff.
Begone Sir. Touch me if you dare.You see
this staff.You know something of me and of my ways.
Touch me if you dare. What I have to say shall be
said, though I die for it. By our Soverign Lord and
Master and Mary his Queen, I charge you to hear me!
You are shedding the blood of the innocent! You are
driving away the good and the brave by scores from the
land! You are saying to people of no courage, as to
that poor woman thereas I live she is fast asleep
asleep!...while that grey-headed man who stoops over
her is about to pronounce the judgment of death upon
her
Wake the prisoner....what, ho, there! cried the chief
judge.
The officer went up to poor Martha and shook her;
but she did not appear to know where she was, and fell
asleep again with her little withered hands crossed in
her lap.
You are saying to her and such as her....Confess and
you are safe. Deny, and you perish
To the point Mr. Burroughs....We are tired of this;
we have put up with enough to-day
I will. I demand of you judges that you call upon
every man there in that box to say, each man for
himself
,
whether it be his opinion that Martha Cory should
suffer death. I
will
have it so....I
will
have it on record
I will not permit a man of the twelve in such a case
to hide himself under the cloak of the majority
It cannot be master Burroughsit cannot besuch a
thing was never heard of....gentlemen of the jury, look
upon the prisoner.
Hear me but a word more! I see death in the very
eyes of the juryI see that we have no hope. Hear
me nevertheless....hear me for a minute or two, and I
will go away from you forever
Let us hear him, said another judge.
I proved to you the other day that an accuser had
perjured herself in this court, before your faces, ye
mighty and grave men. What was my reward? You
gave judgment of death on the accusedYou let the
accuser go freeI see that accuser now. What will
be said of your justice at home, if you permit her to
escape? Will the judges of England forget you? or
the majesty of England forgive you?
The horse at the door began to grow impatient
snorting and striking with his feet.
Ye know that the knife was a forgery; and the
sheet which has made so much talk here, why even that
was a
He stopped short, and looking at a female who sat
near him, appeared to lose himself entirely, and forget
what he was going to say.
Well Sir
Excuse me....I....I....excuse me....although I have no
doubt of the fact, although as I hope to see the face of
my Redeemer, I do believe the story of the sheet and
the story of the spindle, to be of a piece with the story
of the knife; a trick and a forgery, yetyet
Here he made a sign to the female, as if to encourage
her.
Yet I dare not say
now
, I dare not say
here
, on
what my belief is founded. But hear me....they talk of
teeth and of whole sets of teeth being discoverable by
the prints which appear in their flesh. How does it
happen I pray you that all these marks turn out to be
on parts of the body which might be bitten by the
afflicted
themselves? And how does it happen, I pray
you, that instead of corresponding teeth, or sets of teeth
being found in the accused, ye have repeatedly found
her as now, without a tooth in her head? Nay....how
does it happen that Abigail Paris and Bridget Pope,
who are indeed sufferers by a strange malady, babes
that are innocent as the dove, I am sure....God forbid
that I should lay the mischief at their door
Seven and seven pencemuttered the man, who kept
an account of the oaths.
How does it happen I say,that of all the accusers
they and they alone have escaped the mark of the teeth?
How!....because they alone speak the truth; because
they are the deceived....we know not how, judges, but
in a fearful way. They are deceived....poor children,
but they do not seek to deceive others. Nor do they
lie in wait for a
He was interrupted by a loud furious neigh, so loud
and so furious from the great black stallion at the door,
that Martha awoke and started up with a scream that
thrilled the very blood of the judges, and made the
people
hurry away from the bar.
Burroughs now saw that he had no hope, and that in a
moment the poor soul before him would bear the
sentence
of death. He caught up his iron-shod staff, and
breaking through the crowd which recoiled from his
path as if he were something whose touch would be
fatal
to life, sprang upon the back of the horse, and
gallopped
away toward the sea-shore.
No language on earth, no power on earth can describe
the scene that followed his departure, the confusion, the
outcry, the terror of the people who saw the fire fly
from his rocky path, and heard leap after leap of the
charger bounding toward the precipice; nor the fright
of the judges; nor the pitiable distress and perplexity
of the poor childish woman, when she was made fully
to understand, after the tumult was over and the dread
clamor and fire-flashing had passed away, and
every-thing
was quiet as the gravenothing to be heard but
a heavy trample afar off and the dull roar of the sea
that she must be prepared for death.
She could not believe it....she would not believe it
she did not....such was her perfect simplicity, till the
chief judge came to her and assured her with tears in
his eyes, over and over again, that it must be so.
13
Ah me! said poor Martha looking out toward the
quarter of the sky where the horseman had so hastily
disappeared, and where she had seen the last of the
fire-light struck from his path; Ah me, bending her head
to listen, and holding up her finger as if she could hear
him on his way back. Ah me!ah me....and that was
all she said in reply to her judges, and all she said when
they drove her up to the place of her death, decked out
in all her tattered finery, as if it were not so much for
the grave, as for a bridal that she was prepared.
Ah me! said poor Martha when they put the rope
about her neck....Ah me!and she died while she was
playing with her little withered fingers, and blowing the
loose grey hair from about her mouth as it strayed away
from her tawdry cap....saying over the words of a child
in the voice of a child, Ah meah mewith her last
breath
God forgive her judges!
CHAPTER XII.
The work of that day was the death of George
Burroughs
.
The unhappy allusion that he made to the
knife, just before he stopped so suddenly and fixed his
eyes upon a young female who sat near him with her
back to the light, and her face muffled up so that
nobody
knew her till after she had gone away, was now in
every body's mouth. She was the sister of Rachel
Dyer
,
and her name was Mary Elizabeth; after Mary Dyer
and Elizabeth Hutchinson. It was now concluded
that what he knew of the perjury of the witnesses, of
the sheet and of the knife, he had been told by Mary
Elizabeth or by Rachel Dyer, who had been watching
him all the livelong day, from a part of the house,
where the shadow of a mighty tree fell so as to darken
all the faces about her.
It was Rachel Dyer who spoke out with a voice of
authority and reproved him for a part of his wild speech.
And it was Rachel Dyer who came up to his very side,
when he was in array against the judges and the elders
and the people, and stood there and spoke to him
without
fear; while Mary Elizabeth sat by her side with her
hands locked in her lap, and her blue eyes fixed in
despair
upon the earth.
Nor were the people mistaken; for what he knew of
the forgery, he did know from Rachel Dyer, and from
Mary Elizabeth Dyer, the two quaker women whose
holy regard for truth, young as they were, made their
simple asseveration of more value than the oath of most
people. To them was he indebted for the knowledge,
though he was not suffered to speak of itfor the times
were not ripe enough, that even as the knife-blade was,
the spindle and the sheet were, a wicked forgery; and
the sign that he made to Elizabeth Dyer, when he
stopped
in the middle of his speech, and the look of
sorrow
and love which accompanied his endeavor to
appease
her frightful agitation, as she sat there gasping
for breath and clinging to Rachel's garb, were enough
to betray the truth to everybody that saw them.
It was fatal to him, that look of sorrow and love, and
ere long it was fatal to another, to one who loved him
with a love so pure and so high as to be without reproach,
even while it was without hope; and it would have been
fatal to another in spite of her loveliness, but for the
wonderful courage of her....the heroine of our story,
whose behavior throughout a course of sore and bitter
trial which continued day after day, and month after
month, and year after year, deserves to be perpetuated
in marble. No hero ever endured so muchno man
ever yet suffered as that woman suffered, nor as a
multitude
of women do, that we pass by every hour,
without
so much as a look of pity or a word of kindness to
cheer them onward in their path of sorrow and
suffering
.
If God ever made a heroine, Rachel Dyer was a
heroinea heroine without youth or beauty, with no
shape to please, with no color to charm the eye, with
no voice to delight the ear.
But enoughlet us go to our story. Before the sun
rose again after the trial of poor Martha, the
conspirators
of death were on the track of new prey, and fear
and mischief were abroad with a new shape. And
before
the sun rose again, the snare was laid for a
preacher
of the gospel, and before a month was over, they
13*
dragged him away to the scaffold of death, scoffing at
his piety and ridiculing his lofty composure, and
offered
him up a sacrifice to the terrible infatuation of the
multitude. But before we take up the story of his death,
a word or two of his life. It was full of wayward and
strange adventure.
He appears to have been remarkable from his earliest
youth for great moral courage, great bodily power,
enthusiastic
views, and a something which broke forth
afterwards
in what the writers of the day allude to, as an
extraordinary gift of speech. He was evidently a man
of superior genius, though of a distempered genius,
fitful
,
haughty and rash. He appeared on earth, says
an old writer of America, about a hundred years too
soon. What he was put to death for in 1692, he may
be renowned for (if it please the Lord) in 1792, should
this globe (of which there is now small hope, on account
of the wars and rumors of wars, and star-shooting that
we see) hold together so long.
He was not a large man, but his activity and strength
were said to be unequalled. He went about every
where among the nations of the earth; he grew up in
the midst of peril and savage warfare; and at one
period
of his life, his daily adventures were so strange, so
altogether beyond what other men are likely to meet
with, even while they are abroad in search of adventure,
that if they were told in the simple language of truth,
and precisely as they occurred, they would appear
unworthy
of belief. The early part of his life, he spent
among a people who made war night and day for their
lives, and each man for himselfthe men of
Massachusetts-Bay
,
who did so, for about a hundred and fifty
years after they went ashore on the rocks of
New-Plymouth
putting
swords upon the thighs of their
preachers
,
and Bibles into the hands of their soldiers,
whithersoever
they went, by day or by night, for sleep, for
battle
or for prayer.
On account of his birth, he was brought up to the
church, with a view to the conversion of a tribe to
which his father belonged: Constituted as he was, he
should have been a warrior. He made poetry; and he
was a strong and beautiful writer: He should have made
warhe might have been a leader of armiesa
legislator
a
statesmana deliverer. Had he appeared in the
great struggle for North-American liberty, fourscore
years later, he probably would have been all this.
He never knew his father; and he was dropped by
his mother, as he said, in the heart of the wilderness,
like the young of the wild-beast; but he escaped the
bear and the wolf, and the snake, and was bred a
savage
,
among savages, who while he was yet a child, put
him upon the track of his unnatural mother, and bid him
pursue her. He did pursue her with the instinct of a
blood-pup, and found her, and fell upon her neck and
forgave her and kissed her, and wept with her, and
stood by her in the day of her trouble. On her
death-bed
she told him her story. She had been carried away
captive by the Indians while she was yet a child. She
grew up to their customs and married a warrior who
was descended from a white man. Of that marriage
the boy about her neck was born. She had no other
child, but she was very happy until she saw the Rev.
Mr. Elliot of Plymouth, a man who seeing others of
the church occupied in warfare and cruel strife, turned
his back upon the white men that he loved, and struck
into the woods of the north, and went about every where
preaching the gospel to the savages and translating
precious
books for them, such as Primers, catechisms,
the practice of piety, Baxter's Call to the Unconverted,
several of Mr. Shepard's composures, and at length the
Bible itself, which was printed the first time in their
language in 1664, and a second time, not long after,
with the corrections of Mr. Cotton, minister of
Plymouth
.
After meeting with Mr. Elliot, who soon added
her to his Indian church, and filled her heart with fear
about original sin, faith, free grace and a future life, she
grew melancholy; and being assured that her brave
wild husband, a chief who hated the white man with a
hatred passing that of the red men, would never permit
her to preach or pray if he knew it, she forsook him and
fled for refuge to New-Plymouthher boy, whom she
could not bear to leave with his pagan father, strapped
to her back, and her soul supported by the prayers of
the true church. For a time she doated on the boy, for
a time she was all that a mother could be; but before a
twelvemonth was over, perceiving that she was
regarded
by the whites, and by the women especially (her
sisterhood
of the church) as unworthy to associate with
them because of the babe, and because of the father,
whose lineage they said was that of Anti-Christ and the
scarlet-woman, she took to prayer anew, and bethought
herself anew of the wrath of Godher Fatherand
resolving
to purify herself as with fire, because of what
she had been to the savagesa wife and a mother, she
strapped the boy on her back once more, and set off
a-foot and alone to seek the hut of his wild father;and
having found it she kissed her boy, and laid him at his
father's door in the dead of night, and came away with
a joyous heart and a free step, as if now
now
, that the
little heathen was in a fair way of being devoured by the
wolf or the wild hog, under the very tree which
overhung
the very spot of green earth where she had begun
to love his father, as he lay asleep in the shadow, after
a day of severe toilshe had nothing more to do to be
saved.
The father died in battle before the boy had strength
enough to draw a child's arrow to the head. The boy
went in pursuit of his mother at the age of twelve, and
by her he was taught the lessons of a new faith. She
persuaded him to leave the tribe of his father, to forsake
the wild men who were not of the true church, and to
come out from the shadow of the wilderness. The
whites aware of the value of such a youth and of the
use he might be in their bold scheme for the overthrow
of Indian power throughout all North Americathe
spread of the Gospel of truth and peace and charity, as
they called itadded their solicitation to hers. But
nonothe brave boy withstood them all, he would
neither be bribed nor flattered, nor trapped, nor scared;
nor was he, till he saw his poor mother just ready to die.
But then he gave uphe threw aside the bow and the
arrow, he tore off the rich beaver dress that he wore,
buried the tomahawk, offered up the bright weapons of
death along with the bright wages of death, on the
altar
of a new faithprayed his mother to look up and
live and be happy, and betook himself with such fervor
and security to the Bible, that he came to be regarded,
while yet a youth, as a new hope for the church that
had sprung up from the blood of the martyrs.
He married while he was yet a boy. At the age of
twenty, he was a widower. At the age of twenty-four
he was a widower again, with a new love at his heart
which he dared not avowfor how could he hope that
another would be found to overlook his impure lineage;
now that two had died, he believed in his own soul, a
sacrifice to the bitter though mute persecution they had
to endure for marrying with one who was not
altogether
a white man? a love which accelerated his death,
for till the name of Elizabeth Dyer came to be
associated
with his, after the trial of Martha Cory, the
wretched
women, who had acquired such power by their
pretended
sufferings, were able to forgive his reproof, his
enquiry, and his ridicule of what they swore to,
whenever
they opened their lips to charge anybody with
witchcraft. From the day of the trial it was not so.
They forgave him for nothing, after they saw how much
he loved Mary Elizabeth Dyer. And yet, he was no
longer what he had beenhe was neither handsome nor
youthful now; and they who reproached others for
loving
him when he was both, why should they pursue him
as they did, when the day of his marvellous beauty and
strength was over? when his hair was already touched
with snow, and his high forehead and haughty lip with
care? Merely because he appeared to love another.
He had been a preacher at Salem till after the death
of his first wife, where he had a few praying Indians
and a few score of white people under his charge. They
were fond of him, and very proud of him (for he was
the talk of the whole country) till, after her death, being
seized with a desire to go awayto escape for a time,
he cared not how nor whither, from the place where he
had been so very happy and for so short a period, he
left his flock; and went eastward, and married anew
and was a widower againburying a second wife; the
second he had so loved, and so parted from, without a
wish to outlive herand then he crossed the sea, and
traversed the whole of Europe, and after much trial and
a series of strange vicissitude, came backthough not
to the church he had left, but to the guardianship of
another
a great way off.
He could bear to liveand that was all; he could not
bear to stay, year after year, by the grave where the
women
that he so loved were both asleep in their youth
and beautyand he forbidden to go near them. But
he prospered no moreso say the flock he deserted,
when he went away forever from the church he had
built up, and took refuge again among the people of
Casco Bay, at Falmoutha sweet place, if one may
judge by what it is now, with its great green hill and
smooth blue water, and a scattered group of huge pine
trees on the north side. It was a time of war when he
arrived
at Falmouth, and the Indians were out, backed by
a large body of the French and commanded by a French
officer, the Sieur Hertel, a man of tried valor and great
experience in the warfare of the woods. At the village
of Casco Bay, there was a little fort, or block house,
into which about a hundred men with their wives and
little ones were gathered together, waiting the attack
of their formidable and crafty foe, when the preacher
appeared.
There was no time to throw awaythey were but a
handful to the foe, afar from succor and beyond the
reach of sympathy. He saw this, and he told them there
was no hope, save that which pious men feel, however
they may be situated, and that nothing on earth could
save them but their own courage and a prayerful
assiduity
.
They were amazed at his look, for he shewed no
sign of fear when he said this, and they gathered about
him and hailed him as their hope and refuge; the
servant
of the Lord, their Joshua, and the captain of
their salvation, while he proceeded to speak as if he had
been familiar with war from his boyhood.
For weeks before the affair came to issue, he and they
slept upon their arms. They never had their clothes
off by night nor by day, nor did they move beyond the
reach of their loaded guns. If they prayed now, it was
not as it had been before his arrival in a large
meeting-house
and all together, with their arms piled or stacked
at the door, and the bullet-pouch and powder-horn,
wherever it might please the Lord,but they prayed
together, a few at a time, with sentries on the watch
now, with every gun loaded and every knife sharpened,
with every bullet-pouch and every powder-horn slung
where it should be; and they prayed now as they had
never prayed beforeas if they knew that when they
rose up, it would be to grapple man to man with the
savages.
At last on a very still night in the month of May, one
of the two most beautiful months of the year in that
country of rude weather, a horseman who was out on
the watch, perceived a solitary canoe floating by in the
deep shadow of the rocks, which overhung the sea
beneath
his feet. Before he had time to speak, or to
recollect
himself, he heard a slight whizzing in the air, and
something which he took for a bird flew past himit
was immediately followed by another, at which his horse
rearedand the next moment a large arrow struck in a
tree just over his head. Perceiving the truth now, the
horseman set off at full speed for the fort, firing into
the canoe as he darted away, and wondering at his
narrow
escape after the flight of two such birds, and the
twang of a bowstring at his very ear.
14
CHAPTER XIII.
He
had
a narrow escapefor the shore was lined with
canoes that had come in one by one with the tide,
stealing
along in the shadow that lay upon the edge of the
water, and the woods were alive with wild men
preparing
to lay an ambuscade. They were not quite ready
for the attack however, and so they lay still on both
sides of the narrow path he took, and suffered him to
ride away in safety when he was within the reach, not
only of their balls and arrows but of their knives. They
knew with whom they had to deal, and the issue proved
their sagacity, for when the poor fellow arrived at the
fort and related what he had seen, there was nobody to
believe
the story but Burroughs, and he would not put much
faith in it, although he had reason to think well of the
man; for how were the savages to get across the Bay
in such a clear still nightwith a sea like the sky, and
a sky like the air that men breathe in their boyhood or
when they are happywithout being discovered by the
boats? And how were they to approach from the woods,
without coming over a wide smooth level of water,
seldom
deep enough to float a large canoe, nor ever shoal
enough to be forded without much risk on account of
the mud?
No attack followed for three nights and for three days,
and already the garrison were beginning to be weary of
the watch, and to murmur at the restraint he had
imposed
.
It grieved him to the soul to see their fright
passing off and their vigilance with it. I beseech you
said he, on the afternoon of the fourth day, toward
night-fall, as he saw them lying about under the trees,
and a full fourth of their number asleep in the rich warm
grass, with hardly a knife or a gun where it should be,
a pike or a powder-hornI do beseech you to hear me.
You are in jeopardy, in great jeopardyI know it; I
am sure of it
So you said a week ago, answered one of the men,
stretching himself out, with a rude laugh, and resting
his chin on both hands, with his elbows fixed in the
turf.
Ah, you may laugh, Mark Smith, but I am satisfied of
what I saythe woods are much too still for the time o'
the year
Fiddlestick, parson Burroughs! what a queer fish
you be, to be sure, added another. You are skeered
when there's nothin' at all to be skeered at
So he is Billy Pray, and yet he aint afeard o' the old
One himself, when other folks air.
Skeered one day at a noise, and another day at no
noise at allhaw, haw, haw!
Do you see how the birds fly?
What birds?
The birds that come up from the shorethey fly as
if they were frightened
Well, what if they do?
An' so I say, Mark Smithwhat if they do? rolling
over in the grass and preparing for another napWho
cares how they fly? if they're frightened, haw, haw,
haw, that's their look out, I sposehaw, haw, haw.
I beseech you to be serious, menwe have heard no
shot fired for several days in that quarter, and yet you
see the birds fly as if they were hunted. Now, it is my
opinion that they are struck with arrows, and arrows
you know are made use of by people who are afraid to
make a noise when they kill their food
Ha, ha, ha;haw, haw, haw! gi' me you yit, parson
haw, haw, haw!what if they're under the shore
can't they kill fish without makin' a noise? haw, haw,
haw!
Fishfishbut no, I will not be angry with you
Taber
;
I dare not, much as you deserve it, for every thing
we have in the world is now at stakeeverything. I
entreat you therefore, my friendsI implore you, instead
of laying by your arms, to double your guard this very
night; instead of sleeping, to watch more than ever
I feel afraid of this deep tranquility
Nonsensedouble the watch now, when every thing
is quiet in the woods, and down by the beach, and not
a breath o' noise to be heard anywhere?
Yeayeafor that very reason. Look you, David
FisherI know well what the Indians are, better than
you do now, and better than you ever will, I hope. I
have now done
my
duty. Do you yoursI have nothing
more to say; but I shall be prepared as I would have
you prepare, for the night which is now at hand. Our
foes are not on the water, Smith, nor nigh the water
now, or they might fish for their food without alarming
us. But whether you believe me or no, I say again that
they are not far from us, and that we shall find it so, to
our sorrow, if you do not keep a better look out for the
theretheredo you see how that partridge
flies!I tell you again and again, there's something
alive in that very wood now.
I dare say there ishaw, haw, haw!
And so I say, Mark Smith, hee, hee, hee
It may be one o' the dogsha, ha, ha!And they all
sprang up together with a jovial outcry, and began to
caper about in the grass,and call to a group that were at
work a little way off, to go with them and help scour
the wood, where the new Joshua thought there was
something alive.
You forget Mark Smithdogs do not go into the
woodsstay, stay, I beseech youdon't be so
foolhardy
try
to make one of the dogs go to the top of
that hill before younay, nay, Carver; nay, nay, and
you too, Clarkare you mad Sir?you a lieutenant
of war, and the first of our men to play the fool.
Here you men, said Clark. Here you men, I say!
Whose afeard among the whole boodle of you?
No answer.
Nobody's afeardso I thought. Hourra thenhourra
for the king!
Hourra!hourra!hourra for the king!
Pooty well, thatpooty fair toonow le'me see you
hourra for the queen.
Hourra thenhourra!hourra for the queen!
That's you, faith!
Hourrahourrahou
No, no that's enough; a belly full o' hurrah is as
good's a feast nowhold up your heads.How many is
there of you, all told?Sohsohsteady there, steady
turn out your heels
Turn out your toes you meanhaw, haw, hee!
No I don'thee, hee, hawgive that up long ago.
Now then! hold still there, hol' still I say, while I count
you offonetwothreedarn your hide Matthew
Joy, aint there no hold still to you? Stan' still, I say;
four, fiveOut o' that snarl, thereone, two, three,
four!very well, very well indeed, never see the
wrigglars
do't half so wellclean as a whistlesoh, soh
five an' five is ten, and five is fifteenthere now; you've
put me outhold your gab, Sargeant Berry;how am
I goin' to count off the men if you keep a jabberin' so?
14*
twenty-fiveeightninethirty, and two is
thirty-four
now
look me right in the eye every one o' you.
Heads upheels outheels out I saythat's you Jake
Berry, you never stoop none, I seeheels out there,
every man of you, what are you afeard on?You there
with the striped jacket on, what's your under jaw out
there for? you want to tumble over it, hey?heads up
there, heads uphave your ears buttoned back, head
soaped and a bladder drawn over it hey?Soh, soh!
attentionvery wellvery well indeedpooty fair
now I'm goin' to give the word for you
Wall....an' what's the word you're goin' to give....hey?
You be quiet our Jake, and you'll see....
How shall we know what to do, when you give the
word, if you don't tell us aforehandI should like to
know that....
Shet your clam, Obadiah P. Joyaint you ashamed
o' yourself; nice feller you for a sojeraint he boys?
Well, fire away then.
Now you see, I'm goin' to say now or never, three
times....behave there! behave I say!...and when I've
said now or never the third time, off I go, you see!
right bang, slap dash into that are wood there, a top or
that air hill, and them that's good enough to carry guts
to a bear, they'll go with me. Soh....all ready now!
Ay, ay....ay, ay, Sir....ruther guess we be....
Now....or....never! said Clark, leaning forward with a
preparatory step, setting the breach of his heavy musket
in the turf, and driving home the ramrod, to prove the
weight of the charge. Now-or-never! cocking it, and
shaking the powder into the pan, with his eye on the
troop, all of whom stood with their left leg forward,
ready for the race....now-or-never! and off he started
before the words were fairly out of his mouth on the
heels of two or three who had started before.
Keep together, keep together! shouted Burroughs.
Whatever else you do, keep together!
But no, no....they would have their own way.
If the indians are there, added he....If they are!....as
he saw the whole thirty stretching away all out of breath
for a wood which crowned the top of the hill---If they
are! it is all up with us....and I am sorely afraid of that
narrow green lane there, with a brush-fence on the
upper
side of it....Ha!God forgive them for their folly
....Did you see that?
See what....I saw nothing....
Look....look....there's a glitter and a confused
motion
there....can't you see it?....just where the sun strikes
on the verge of the hill among the high grass, where a
my God....I thought so!
I can't see nothin'....the sun hurts my eyes; but as
for you, you can look right into the sun....Hullow....
where now?
To arms! to arms! cried the preacher, in a voice
that might have been heard a mile....away with you to
your post.
Away with you all, cried Burroughs.
What for?
To arms! to arms, I say, continued the preacher.
What for?
To legs more like....what for?
Away to the fort I beseech you (lowering his voice)
away with you, every man of youyou and your wives
and your little onesyou haven't a breath to lose now
....away with you.
Nation sieze the feller; what for?
Rattlesnakes an' toddy....what for!
What forGod of our fathers! O, ye men of little
faith!
Hourra for you! you're cracked I vow; pooty
representative
o' Joshua.
Hear me....hear me....Have I not more experience
than you? Do I not know what I say?....can you not
believe me? what do you risk by doing as I desire;
....O, if you but knew as well as I do, what is nigh to us!
Wall what is night to us?
Death.
Death!
Ay....death....death....death....
Boo!
My friends....my dear friends....do,
do
be ruled by
me....there....theredid you see that?
See what?....you
air
cracked, I'll be darned if you
aint.
My God! my God! cried the preacher, looking
about
in despair, and speaking as if he saw the savages
already at the work of death, hatchets and arrows on
every side of his path, and every clump of willow-trees
near breaking out with fire and smoke. Will you not be
persuaded....will you not give up?....see....see....Clark is
getting the foolish men together, and if we betake
ourselves
to the refuge, there may be some hope of a
What are they stoppin' for now, I wonder .
Wait half a minute more young man, said the
preacher, and you will be satisfiednownow!
As he spoke, the men halted and came together a few
yards from the top of the hill.
Out o' breath I guess?
Out of courage I fear .
Hourra!hourra!shouted the men afar off, and the
shout came through the still air, and passed off to the
high sea, like a shout of triumph.
Hourra!hourra!answered all that were nigh
Burroughs, and all that were in the fort.
Hourra!hourra!hourra!echoed the people, and
the shores and the rocks rung with their delirious
outcry
,
as the brave thirty dashed forward.
There they gothere they goyelled a man from the
top of a tree just over the head of the preacher. There
they gothey are up to the fence now.
Are they indeedare you sureGod be praised if
they are.
Sure!that I bethere they gothere they go
ha, ha, ha!they're tumblin' over each otherha, ha,
hathere they goI knowed there wasn't any thing
thereha, hahalloo!heywhat
Well Job, what's to pay now?they're t'other side
o'the fence now, arn't they?
T'other side o'the fence!no, indeed, not within a
Lord God!Mr. Burroughs!Mr. Burroughs!
Wellwhat's the matter now?
Lord have mercy upon us! Lord have mercy upon
us!
You'll break your neck Job Hardy, if you're not
careful.
O Lord, O lord! what will become of my poor wife?
Ah, hanow do you believe me?
Out broke the tremendous war-whoop of the
Pequods
,
with peal after peal of musketry, and before the
preacher could make himself heard in the uproar, two
or three white men appeared afar off, running for their
lives, and pursued by a score of savages. By and by,
another appearedanother and anotherand after a
while five moreand these were all that had survived
the first discharge of the enemy.
You perceive now why the men tumbled about as they
did, when they got near the fence; they were struck
with a flight of level arrows that we couldn't seeah!
you appear to have a
O Mr. Burroughs, Mr. Burroughswhat shall we
do?
He made no answer
O SirSirtake pity upon us!
He stood as if the fear that he felt a moment before
was gone away forever, and with it all concern, all
hope, all care, all pity for the wretched people about him.
O God of Jacobwhat
shall
we do!
Promise to obey me
We willwe willwe do.
So you did, when I first came herenow you have
begun to scoff at your Joshua, as you call me.
O SirSirdo not mock us, we entreat you!
Here they come Sir, here they come! O speak to us
do speak to uswhat are we to do
Choose me to lead you
We willwe willwe do!
And with powermark medo you see this gun
with leave to put a ball through the head of the first
man that refuses to obey me?
Yesyesany thingany thing
Very wellthat's enough. And I swear to you
before
God I'll do it. Nowhear what I have to say
Silence!not a word. Here Bradishheretake
you twelve men out of these, and away with you to the
edge of the creek there, so as to cover the retreat of
your friends. Away with you.
Hourrahourra!
Silenceoff with you as if you were going, every
man to his own funeraldon't hurrydon't lose your
breath; you'll have occasion for it, I promise you,
before
the work of this day is overaway with you, now;
and every man to a tree; when you hear the bell, make
your way to the fort, and if it please God, we'll whip
the enemy yet.
Off sprang the twelve without another word.
Here Fitch, hereI know youyou are a married
mana father and a good fathertake these eight who
are all fathers; and you Hobby, you take thesethey
are all unmarried, and away with you to the
willowhedge
yonder; you to the right, Fitch; and you to the
left, Hobbyand let us see who are the braver men,
the married or the unmarried.Stopstopdon't
hurry
;
if you are to make a fair job of it, you must go
coolly to work
Off they started
Stand by each other!stick to your trees!and load
and fire as fast as you canthat'll dooff with you
You'll see to the women-folks, I hope
Off with you, Sir.
Off we gobut I say!(looking back over his
shoulder and bawling as he ran)what are we to do
when we hear the bell?
Dodge your way intree by treeman by man
Hourra for youhourra for Joshhourra for
Joshua
!
Before five minutes were over, the savages were in
check, the people reassured, the remnant of poor
Clark's party safe, and the whole force of the
settlement
so judiciously distributed, that they were able to
maintain the fight, until their powder and ball were
exhausted
,
with more than treble their number; and
after
it grew dark, to retire into the fort'with all their
women
,
their children, their aged and their sick. It was
no such place of security however as they thought; for
the Indians after they had fired the village and burnt
every house in it, finding the powder exhausted, laid
siege to the fort by undermining the walls and shooting
lighted arrows into the wood-work. From that moment
there was nothing to hope for; and the preacher who
knew that if the place were carried by assault, every
living
creature within the four walls would be put to
death, and that there would be no escape for the women
or the babes, the aged or the sick, if they did not
immediately
surrender, drew the principal man of the fort
aside (major Davis) and assuring him of what he
foresaw
would be the issue, advised a capitulation.
A capitulation Sir, after the work of this day? said
the Major. What will become of you? you have killed
a chief and two or three warriors, and how can you hope
to be forgiven, if they once get you in their power.
Leave that to meI know their languageI will try
to pass for one of the tribe
But howhowimpossible, Sir.
Let me have my own way, I beseech youleave me
to take care of myself....
No, Sir....we know our duty better.
Then, Sir, as I hope to see my God, I will go forth
alone to meet the savages, and offer myself up for the
chief that I have slain. Perhaps they may receive me
into their tribe....give me a blanket, will you....and
perhaps
not....for the Pequod warrior is a terrible foe.
Here he shook his black hair loose, and parted it on
his forehead and twisted it into a club, and bound it up
hastily after the fashion of the tribe.
And the faith which a Huron owes to the dead is
never violated....I pray you therefore
Stooping down and searching for a bit of brick, and
grinding it to dust with his heel
I pray you therefore to let me go forth
Bedaubing his whole visage with it, before he lifted
his head
You cannot save me, nor help me
Shouldering up his blanket and grasping a short rifle.
What say you!
Leaping to the turf parapet as he spoke, and
preparing
to throw himself over.
God of our Fatherscried the Major, Is it possible!
who are you?
A Mohawk! a Mohawk! shouted all that saw him
on the parapet; even those who beheld the
transfiguration
were aghast with awe; they could hardly believe
their own eyes.
What say you!one word is enough....will you give
up?
For the love of God, Mr. Burroughs! cried the Major,
putting forth his hand to catch at the blanket as it was
blown out by a strong breeze....I do pray you
He was too late; for Burroughs bounded over with
a shout which appeared to be understood by the
savages
,
who received him with a tremendous war-whoop.
A shriek followed....a cry from the people within the fort
oftreachery!treachery!and after a moment or
two every-thing was quiet as the grave outside.
The garrison were still with fearstill as death....
Were they deserted or betrayed? Whither should they
fly?What should they do? Their deliverer....where
was he? Their Joshua....what had become of him?
The attack was renewed after a few minutes with
tenfold fury, and the brave Major was driven to
capitulate
,
which he did to the Sieur Hertel, under a promise
that the survivors of the garrison should be safely
conducted
to Saco, the next English fort, and that they and
their children, their aged and their sick should be
treated
with humanity.
Alas for the faith of the red men! alas for the faith
of their white leaders! Before they saw the light of
another day, the treaty was trampled under foot by the
savages, and hardly a creature found within the four
walls of the fort was left alive. The work of butchery
15
but nonoI dare not undertake to describe the
horrible scene.
And Burroughs....What of Burroughs?Did he
escape
or die?....Neither. He was carried away captive
to the great lakes, and after much vicissitude, trial and
suffering which lasted for upwards of a year, came to
be an adopted Iroquois, and a voluntary hostage for the
faith of the white men of Massachusetts-Bay. From
this period we lose sight of him for a long while. It
would appear however that he grew fond of a savage
life, that his early affection for it sprang up anew, as he
approached the deep of the solitude, where all that he
saw and all that he heard, above or about him, or
underneath
his feet, reminded him of his youth, of his
parentage
and his bravery; that he began after a time to
cherish a hopea magnificent hope, for a future
coalition
of the red men of America; that he grew to be a
favorite with Big Bear, the great northern chief, who
went so far as to offer him a daughter in marriage; that
he had already begun to reflect seriously on the offer,
when the whites for whom he stood in pledge, were
guilty of something which he regarded as a breach of
trustwhereupon he bethought himself anew of a
timid
girla mere child when he left her, and beautiful as
the day, who when the shadow of death was upon all
that he cared for, when he was a broken-hearted
miserable
man without a hope on earth, pursued him with her
look of pity and sorrow, till, turn which way he would,
her eyes were forever before him, by night and by day.
It was not with a look of love that she pursued himit
was rather a look of strange fear. And so, having
thought of Mary Elizabeth Dyer, till he was ready to
weep at the recollection of the days that were gone,
the days he had passed in prayer, and the love he had
met with among the white girls of the Bay, he arose,
and walked up to the Great northern chief, who but
for the treachery of the whites would have been his
father
,
and stood in the circle of death, and offered
himself
up a sacrifice for the white countrymen of the child
that he knewthe lovely and the pure. But nothe
Big Bear would not have the blood of a brother.
You know the Big Bear, said he to the young
men of the Iroquois that were gathered about him.
Who is there alive to harm a cub of the Big Bear? I
am your chiefwho is there alive to harm the child of
your chief? Behold my daughter?who is there alive
to strike her sagamore? Warriorslook at himHe
is no longer a pale manhe is one of our tribe. He is
no longer the scourge of the Iroquois. The beloved of
our daughterwho is there alive to touch him in
wrath?
Here all the warriors of the tribe and all the chief men
of the tribe stood up; and but one of the whole drew
his arrow to the headthe signal of warfare.
White manbrother, said the Big Bear. Behold
these arrows! they are many and sharp, the arrows of
him that would slay thee, but fewbut few brother
and lo!they are no more. Saying this, he struck
down the arrow of death, and lifted the hatchet and
shook it over the head of the stubborn warrior, who
retreated
backward step by step, till he was beyond the
reach of the Big Bear.
Brotherwould ye that we should have the boy
stripped and scourged? said the Big Bear, with all the
grave majesty for which he was remarkable. White
manbehold these arrowsthey are dripping with
bloodthey are sharp enough to cleave the beach tree.
White manwhither would you go? Feel the edge
of this knife. That blood is the blood of our brave, who
would not obey the lawthis knife is the weapon of
death. Fear notfor the arrows and the knife are not
for the pale manfear notbeloved of her in whom we
have put our hope. The arrows and the knife are not
for himbut for the dogs that pursue him. Speak!
I will, said Burroughs, going up to the resolute young
savage, who stood afar off, and setting his foot upon the
bare earth before him with all his mightI will. Big
BearfatherI must go away. I found you in peace
Let me leave you in peace. Your people and my
people
are now at war. I cannot strike a brother in
battle
.
The white men are my brothers.
Big Bear made no reply.
Farewell....I must go away. I cannot be on either
side when Big Bear and Long-knife are at war.
Good.
I cannot have Pawteeda now. I have done.
Speak.
Wherefore?
Speak. Why not have Pawteeda now?
Pawteeda should be wife to some warrior, who, when
he goes forth to war, will strike every foe of his tribe,
without asking, as I should, who is heand what is he?
As a white man, I will not war with white men. As
the adopted of the red men....with the blood of a red
man boiling in my heart, as the captive and nursling of
the brave Iroquois, I will not be the foe of a red man.
Good
Let Pawteeda be wife to Silver-heels. He hath deserved
Pawteeda, and but for me, they would have been happy.
Good.
Here the youthful savage, whose arrow had been
struck aside by the Big Bear, lifted his head in surprise,
but he did not speak.
I beseech you father! let my beloved be his wife.
Good.
The youthful savage dropped his bow, threw off his
quiver, and plucking the ornamented hatchet from his
war-belt, after a tremendous though brief struggle,
offered
the weapon of death to Burroughs, thereby
acknowledging
that in some way or other he had injured
the pale man. Big Bear breathed fiercely and felt for
his knife, but Burroughs went up to the bold youth and
gave him his hand after the fashion of the whites, and
called him brother.
It shall be so, said the Big Bear. And from that day
the youth was indeed a brother to Burroughs, who being
satisfied that Pawteeda, if she married one of her own
people, would be happier than with a white man, left
her and the savages and the Big Bear and the woods
forever, and got back among the white people again, at
a period of universal dismay, just in time to see a poor
melancholy creature, whom his dear wife had loved years
and years before, on trial for witchcraft. He could
hardly believe his own ears. Nor could he persuade
himself
that the preachers and elders, and grave authorities
of the land were serious, till he saw the wretched old
woman put to death before their faces.
15*
CHAPTER XIV.
From that hour he was another man. His heart was
alive with a new hope. The dark desolate chambers
thereof were lighted up with a new joy. And what if
there was no love, nor beauty, nor music sounding in
them all the day through, such as there had been a few
brief years before, in the spring-tide of his youthful
courage; they were no longer what they had been at
another
period, neither very dark, nor altogether
uninhabited
,
nor perplexed with apparitions that were enough to
drive him distractedthe apparition of a childthe
apparition of a dead hopefor with him, after the death
of a second wife, hope itself was no more. He was now
a messenger of the Most High, with every faculty and
every power of his mind at work to baffle and expose
the treachery of those, who pretending to be afflicted by
witchcraft, ware wasting the heritage of the white man
as with fire and sword. He strove to entrap them; he
set spies about their path. He prayed in the public
highway, and preached in the market place, for they
would not suffer him to appear in the House of the Lord.
He besought his Maker, the Searcher of Hearts, day
after day, when the people were about him, to stay the
destroyer, to make plain the way of the judges, to speak
in the dead of the night with a voice of thunder to the
doers of iniquity; to comfort and support the souls of the
accused however guilty they might appear, and (if
consistant
with his Almighty pleasure) to repeat as with the
noise of a multitude of trumpets in the sky, the terrible
words,
Thou shalt not bear false witness
.
But the death of Martha Cory discouraged him. His
heart was heavy with a dreadful fear when he saw her
die, and before anybody knew that he was among the
multitude, he started up in the midst of them, and broke
forth into loud prayera prayer which had well nigh
exposed him to the law for blasphemy; and having made
himself heard in spite of the rebuke of the preachers and
magistrates, who stood in his way at the foot of the
gallows
,
he uttered a prophecy and shook off the dust from
his feet in testimony against the rulers of the land, the
churches and the people, and departed for the habitation
of Mr. Paris, where the frighful malady first broke out
resolved in his own soul whatever should come of it
life or deathto Bridget Pope, or to Abigail Parisor
to the preacher himself, his old associate in grief,
straightway to look into every part of the fearful mystery,
to search into it as with fire, and to bring every
accuser
with whom there should be found guile, whether high
or low, or young or old, a flower of hope, or a blossom
of pride, before the ministers of the law,every accuser
in whom he should be able to see a sign of bad faith or a
look of trepidation at his inquirythough it were the
aged servant of the Lord himself; and every visited and
afflicted one, whether male or female, in whose language
or behaviour he might see anything to justify his fear.
It was pitch dark when he arrived at the log-hut of
Matthew Paris, and his heart died within him, as he
walked up to the door and set his foot upon the broad
step, which rocked beneath his agitated and powerful
tread; for the windows were all shut and secured with
new and heavy wooden barsand what appeared very
surprising at such an early hour, there was neither light
nor life, neither sound nor motion, so far as he could
percieve in the whole house. He knocked however, and
as he did so, the shadow of somethingor the shape of
something just visible in the deep darkness through
which he was beginning to see his way, moved
athwart his path and over the step, as if it had
pursued
him up to the very door. He was a brave manbut
he caught his breath and stepped back, and felt happy
when a light flashed over the wet smooth turf, and a
voice like that of Mr. Paris bid him walk in, for he was
expected and waited for, and had nothing to fear.
Nothing to fear, brother Paris....He stopped short
and stood awhile in the door-way as if debating with
himself whether to go forward or back.
Whyhow pale and tired you aresaid Mr. Paris,
lifting
up the candle and holding it so that he could see the
face of Burroughs, while his own was in deep shadow.
You appear to have athe Lord have pity on us and help
us, dear brother! what can be the matter with you?
why do you hold back in that way?why do you stand
as if you have n't the power to move? why do you look
at me as if you no longer know me?
Truetrue, said Burroughsvery truetalking to
himself in a low voice and without appearing to observe
that another was near. No, no....it is too late now....
there's no going back now, if I would....but of a truth,
it is very wonderful, very....very....that I should not
have recollected my rash vow....a vow like that of
Jeptha
....very....very....till
I had passed over that rocky
threshold which five years ago this very night, I took an
oath never to pass again. What if the day that I spoke
of be near?....What if I should be taken at my word!
Our Father who art in......
SirMr. Burroughsmy dear friend
Well.
What is the matter with you?
With me?....nothing.......Oh....ah....I pray you,
brother
,
do not regard my speech; I am weary of this work,
and the sooner we give it up now, the better. I have
done very little good, I fear....two deaths to my charge,
where I had hoped a....ah, forgive me, brother; pray
forgive me....But how is this?....What's the matter with
you?
With me!
Yeswith you. What have I done, that you should
block up the door-way of your own house, when you
see me approach? And what have I done that you should
try to hide your face from me, while you are searching
mine with fire, and looking at me with half-averted
eyes?
With half-averted eyes
Matthew, Matthewwe are losing timewe should
know each other better. You are much less cordial to
me than you were a few days ago, and you know it.
Speak out like a man....like a preacher of truthwhat
have I done?
What have you done, brother Georgehow do I
know?
Matthew Paris....are we never to meet again as we
have met? never while we two breathe the breath of life?
I hope....I do hope... I am not less glad to see you
than I should be; I do not mean to give you up,
whatever
others may do, butbut these are ticklish times
brother, and just now (in a whisper) situated as we are,
we cannot be too cautious. To tell you the truth....I
was not altogether prepared to see you, after the
Not prepared to see me! Why you told me before you
lifted the latch that I was expected, and waited for
So I did brother....so I did, I confess
And yet, I told nobody of my intention; how did you
know I was to be with you?
One of the children said so above a week ago, in her
sleep.
Indeed.
Ah, you may smile now, brother George; but you
looked serious enough a moment ago, when I opened
the door, and if what they say is true
How did I look, pray?
Whyto tell you the truth, you looked as if you saw
something.
Well....what if I did see something?
The Lord help us brotherwhat did you see
I do not sayI am not sure....but I thought I saw
something.
The Lord have mercy on you, brotherwhat was it?
A shadowa short black shadow that sped swiftly
by me, but whether of man or beast, I do not know.
All that I do know, is
Lower....lower....speak lower, I beseech you,
brother
B.
No brother P. I shall not speak lower.
Do....do
I shall not. For I would have the shadow hear me,
and the body to know, whether it be man or devil, that
if either cross my path again, I will pursue the shadow
till I discover the body, or the body till I have made a
shadow of that
Walk in brother....walk in, I beseech you.
I'll not be startled again for nothing. Ahwhat
are you afraid of?
AfraidI
Brother Paris
There now!
Look you brother Paris. You have something to say
to me, and you have not the courage to say it. You are
sorry to see me here....you would have me go away....I
do not know wherefore....I do not ask; but I know by
the tone of your voice, by your look, and by everything
I hear and see, that so it is. In a word therefore....let
us understand each other. I shall not go away....here I
am Sir, and here I shall abide Sir, until the mystery
which brought me hither is cleared up.
Indeed, indeed Mr. Burroughs, you are mistaken.
I do not believe you.
Sir!
I do not believe you, I say; and I shall put you to the
proof.
George BurroughsI will not be spoken to, thus.
Pohpoh
I will not, Sir. Who am I, Sirand who are you,
that I should suffer this of you?I, a preacher of the
gospelyou, an outcast and a fugitive
Burroughs drew up with a smile. He knew the
temper
of the aged man, he foresaw that he should soon
have the whole truth out of him, and he was prepared
for whatever might be the issue.
Yea, an outcast and a fugitive, pursued by the law
it may be, while I speak; I, a man old enough to be
your fatherBy what authority am I waylaid here,
underneath
my own roofa roof that would have been a
refuge for you, if you were not a
A what Sir?
I have done
So I perceive Matthew. I am satisfied nowI see
the cause now of what I charged you with. I do not
blame yougrievous though it be to the hope I had
when I thought of youmymybrother. I feel for
youI pity youI am sorry now for what I saidI
pray you to forgive mefarewell
Heywhat
Farewell. You saw me, as you thought, pursued by
the lawflying to the shadow of your roof as to a
refuge
,
and so, you stood at the door and rebuked me,
Matthew.
You wrong meI love youI respect youthere is
no treachery here, and what I have said, I said rashly,
and I know not why. Forgive me brother George....
forgive the old man, whose fear hath made him
overlook
what is due to them, whoever they are, that fly to
his habitation for shelter.
I do forgive you....my brother. Let me also be
forgiven
.
Be it so....there....there....be it so.
But before I take another step, assure me that if I
enter
the door, neither you nor yours will be put in
jeopardy
.
In jeopardy!
Am I pursued by the law?....am I, of a truth?
Not pursued by the law, George: I did not say you
were; I do not know that you will be....but indeed,
indeed
,
my poor unhappy friend, here is my roof, and
here am I, ready to share the peril with you, whatever
it may be, and whatever the judges and elders and the
people may say.
You are.
Yes.
I am satisfied. You have done your duty....I shall
now do mine. You are a true brother; let me prove
that I know how to value such truth. I am not
pursued
by the law, so far as I know or have reason to believe,
and if I was....I should not come hither you may be
assured
for safety....nay, I do not mean a reproach....
I have absolute faith in your word now; I do believe
that you would suffer with me and for me....but you
shall not. If I
were
hunted for my life, why should I
fly to you?....You could be of no use to me....you could
neither conceal me nor save me....and I might bring
trouble upon you and yours forever. What would
become
of you, were I to be tracked by the blood-hounds
up to your very door?
I pray you, said the aged man, I do pray you....
looking
about on every side, shadowing the light with his
meagre hand, the whole inward structure whereof was
thereby revealed, and speaking in a low subdued
whisper
as
if he knew that they were overheard by
invisible
creatures....I pray you brother....dear brother....let us
have done with such talk
Why so....what are you afraid of?
Softly....softly....if they should overhear us
They....who....what on earth are you shaking at?
No matter.....hush.....hush......you may have no such
fear brother B....you are a bold man brother B....a very
bold man....but as for me....hark!....
What's the matter with you?....What ails you?
Hush!....hush....do you not hear people whispering
outside the door?
No.
A noise like that of somebody breathing hard?
Yes
You do....the Lord help us.
I do man, I dobut it is yourselfyou it is, that are
breathing hardwhat folly Matthewwhat impiety
at your age!
At my age....ah my dear brother, if you had seen
what I have seen, or heard what I have heard, or
suffered
as I have, young as you are, and stout and powerful
as you are, you would not speak as you do now, nor look
as you do now....
Seen....heard....suffered. Have I not seen....have I
not suffered!....How little you know of me....
Here Matthew Paris, after securing the door with a
16
multitude of bars and bolts of oak, led the way with a
cautious and fearful step toward a little room, through
the gaping crevices of which, a dim unsteady light, like
the light of a neglected fire could be seen.
Death Sir....death in every possible shape, I might
say....but who cares for death?....peril which, whatever
you may suppose Matthew, at your ageold as you are
....whywhat am I to understand by your behaviour!....
you don't hear a word I am saying to you.
There, therenot so loud I entreat you....not so loud
there's no knowing what may be near us.
Near usare you mad?what can be near us?
There againthere, there!
StopI go no further.
My dear friend
Not another stepif
you
are crazy, I am notI will
be satisfied before I go any further. Were I to judge by
what I now see and heardid I not believe what you
said a few moments ago; and where I not persuaded
of your integrity, Matthew, I should believe my foes
were on the look out for me, and that you had been
employed
to entrap me, as the strong man of old was
entrapped
for the Philistines, with a show of great love
Brother!
Nay, nay, it is not so; I know that very well. But
were I to judge by your behavior now, I say, and by
that alone, I should prepare my fingers for the fight, and
this weapon for war.
And Iif I were to judge by your looks and
behaviour
at the door, I should believe that you were flying
for your life, and that betaking yourself to my roof,
without regard for me or mine, you were willing to
betray
us to the law.
Manmanhow could you believe such a thing
of me?
You were pale as death, George
Speak louder
Pale as death, and you did not answer me, nor even
appear to see me, till after I had spoken to you two or
three times.
Of a truth?
You appeared unwilling to trust yourself beneath my
roof, when you saw me
Did I
So that I was driven to recall the transaction which
drove us apart from each other
Did I, Matthew?I am sorry for it
Yesand your behavior altogether was very strange
is very strange now; it is in fact, allow me to say so,
just what I should look for in a man who knew that his
life was in jeopardy. Take a chairyou are evidently
much disturbed, you appear to have met with some
surelysurelymy brother, something
has
happened to
you.
Did I
You do not hear me
True enough, MatthewI am very tiredplease to
give me a drop of water and allow me to rest myself
here a few minutes I must be gone quicklyI have no
time to lose now, I percieve.
You take a bed with me to night, of course.
No.
You mustindeed you must, my good brotherI have
much to askmuch to advise with you about. We are
in a dreadful way now, and if we
Impossible MatthewI cannotI dare not. I have
more to do than you have to say. Are the children a-bed
yet?
Ah brother, brotheryou have not forgotten the dear
child, I see.
Which dear child?
Which dear child!whyohahI thought you
meant little Abbythe very image of my departed wife.
Is Bridget Pope with you now?
She often speaks of you, the dear little babe....she
wears the keep-sake you gave her, and won't let any
body sit in your place, and if we desire to punish her,
we have only to say that uncle George won't love her....
The dear child! I saw her with Bridget on the day
of the trial, but I had no time to speak to either. I hope
they are both wellBridget has grown prodigiously, I
hear
And so has Abby
Indeed!
Indeedwhyis it so very wonderful that Abby
should grow?
To be surecertainly notshe was very fair when I
saw her lastwhen I left this part of the world, I mean.
Very
So upright, and so graceful and free in her carriage....
Free in her carriage?
For a child, I meanso modest, and so remarkable
in every wayso attentive, so quiet
Ah my dear friendhow happy you make me. You
never said half so much about her, all the time you lived
here; and I, who know your sincerity and worth and
sobernessto tell you the truth GeorgeI have been a
little sore....
....So attentive, so quiet and so assiduous....
Very true....very true....and to hear
you
say so, is
enough to make her father's heart leap for joy.
Whatin the grave?....
In the grave?....
And after all, I do not perceive that her eyes are too
large....
Too large?
Nor that her complexion is too pale....
Nor I....
Nor that her very black hair is either too....
Black hair.....black.....pray brother B. do you know
what you are saying just now? black hair.....why the
child's hair is no more black thanlarge eyes too
why it is Bridget Pope that has the large eyes
Bridget Popeto be sure it isand who else should
it be?
16*
CHAPTER XV.
So thenIt was Bridget Pope you were speaking of
all the time, hey, continued the father.
To be sure it waswhat's the matter now?
Whyaathe fact is, brother
You are displeased, I see.
Not at allnot in the leastno business of mine,
brother Georgenone at all, if you like Bridget Pope
as much as everchild though she isno business of
mine brother BurroughsI am sure of that.
So am I
You may laugh brother B., you may laugh.
So I shall brother P.so I shall. O, the sick and
sore jealousy of a father! Whydo you not know
Matthew Parishave I not given you the proofthat
your Abigail is to me even as if she were my own child
the child of my own dear Sarah? And is not my
feeling toward poor Bridget Pope that of one who
foresees
that her life is to be a life, perhaps of uninterrupted
trial and sorrow, because of her extraordinary
character
.
I do acknowledge to you that my heart grows
heavy when I think of what she will have to endure, with
her sensibilitypoor childshe is not of the race about
her
There now Georgethere it is again! That poor
child has never been out of your head, I do believe, since
you saw her jump into the sea after little Robert
Eveleth
;
and if she were but six or eight years older, I am
persuaded from what I now see, and from what I have
seen before
Matthew Paris!
Forgive me Georgeforgive meI have gone too far.
You
have
gone too far.
Will you not forgive me?
I doI doI feel what you have said though; I feel
it sharplyit was like an arrow, or a knife
Allow me to say
No, noexcuse meI know what you would say.
Her great resemblance to your wife, which everybody
speaks of, and her beauty
No, no, Matthew, no, no....I cannot bear such talk.
Ah George!
Both my wives were very dear to me; but she of
whom you speak, she whom you saw upon the bed of
death in all her beautyshe who died before you, in all
her beauty, her glorious beauty! but the other day as
it were.....
The other day, George?
Died with her hand in yours but the other day,
while I was afar offshe whom neither piety nor truth
could save, nor faith nor prayershe of whom
you
are
already able to speak with a steady voice, and with a
look of terrible composureto me it is terrible Matthew
she is too dear to me still, and her death too near,
whatever
you may suppose; you, her adopted father!you,
the witness of her marriage vowyou, the witness of her
deathfor me to endure itO my God, my Godthat
such a woman should be no more in so short a time!
Dear George
No more on the earth....no more in the hearts of
them that knew her.
Have I not lost a wife too?....a wife as beautiful as the
day, George, and as good as beautiful?
No more in the very heart of him, her adopted
father, who sat by her and supported her when she drew
her last breath
Dear George....would you break the old man's heart?
why should I not speak of them that are dead, as freely
as of
The children....the children, Matthewhow are they?
The children?
I have work to do before I sleep. It grows late....how
are they?
No longer what they were, when you saw them about
my table five years ago....
I dare say notfive years are an age to them.
But they are better now than they were at the time of
the trial; we begin to have some hope now
Have you, indeed?
Yes, for they have begun to....she has begun, I should
say....Bridget Pope....
I understand youthe father will out....
She has begun to look cheerful and to go about the
house in that quiet smooth way
I know, I know....it was enough to bring the water
into my eyes to look at her
Robert Eveleth is to be with us to-night, and if we
can persuade him to stay here a week or two, I have
great hope in the issue....
What hopehow?
That both will be cured of their melancholy ways
Bridget Pope and my poor Abby
Their melancholy wayswhy, what have they to do
with Robert Eveleth?
Whydon't you see they are always together when
he is here
WhoAbigail and he?
NoBridget Pope
Well, what if they arewhat does that prove?
Prove!
Yesproveproveyou know the meaning of the
word, I hope?
Don't be angry, George.
Angrywho's angry?poh, poh, Matthew, poh,
poh, poh; talk about love in a girl of that age for a boy
of that age
Lovewho said anything about love?
Poh, poh pohaffection, or loveorwhatever you
please, Matthewit isn't the word I quarrel withit is
the ideaI wonder that you should put such things into
their head
I!
A man of your age, Matthew Paris
Ah, brother, brother.
Sir.
There you go again!But I see how it is, and I shall
say no more about Bridgy Pope or the boy, Robert
Eveleth
,
till you are a
For shame
Why so, George? All I wanted to say was, that when
Robert is here, the children are happy together and
cheerful. They go romping about in the woods
together
,
up all the mows in the neighbourhood, or along by
the sea-shore, (between schools) and spend half their
play-time in the blackberry-swampyou look very
serious
....
I feel so....good by'e.
Good by'eI thought you had come to see the
children
?
To see the children?so I didas I live, Matthew!
Lead me to them
Follow me in herethey are just going to bed, I see.
So I didI came for no other purpose
Really?
Really
A tip-toe, brother, if you pleasethe sight of you may
do them good
I hope so, said Burroughsbeginning to feel what he
had never till that hour had the slightest idea of
jealousy
downright
jealousy, and of a nature too absurd
for belief, except with such as have been afraid in a like
way, of losing the chief regard of no matter what
anything
for which they cared ever so little, or ever so much
a bird or a kitten, a dog or a horse, a child or a woman.
I hope so, he repeated, as he followed the preacher
on tip-toe and peeped into the little room to survey their
faces before he entered, that he might enjoy their
surprise
.
But he started back at the first view, and caught by
the arm of his aged brotherfor there sat the poor
children
with their little naked feet buried half leg deep in
the wood-ashes, their uncombed hair flying loose in the
draught of the chimney, each with her wild eyes fixed
upon
the hearth, and each as far from the other as she could
well get in the huge fire-place; and so pale were they,
and so meagre, and their innocent faces were so full of
care and so unlike what they should have been at their
agethe age of untroubled hope and pure joythat he
was quite overcome.
They heard his approach, either his step or his
breathing
,
and started away from their settles with a cry that
pierced his heart.
I pray you! said he.But Abigail ran off and hid
herself in a far corner of the room, where a bed was
turned
up in a niche, and waited there, gasping for breath,
as if she expected to be eaten alive; and Bridget Pope,
although she stood still and surveyed him with a steady
look, made no reply to what he said, but grew very pale,
and caught by a chair when he spoke to her.
Why how now, said Mr. Paris, how now, children?
what's the matter with you, now?
Fatherfather! cried Abigail, peeping out with eyes
full of terror, and speaking with a voice which made her
father look toward the door as if he expected Burroughs
to assume another shape, or somebody else to appear
from the darkness behind. O fatherfatherO
my!
there, there!there he goes!
Wherewherewhat is it, my poor child?
WhyBurroughsBurroughsthere, there! there
now, there he goes again!that's hethere, there
don't you see him now, father?
See whom, dear?see what?
Why, Burroughs, to be sureBurroughs, the bad man
theretherethere
God help us!
I never saw him afore in that shape, father, never in
all my days, but I know him though, I know him wel
enough by the scar on his foreheadthere, therethere
he goes!can't you see him now, father?
See himto be sure I do.
Gracious GodAlmighty Fatherwhat can be the
matter with the poor child? I begin to perceive the truth
now, said Burroughs, I do not wonder now at your faith,
nor at your dreadful terror.
Theretheredidn't you hear that, father?it
spoke thenI heard it speak as plain as daydidn't you
hear it, father?
WhyAbigail Parisdon't you know me dear?
don't you know your uncle George?
There againthat's jest the way he speakshelp,
father, help!
What
is
the matter with you, child?
Nothin' father; nothin' at all nowit stops nowit
was a comin' this way when you spokemy stars!
anybody
might know it, father.
Know what, Abby?
Make me believe that aint George Burroughs, if you
can, father.
Why, to be sure it is, cried Burroughs, going a step
nearer to the place where the little creature lay, cuddled
up in a heap, with a quantity of split-wood and pitch-knots
gathered about her. Why do you tremble so, dear?
what's the matter with you?what are you afraid of?
Fatherfathershrieked the poor child, stop it,
father!
Why!don't you know me Abigail?nor you
neither
Bridget Popedon't
you
know me dear?
O SirSiris it you?is it you yourself, Mr.
Burroughs
?
cried the latter, huddling up into the shadow,
and catching her breath, and standing on tip-toe, as if
to get as far out of his reach as possible. O Siris it
you?....
To be sure it islook at mespeak to metouch
me
O Sir, Sirno, no, Mr. Burroughsno, no.
Why what on earth can possess you Bridget Pope?
what on earth is the matter with you?what are you
afraid of?
O Lord SirI hope it
is
you!
Who else can it be?don't you see me?don't you
hear me speak?O I'm ashamed of you, such a great
girl, to be afraid of a
Who else?how should I know Sir? and if I knew,
I should be afraid to say; but I don't know Sir, I don't
indeed Sirand how should I, pray, when I never saw
you before to night
Never saw me before to night!
No Sir, nevernever
Are you out of your head Bridget Pope?never saw
me before?
No Sirnever, neverI wish I may die if I ever did,
though others haveyour shape I mean Sirbut I
would never allow they told the truth about you when
theyO, Abigail, Abigail!
Did you speak to
me
, Bridgy Pope?
O my, O my!it
is
your uncle George!it is
indeed
I
see the ring he used to wearthat's the very
ring!
You don't say so Bridgy!mother's pretty ring?
Speak to it now Abbyyou aint afeard nowspeak
to it, will you?
No, no, Bridgy, no, noyou speak to it yourself
what are you cryin' about father?
I did speak to it Abbyit's your turn now
But you're the nearest
But you're the furthest off
Ahbut you're the oldest!
But you are the youngest....
Fatherfatherits lookin' at me now!
Well, what are you afread on AbbyI don't believe
he's one o' the crewis he, uncle Matthew?
The preacher was afraid to open his mouthhis heart
was too full. It was the first time they had called each
other Abby and Bridgy, for months.
And soand sothey may say what they like; and
IIas for me Abby, I'm not afeard now, one bit
How you talk Bridgy.
Noand I'll never be afeard againso there!
WhyBridgy!
And so you'd better come out o' your cubby-house,
and go up to it and speak to it; I'm not afeard now,
you see.
Nor I.
17
Yes you be, or you wouldn't stay there.
What if you speak to it agin Bridgy?
So I will. How d'ye do Sir, how d'ye do?
My!if 'taint a laughin' at you!
I hope you're satisfied now
Aint you railly afeard one bit though, cousin Bridgy?
No indeed, not I. See if I be nowlook at me and
see what I'm a goin' to do. There Sir!there Mr.
Burroughs, or whatever you be, there's my hand Sir
there
Laying it on the table before him and turning away
her head just as if she were going to have some hateful
operation performed....
You may touch it if you like
God bless you dear.
I'm not afeard of you nowam I Sir?
No, nomy brave girl.
And you are not ashamed of me now I hopeare you
Sir?
Nono but I am proud of you
He touched her hand as he spoke, but released
it immediately, for he saw that he had a very cautious
game to play.
By jingo Abby!
By jingowhat for?
Why the hand is warm after all; it is Mr. Burroughs
himselfit is, it is!I know him now as well as I
know youhourra!
O my!
As sure as you are alive Abby.
Why, Bridget Pope, said her uncle. What on earth
are you made of?
Meuncle Matthew?
Why....it appears that you did not know him just
now, when you spoke to him.
No SirI wasn't very surenot so sure as I am now.
There's courage for youtrue courage, Matthew
Paris; a spirit worthy of all admiration.
Very truevery truebut she is two years older than
Abby.
Not so much, Matthew, not so muchwell dear?
May I go nowplease....
You are not afraid of me now, dear?
No Sirif you pleasenot much
And you never will be so again, I hope?
So do I Sirso do I....I hope so too....for its an
awful
thing to be afeard of anybody.
Poor child.
To be afeard in the dark Sirin the dead o' the night
Sirwhen you're all livin' alone SirO, it
is
dreadful
.
So it is, our Bridgy.
But I never mean to be afeard again Sir.
There's a good girl.
Never, never (catching her breath)if I can help it.
Nor I nyther, Bridgy
Never....(lowering her voice and peeping under the
bed) never without I see the wicked Shape as they do
right afore me in the path, when I go after the cows,
or when I go to look for the pretty shells on the
seashore
What wicked Shape?
Your own Sirplease.
Ah.
And so Sirand soand so uncle Matthewand so
you'd better come out o' your hole, Abby dear.
After a deal of persuasion,
Abby dear
began to creep
out of her hiding-place, and by little and little to work her
way along, now by the split-wood, now by the wall, and
now with her back toward the place where the Shape sat
holding his breath and afraid to move, lest he should
scare away the new-born courage of the little thing.
After a while she got near enough to speak; and
holding
by her father's coat all the time, she sidled up to
Burroughs, who would not appear to see what she was
about, aud lifting up her innocent face, articulated just
loud enough to reach himThere now.
Well dear
Off she started, the moment he spoke.
But finding she was not pursued, she stopped a
yard or two from his chair, and peeping over the flap of
her father's coatand seeing that the shape was looking
another wayshe came a little nearerstoppeda
little
nearer stillinch by inchstopped once more, and
looking up at him, as if she knew not whether to run off
or stay, saidYou be Mr. Burroughs
I
know?
He was afraid to speak yet, and afraid to move.
Uncle Georgeee.
God bless the babe!
There nowI told you soyou be uncle George,
baint you?
Yes dearbut who are youyou little wayward imp,
with such a smutty face and such ragged hair....poh, poh
....poh....what are you afraid of?
O father, father! he's got me! he's got me!
Wellthere, thereif you don't like to stay with me,
go to your father....
Why....what a funny Shape it is fatherif it
is
a
shape.
I don't believe your hair has been combed for a
twelvemonth
.
O but it has though....
It is no fault of ours, my friend, said her father,
delighted
to see her at the knee of Burroughs. We do all
we can, but the more we scrub, the more we may; the
more we wash, the dirtier and blacker she grows, and
the more we comb, the rougher looks her beautiful hair
....it was beautiful indeed a year ago
It was like spun gold when I left you.
But she is no longer the same Abigail Paris that you
knew
Why....father!....
Be careful Sir; metaphors and poetry are not for
babes and sucklings....
You be a good man after all....baint you Sir?
continued
she, getting more confidence at every breath, now
that she found the Shape willing to let her go whenever
she chose to go. You be a good man after all Sir....
baint you Sir?
I hope so dear.
You never torments the people, do you? Leaning
with her whole weight upon his knee, letting go her
father's
coat, and shaking her abundant hair loose.
I!....no indeed I hope not....I should be very sorry to
torment the people.
Would you though?
Yes dear....
Uncle Georgee! said the child in a whisper that
sounded like a whisper of joy....dear uncle George....and
he drew her into his lap, and she put her mouth close to
his ear and repeated the words again, so that they went
into his heartO, I do love you, uncle Georgee!
Having passed a whole hour in examing the two little
sufferers (whom he left asleep in each other's arms) he
went away utterly confounded by their behaviour, and
with little hope of reaching the truth; for if Abigail Paris
and Bridget Pope were what they seemed to be....what
they undoubtedly were indeed,innocent as the dove
how could he say after all, that they were
not
bewitched
?
Still however there was one hope. That which
17*
he saw might proceed from disease or from fear, the
natural growth in that age and among that people, of a
solitary situation. But if so, what was he to think of
others, who had a like faith, and yet lived in a populous
neighborhood and were cheerful and happy? Anxious
to arrive at the truth, he set off immediately to see
Rachel
and Elizabeth Dyer, knowing that under their quiet
roof, he should be at peace, though he failed to procure
what he needed....further information about her who had
abused the people and the judges with a tremendous
forgery.
CHAPTER XVI.
He was not altogether disappointed. Rachel Dyer
knew much of the woman who had fabricated the story
of the spindle and sheet, and was only waiting for proof
to impeach her for it, face to face, before the people and
the judges. Her name was Hubbard; she was in the
prime of life, with a good share of beauty; bold, crafty
and sly, and very much feared by those who believed
her story; and Rachel Dyer, though a woman of tried
worth and remarkable courage, was unwilling to appear
against her, till she could do so with a certainty of
success
,
for it would be a fearful stake to play for, and she
knew itnothing less than life to lifeher life against
that of Judith Hubbard.
But though she knew this, having been very familiar
with the aspect of peril from her youth, and being aware
that she was looked up to with awe by the multitude
not so much with fear, as with a sort of religious awe
great love mingled with a secret, mysterious veneration
as the chief hope of her grandmother, Mary Dyer, the
prophetess and the martyrshe determined to play for
that stake.
She knew well what a wager of death was, and she
knew well the worth of her own life. But she knew
what was expected of her, and of what she was capable,
in a period of general and sore perplexity and sorrow;
for twice already in her short life she had approved her
her high relationship to the martyr, and the sincerity of
her faith as one of that people, who, when they were
smitten of one cheek, turned the other, and who, when
they were reviled,reviled not again,by going forth into
the great woods of North-America, while they were
beset
with exasperated savages and with untamed
creatures
of blood, forever on the track of their prey, to
intercede
for those who had been carried off into captivity
by the red heathen....pursuing her fearful path by night
and by day....in winter and in summer....and always
alone....to prove her faith; and prevailing in each case
where there seemed to be no sort of hope, and thereby
preserving to the colony eight of her precious youth; and
among others, one who had despitefully used her a little
time before, and whose grandfather was reputed to have
been the real cause of her beloved grandmother's death.
When Burroughs arrived at the door, and laid his
hand upon the rude latch, he started, for the door flew
open of itself; there was no lock on it, no fastening,
neither bolt nor bar. He found the two sisters with a
large book open before them, and Rachel reading to
Elizabeth in a low voice, with her arm about her neck.
How now? said he.
They gave him a hearty cheerful shake of the hand;
but he observed, or thought he observed a slight change
of colour in the face of Rachel, as he turned his eye to
the book and saw a paragraph with her name in it.
You were reading, said he, as he drew up a chair to
the table. Go on, if you please.
Thank thee, George; we had nearly finished....
What are you reading, pray?
We were just reading the beautiful story of....why,
Rachel Dyer....if thee ain't a goin' to shet up the book
afore we are half done with the chapter! said Elizabeth,
jumping up with a look of surprise....well, I do think!
Rachel turned away her head with a somewhat hasty
motion, pushed the book toward Elizabeth, and sat back
as far as she could possibly get into her grandmother's
huge arm-chair; but she made no reply, and Elizabeth
saw that something was the matter.
Thee's not well, I'm afeard, sister....dear sister, said
she, going up to her and throwing her arms about her
neck, and kissing her as a child would kiss a mother.
Rachel burst into tears.
Why! exclaimed Elizabeth....why!....what is the
matter
with thee, Rachel......thee turns away thy head....
thee will not look at me....what have I done, I beseech
thee, dear sister....what have I done to grieve thee?
Speak to her, George....do speak to her....I never saw her
in this way before.
Poor soul, said he, going up to her and speaking with
visible emotion; but as he drew near and would have
put his hand upon hers, like a brother, she pulled it
away; and then as if suddenly recollecting herself, she
rose up, and after a short struggle, turned to him with a
smile that affected him even more than her tears, and
spoke to him very kindly, and put her hand into his, and
prepared to finish the chapter. It was the story of the
patriarch, who, after cheating his father in his old age,
and betraying his brother Esau, went away into the land
of the people of the East, where in due course of time he
was overreached and betrayed by his mother's brother;
and the voice of the reader was firm and clear, and her
look steady, till she came to these words
And Laban had two daughters: the name of the
elder
was Lear, and the name of the younger was Rachel.
Lear was tender-eyed, but Rachel....
Her voice quavered now, and she proceeded with
visible effort and hurry.
But Rachel was
beautiful and well favored. And
Jacob loved Rachel
.
A moment moreand she recovered her voice
entirely
,
and finished the chapter without a sign of
emotion
,
as if she knew in her own soul that Burroughs
and Elizabeth were watching her as they had never
watched her before.
Strange moralitysaid he, as they laid the Book
aside. This patriarch, and others who happen to have
been greatly favored in that age by the God of the
patriarchs
were guilty of more than we, with our
short-sighted
notions of propriety, should be very willing
either
to overlook or forgive
George Burroughs
My dear friendwhat I say is very true, and to
pass over David,the man after God's own heart, I would
ask you whether he who cheated his father and his
brother, by the help of his mother, while he was yet a
youth, and as he grew up laid before the stronger cattle
the rods which he had peeledas we have it in the
Bookand suffered the cattle that were weakas we
read there---to conceive in their own way, so that the
feebler were Laban's cattle and the stronger Jacob's....
whether he, I say....
I see no advantage in this....we have a faith of our
own, said Rachel, interrupting him with a mild
seriousness
which he dared not contend with. I pray thee to
spare us,and thyself George....
Are we not to bear witness to the truth, Rachel?
It may be the truth George, but....glancing at
Elizabeth
who sat as if she expected the roof to fall in, or the
earth to give way under their feet and swallow them up
for their dreadful impiety....some truths we know are
for the strong, and some for the weak.
Ah....what was that! cried Elizabeth catching at
her sister's arm.
Poor child....there George there....thee sees the
effect
of thy truth....why, Lizzy!
O I did hear something....I did, I did! continued
Elizabeth, clinging to her sister and fixing her eyes
upon
the roof. O I'm sure there's something up there.
Well, and what if there is, pray? What's thee afraid
of?....Is the arm of our Father shortened or his power
shrunk, that we are not safe?
Nay nay Rachel....no wonder she's afraid. You are
lying asleep as it were, in the very path-way of the
prowling savage and the beast of blood, with no lock
on your outer-door, not so much as a wooden bolt, with
no sort of security for you, by day or by night; and all
this in a time of war, and you living on the outskirts of
the wood....why it's no better than tempting
Providence
,
Rachel Dyer.....
Just what I say....said Elizabeth....
And I am sorry to hear thee say so....
Nay nay Rachel....why so grave? I confess to you
that I should not like to live as you do....
I dare say, George....
It would be impossible for me to sleep....
No no....not impossible.
And I should expect a savage or a bear to drop in,
every hour of the day....
Thee wouldn't always be disappointed George.
And every hour of the night, Rachel, without
ceremony
.
We disregard ceremony, George.
Why, what are you made of Rachel Dyer....
Of earth, George.
Not of common earth....
George Burroughs!
But of a truth now, are you not afraid of a call some
one of these dark nights from a stray savage, a Pequod,
or a Mohawkor an Iroquois?
She smiled.
Are you not? We are at open war now with half
the tribes of the North.
No....and why should I be? I know them all and they
know that Elizabeth and I are what they call
poo-ka-kee
....
Poor quakers, hey?....
Yes, and thee may be very sure that we have not
much to be in fear of when I tell thee....prepare thyself
George....that hardly a day goes over without my seeing
some one or two of thy tribe, or of the Iroquois.
What! cried the preacher, leaping out of the chair
and looking up at the roof....there may be somebody
there now.
Not up there George....
Where then?
It would be no easy matter for me to say: for
whoever
it is, he will not appear till thee is gone...why, what's
thee afraid of?....and then he will open the door as thee
did, and walk in. Thee may put up thy knife George,
and lay down thy staff....they'll never cross thy path,
nor harm a hair of thy head....
How can I be sure of that?
By believing what I say to thee.
I know the savages better than you do, my dear friend.
I have my doubts, George. They never harmed a
visiter of mine yet, neither going or coming; and I have
had not a few of their mortal foes under my roof while
they were lying within bow-shot of the door. Be assured
of what I say....thee has nothing to fear....
Would we let thee come, George, if it wasn't very
safe? asked Elizabeth.
Forgive me, said he, forgive me; and his eyes
flashed
18
fire, and Elizabeth hid her face, and Rachel turned
away her head.
Why, how now? said he, looking at both in
astonishment
,
you appear to have a
He stopped short....he had an idea that he knew the
character of both sisters well; he had been acquainted
with Mary Elizabeth from her childhood up, and with
her grave sister from her youth up, and he had always
perceived that there was a something in the nature of
both, but especially in that of Rachel Dyer, unlike the
nature of anybody else that he ever knew; but he had
never been so puzzled by either as he was now
I hope I have not offended you? said he, at last.
Do
thee
feel safe George?
Yes....but you are not safe....ah, you may smile and
shake your head, but you are not safe. How do you
think the authorities of the land will endure to be told
that you are on such familiar terms with the foe? Have
a care....you will get yourself into trouble, if you don't.
Make thyself easy George. We are quite safe; we
belong to neither side in the war, and both sides know
it. By abiding here, I am able to do much good....
As how, pray?
By showing that I am not afraid to trust to the
good-faith
of savages; by showing them that they are safe in
trusting to
my
good-faith, and above all, that weapons
of war, whatever thee may say, George, are not
necessary
to them who put their trust in the Lord....
What if we were to entrap some of your visiters
without
your knowledge?
It would be no easy matter. They guard every path
I do believe, that leads to my door....
Every path....
Yes....and let me tell thee now, that if it should ever
happen to thee to go astray in these woods, thee will
have nothing to fear so long as thee pursues a path
which leads to my door....if thee should miss thy way,
inquire aloud, and thee will be safe....
How so?
Thee will be overheard....
You astonish me.
And guarded, if it be necessary....
Guarded!....
Up to my very door....thee can hardly put faith in
what I say. Do thee know George, that to be a
poo-ka-kee
,is
to bear a charmed life, as thee would say, not only
here, but in the great wilderness? Do thee know too,
that among the tribes of the north, it is a common thing
to charge a captive with cruelty to the quakers.
I do....and I have heard every cry of a pale man at
the stake answered by....Ah ha! what for you farver 'im
choke-a poo-ka-kee-ooman?
Poor soul....
They alluded I suppose to your grandmother. How
you like em dat? said a Mohawk chief, putting his belt
round the neck of another, and pulling it just hard
enough to choke him a little. Ah ha!....what for you do
so?....You choke-a poo-ka-kee ooman, hey?....you kill
um 'gin? ah ha....
No, no George....no, no....I can't bear to hear thee....it
reminds me of the poor youth I saved. They frightened
him almost to death before they would give him up, only
because they had a tradition in their tribe that his
grandfather
was in some way, the cause of my grandmother's
death; and I am quite sure that he would not have been
given up to anybody but me......well....
Hark....hark! said Elizabeth, interrupting her sister.
Well, what now?
I heard a voice....
A voice....where....when....what was it like?
Like the voice of a woman, a great way off
A female panther I dare say....it's high time to look
to the door.
There....there....oh, it's close to the door now!
A low sweet voice could be distinctly heard now, but
whether on the roof or up the chimney, or at the
window
or the door, it was quite impossible to say.
18*
CHAPTER XVII.
The preacher drew forth a knife, and went up to the
door.
Sir....sir....you are wanted Sir....right away Sir, said
a low voice at his elbow....
Who are you?....where are you? cried he....but the
blood curdled about his heart, and he recoiled from the
sound as he spoke.
Here I be....here....here.
Elizabeth dropped on her knees and hid her face in
the lap of her sister; and Rachel, who was not of a
temper to be easily frightened, gathered her up and
folded her arms about her,as if struck to the heart with
a mortal fear. But Burroughs, after fetching a breath
or two, went back to the door and stood waiting for the
voice to be heard again.
What are you?speak
where
are you?
Here I be, said the invisible creature.
And who are you---what are you? cried Burroughs
running up to the door, and then to the window, and
then to the fire-place, and then back to the window, and
preparing to push the slide away---
Here I be sir---here---here---
Well---if ever!---cried Rachel. Why don't thee go
to the door George---starting up and leaving poor
Elizabeth
on her knees. Why! thee may be sure there's
something the matter---going to the door a-tip-toe.
No no Rachel---no no; it may be a stratagem---
A stratagem for what pray?---what have we to fear?
The door flew open as she spoke, and a boy entered
all out of breath, his neck open, his hat gone, his jacket
off, and his hair flying loose---
Why, Robert Eveleth---
O Sirsir! said he, as soon as he could speak---O
sir I've come to tell you---didn't you never see a
Belzebub
?---
A what?---
If you never did, now's your time; just look out o'the
door there, and you'll see a plenty on 'em.
Why, Robert---Robert---what ails the boy?
No matter now, aunt Rachel---you're wanted Sir---
they're all on the look-out for you now---you're a goin' to
be tried to-morrow for your life---I come here half an
hour ago to tell you so---but I saw one o' the Shapes
here right by the winder...
A what?
A Shapean' so d'ye see, I cleared out....and so,
and sothe sooner you're off, the better; they're a goin'
to swear
your
life away, now
His life, murmured Elizabeth.
My lifeminehow do you know this, boy?
How do I know it Sir?well enough....they've been
over and waked Bridgy Pope, and want her to say so
tooand she and Abbythey sent me off here to tell
you to get away as fast as ever you can, all three of
you, if you don't want to swing for it, afore you know
where you be
Robert Eveleth!
O, it's all very true Sir, an' you may look as black as
a thunder-cloud, if you please, but if you don't get away,
and youand youevery chip of you, afore day-light,
you'll never eat another huckleberry-puddin' in this
world, and you may swear to that, all hands of you, as
we say aboard ship....
Robert Eveleth, from what I saw of you the other
day
Can't help that Sir....you've no time to lose now,
either
of you; you do as I say now, an' I'll hear you preach
whenever you like, arter you're all safeno, no, you
needn't trouble yourself to take a chairif you stop to
set down, it's fifty to five an' a chaw o' tobacco, 't you
never git up agin....why!....there's Mary Wa'cote and
that air Judith Hubbard you see....(lowering his voice)
an' I don't know how many more o' the Shapes out there
in the wood waitin' for you....
Poh.
Lord, what a power o' faces I did see! when the
moon came out, as I was crackin' away over the path by
the edge o' the wood....I've brought you father's grey
stallion, he that carried off old Ci Carter when the
Mohawks
were out....are you all ready?
All ready?
Yes, allallyou're in for't too, Lizzy Dyer, and so
are you, aunt Rachelan' soand soshall I bring up
the horse?
No
Noyes, but I will though, by faith!
Robert!
Why Robert, thee makes my blood run cold
Never you mind for that, Lizzy Dyer.
Robert Eveleth, I am afraid thy going to sea a trip or
two, hath made thee a naughty boy, as I told thy mother
it would.
No no, aunt Rachel, no no, don't say so; we never
swear a mouthful when we're out to sea, we never ketch
no fish if we dobut here am I; all out o' breath now,
and you wont stir a peg,for all I can say or do and be
gulp to you!
Here Burroughs interrupted the boy, and after
informing
the sisters of what had occurred while he was
with Mr. Paris and the poor children, he made the boy
go over the whole story anew, and having done so, he
became satisfied in his own soul, that if the conspirators
were at work to destroy the poor girl before him, there
would be no escape after she was once in their power.
Be of good cheer, Elizabeth, said he, and as he spoke,
he stooped down to set his lips to her forehead.
GeorgeGeorgewe have no time to losewhat
are we to do? said Rachel, putting forth her hand
eagerly
so as to stay him before he had reached the brow
of Elizabeth; and then as quickly withdrawing it, and
faltering out a word or two of self-reproach.
If you think as I do, dear Rachel, the sooner she is
away the better.
I do think as thee doesI do, George....(in this
matter
.)
Go for the black mare, as fast as thee can move,
Robert Eveleth.
Where shall I find her....it's plaguy dark now, where
there's no light.
On thy left hand as the door slips away; thee'll find
a cloth and a side-saddle over the crib, with astop,
stopwill the grey horse bear a pillion?
Yesforty.
If he will not, however, the mare will....so be quick,
Robert, be quick....
Away bounded the boy.
She has carried both of us before to-day, and safely too,
when each had a heavier load upon her back than we
both have now. Get thee ready sisterfor my own
partIwell George, I have been looking for sorrow
and am pretty well prepared for it, thee sees. I knew
four months ago that I had wagered my life against
Judith
Hubbard's lifeI am sorry for JudithI should be
sorry to bring her to such great shame, to say nothing
of death, and were it not for others, and especially for
that poor child, (pointing to Elizabeth) I would rather
lay down my own lifemuch rather, if thee'll believe
me George, than do her the great mischief that I now
fear must be done to her, if our Elizabeth is to escape
the snare.
I
do
believe youare you ready?
Quite ready; but why do thee stand there, as if thee
was not going too?or as if thee had not made up thy
mind?
AhI thought I saw a face
I dare say thee did; but thee's not afraid of a face, I
hope?
I hear the sound of horses' feet
How now?it is not for such as thee to be slow of
resolve.
He drew a long breath
Georgethee is going with us?
No, RachelI'd better stay here.
Here! shrieked Elizabeth.
Here!what do thee mean, George? asked her
sister
.
I mean what I sayjust what I sayit is for me to
abide here.
For thee to abide here? If it is the duty of one, it is
the duty of another, said Elizabeth in a low, but very
decided voice.
No, Elizabeth Dyer, noI am able to bear that which
ought never to be expected of you.
Do thee mean death, George?we are not very much
afraid of death, said Rachelare we Elizabeth?
Nonot very much
You know not what you say. I am a preacher of the
gospelwhat may be very proper for me to do, may be
very improper for a young beautiful
George Burroughs
Forgive me Rachel
I do....prepare thyself, my dear Elizabeth, gird up thy
loins; for the day of travail and bitter sorrow is nigh to
thee.
Here am I sister! And ready to obey thee at the risk
of my life. What am I to do?
I advise thee to fly, for if they seek thy death, it is for
my sakeI shall go too.
Dear sister
Well?
Stoop thy head, I pray thee, continued Elizabeth
II(in a whisper)I hope he'll go with thee.
With me?
With us, I mean
Why not say so?
How could I?
Mary Elizabeth Dyer!
Nay naywe should be safer with him
Our safety is not in George Burroughs, maiden.
But we should find our way in the dark better.
Rachel made no reply, but she stood looking at her
sister, with her lips apart and her head up, as if she
were were going to speak, till her eyes ran over, and
then she fell upon her neck and wept aloud for a single
moment, and then arose and, with a violent effort, broke
away from Elizabeth, and hurried into their little
bedroom
,
where she staid so long that Elizabeth followed
herand the preacher soon heard their voices and their
sobs die away, and saw the linked shadows of both in
prayer, projected along the white roof.
A moment more and they came out together, Rachel
with a steady look and a firm step, and her sister with a
show of courage that awed him.
Thee will go with us now, I hope, said Rachel.
He shook his head.
I pray thee Georgedo not thou abide hereby going
with us thee may have it in thy power to help ain
short, we have need of thee George, and thee had better
go, even if thee should resolve to come back and
outface
whatever may be said of thee
What if I see an angel in my path?
Do that which to thee seemeth goodI have no more
to saythe greater will be thy courage, the stronger the
presumption of thy innocence, however, should thee
come back, after they see thee in safetywhat do thee
say Elizabeth?
I didn't speak, RachelbutbutO I
do
wish he
would go.
I shall come back if I live, said Burroughs.
Nay nay Georgethee may not see thy way clear to
do so
Hourra there, hourra! cried Robert Eveleth,
popping
his head in at the door. Here we be all three of
uswhat are you at now?why aint you ready?
what are you waitin' for?
Georgeit has just occurred to me that if I stay here,
I may do Elizabeth more good than if I go with you
having it in my power to escape, it may be of weight in
her favor
Fiddle-de-dee for your proof cried Robert Eveleth
that, for all your proof! snapping his fingersthat for
all the good you can do ElizabethI say, Mr.
Burroughs
a
word with you
Burroughs followed him to a far part of the room.
If you know when you are well off, said the boy
make her goyou may both stay, you and Elizabeth too,
without half the risk; but as for aunt Rachel, why as
sure as you're a breathin' the breath o' life now, if you
don't get her away, they'll have her up with a short turn;
and if you know'd all, you'd say soI said 'twas
you
when I fuss come, for I didn't like to frighten herbut
the fact is you are only one out o' the three, and I'd
rather have your chance now, than either o' their'n
Why? Robert
Hushhush you stoop down your head here, an'
I'll satisfy you o' the truth o' what I say....Barbara
Snow, and Judy Hubbard have been to make oath,
and they wanted Bridgy Pope to make oath toothey'd
do as much for her they saidhow 't you come to
their bed-side about a week ago, along with a witch that
maybe you've heerd ofa freckled witch with red hair
and a big hump on her back
No nocried the preacher, clapping his hand over
the boy's mouth and hastily interchanging a look with
Elizabeth, whose eyes filled with a gush of sorrow,
when she thought of her bave good sister, and of what
she would feel at the remark of the boy....a remark, the
bitter truth of which was made fifty times more bitter
by his age, and by the very anxiety he showed to keep
it away from her quick sensitive ear.
But Rachel was not like Elizabeth; for though she
heard the remark, she did not even change color, but
went up to the boy, and put both arms about his neck
with a smile, and gave him a hearty kiss....and bid him
be a good boy, and a prop for his widowed mother.
A moment more and they were all on their way. It
was very dark for a time, and the great wilderness
through which their path lay, appeared to overshadow
the whole earth, and here and there to shoot up a
multitude
of branchesupupinto the very skywhere
19
the stars and the moon appeared to be adrift, and
wallowing
on their way through a sea of shadow.
Me go too? said a voice, apparently a few feet off, as
they were feeling for a path in the thickest part of the
wood.
The preacher drew up as if an arrow had missed him.
Who are you? said he
No no, George....let me speak
Do you know the voice?
Nobut I'm sure 'tis one that I have heard before.
Me go toohigh!
No.
Where you go?high!
Rachel pointed with her hand.
Are you afraid to tell? asked the preacher, looking
about in vain for somebody to appear.
I have told himI pointed with my hand
But how could he see thy hand such a dark night?
said Elizabeth.
As
you
would see it in the light of day, said the
preacher.
Highhighme better go toopoo-ka-kee.
No, noI'd rather not, whoever thee iswe are quite
safe
Nono, said the voice, and here the conversation
dropped, and they pursued their way for above an hour,
at a brisk trot, and were already in sight of a path which
led to the Providence Plantations, their city of refuge
Highhighme hear um people, cried the same
voice. You no safe much.
And so do I, cried Burroughs. I hear the tread of
people afar offno, no, 'tis a troop of horsewho are
youcome out and speak to uswhat are we to do?
the moon is out now.
High, poo-kakee, high!
Yescome here if thee will, and say what we are to do.
Before the words were well out of her mouth, a young
savage appeared in the path, a few feet from the head
of her horse, and after explaining to her that she was
pursued by a troop, and that he and six more of the tribe
were waiting to know whether she wanted their help, he
threw aside his blanket and showed her, that although
he was in the garb of a swift-runner, he did not lack for
weapons of war.
No, no, not for the world poor youth! cried the
woman
of peace, when her eye caught the glitter of the
knife, the tomahawk and the short gunI pray thee to
leave us....do leave usdo, do!speak to him George
....he does not appear to understand what I say
entreat
him to leave us.
Highhigh! said the young warrior, and off he
bounded for the sea-shore, leaving them to pursue their
opposite path in quietness. Rachel and Elizabeth were
upon a creature that knew, or appeared to know every
step of the way; but the young high-spirited horse
the preacher rode, had become quite unmanageable, now
that the moon was up, the sky clear, and the shadows
darting hither and thither about her path. At last they
had come to the high roadtheir peril was overand
they were just beginning to speak above their breath,
when Burroughs heard a shot fired afar off
Hushhushdon't move; don't speak for your lives,
cried he, as the animal reared and started away from
the path.....soh, sohI shall subdue him in a moment
harkthat is the tread of a horseanotherand
another, by my lifewoa!woa!
My heart misgives me, Georgethat youth
Ahanother shotwe are pursued by a troop, and
that boy is picking them off
O Father of mercies! I hope not.
Stay you hereI'll be back in a momentwoa
woa!
GeorgeGeorge
Don't be alarmedstay where you arekeep in the
shadow, and if I do not come back immediately, or it
you see me pursued, or ifwoa, woaor if you see
the mare prick up her ears, don't wait for me, but make
the best of your way over that hill yonderwoa!
keep out o' the high road and you are safe.
Saying this, he rode off without waiting for a reply,
intending to follow in the rear of the troop, and to lead
them astray at the risk of his life, should they appear to
be in pursuit of the fugitives. He had not gone far,
when his horse, hearing the tread of other horsesa
heavy tramp, like that of a troop of cavalry on the
charge, sounding through the still midnight air, gave a
loud long neigh. It was immediately answered by four
or five horses afar off, and by that on which the poor
girls were mounted.
The preacher saw that there was but one hope now,
and he set off at full speed therefore, intending to cross
the head of the troop and provoke them to a chase; the
manuvre succeeded until they saw that he was alone,
after which they divided their number, and while one
party pursued him, another took its way to the very spot
where the poor girls were abiding the issue. He and
they both were capturedthey were all three taken
alivethough man after man of the troop fell from his
horse, by shot after shot from a foe that no one of the
troop could see, as they galloped after the fugitives.
They were all three carried back to Salem, Burroughs
prepared for the worst, Rachel afraid only for Elizabeth,
and Elizabeth more dead than alive.
But why seek to delay the catastrophe? Why pause
upon that, the result of which every body can foresee?
They put him upon trial on the memorable fifth day of
August (1692) in the midst of the great thunder-storm.
Having no proper court of justice in the
Plymouth-colony
at this period, they made use of a
Meeting-House
for the procedure, which lasted all one day and
a part of the following nighta night never to be
forgotten
by the posterity of them that were alive at the
time. He was pale and sick and weary, but his bearing
was that of a good manthat of a brave man too, and
yet he shook as with an ague, when he saw arrayed
against him, no less than eight confessing witches, five
or six distempered creatures who believed him to be the
cause of their malady, Judith Hubbard, a woman whose
character had been at his mercy for a long while (He
knew that of her, which if he had revealed it before she
accused him, would have been fatal to her) John Ruck
his own brother-in-law, two or three of his early and
very dear friends of the church, in whom he thought he
could put all trust, and a score of neighbors on whom
he would have called at any other time to speak in his
favor. What was he to believe now?what
could
he
believe? These witnesses were not like Judith
Hubbard
;
they had not wronged him, as she hadthey
were neither hostile to him, nor afraid of him in the way
she was afraid of him. They were about to take away
his life under a deep sense of duty to their Father above.
His heart swelled with agony, and shookand
stopped
,
when he saw thisand a shadow fell, or appeared
to fall on the very earth about him. It was the shadow
of another world.
19*
CHAPTER XVIII.
A brief and faithful account of the issue....a few words
more, and the tale of sorrow is done. The confessing
witches testified, to give the language of a writer who
was an eye-witness of the trial that the prisoner had
been at witch-meetings with them, and had seduced and
compelled them to the snares of witchcraft; that he
promised them fine clothes for obeying him; that he
brought poppets to them and thorns to stick into the
poppets
for afflicting other people, and that he exhorted
them to bewitch all Salem-Village, but to do it gradually.
Among the bewitched, all of whom swore that
Burroughs
had pursued them for a long while under one
shape or another, were three who swore that of him
which they swore of no other individual against whom
they appeared. Their story was that he had the power
of becoming invisible, that he had appeared to them
under
a variety of shapes in a single day, that he would
appear
and disappear while they were talking together
actually vanish away while their eyes were upon him, so
that sometimes they could hear his voice in the air, in
the earth, or in the sea, long and long after he himself
had gone out of their sight. They were evidently afraid
of him, for they turned pale when he stood up, and
covered
their faces when he looked at them, and stopped
their ears when he spoke to them. And when the judges
and the elders of the land saw this, they were satisfied of
his evil power, and grew mute with terror.
One of the three chief accusers, a girl, testified that in
her
agony
, a little black man appeared to her, saying
that his name was George Burroughs, and bid her set
her name to a book which he had with him, bragging at
the time that he was a conjuror high above the ordinary
rank of witches. Another swore that in
her
agony, he
persuaded her to go to a sacrament, where they saw him
blowing a trumpet and summoning other witches
therewith
from the four corners of the earth. And a third
swore, on recovering from a sort of trance before the
people, that he had just carried her away into the top of
a high mountain, where he showed her mighty and
glorious
kingdoms which he offered to give her, if she would
write in the book. But she refused.
Nor did they stop here. They charged him with
practices too terrible for language to describe. And
what were the rulers to say? Here was much to
strengthen
a part of the charge. His abrupt appearance at the
trial of Sarah Good, his behaviour, his look of premature
agethat look whereof the people never spoke but with
a whisper, as if they were afraid of being overheard
that extraordinary voicethat swarthy complexion
that bold haughty carriagethat wonderful power of
wordswhat were they to believe? Where had he
gathered
so much wisdom? Where had he been to acquire
thatwhatever it was, with which he was able to
overawe
and outbrave and subdue everything and everybody?
All hearts were in fearall tongues mute before him.
Deatheven death he was not afraid of. He mocked
at deathhe threw himself as it were, in the very
chariotway
of the king of Terrors; and what cared he for the
law?
His behavior to the boy, his critical reproduction of
the knife-blade, whereby their faith in a tried accuser
was actually shaken, his bright fierce look when the
people
gave way at his approach....his undaunted smile
when the great black horse appeared looking in over the
heads of the people, who crowded together and hurried
away with a more than mortal fear....and his remarkable
words when the judge demanded to know by what
authority
he was abroad....all these were facts and
circumstances
within the knowledge of the court. By the
authority
of the
Strong Man
, said he; who was that
Strong Man
? By authority of
one
who hath endowed
me with great power; who was that ONE?
Yet more. It was proved by a great number of
respectable
and worthy witnesses, who appeared to pity
the prisoner, that he, though a small man, had lifted a
gun of seven feet barrel with one hand behind the lock
and held it forth, at arm's length; nay, that with only
his fore-finger in the barrel he did so, and that in the
same party appeared a savage whom nobody knew, that
did the same.
This being proved, the court consulted together, and
for so much gave judgment before they proceeded any
further in the trial, that George Burroughs had been
aided and assisted then and there by the Black Man,
who was near in a bodily shape.
And it being proved that he made nothing of other
facts, requiring a bodily strength such they had never
seen nor heard of, it was adjudged further by the same
court, after a serious consultation, that George
Burroughs
had a devil.
And after this, it being proved that one day when he
lived at Casco, he and his wife and his brother-in-law,
John Ruck, went after strawberries together to a place
about three miles off, on the way to Sacarappa
Burroughs
on foot and they on horseback, Burroughs left
them and stepped aside into the bushes; whereupon
they halted and hallowed for him, but he not making
them any reply, they went homeward with a quick pace,
not expecting to see him for a considerable time; but
when they had got near, whom should they see but
Burroughs himself with a basket of strawberries newly
gathered, waiting for his wife, whom he child for what
she had been saying to her brother on the road; which
when they marvelled at, he told them he knew their very
thoughts; and Ruck saying that was more than the
devil himself could know, he answered with heat,
saying
Brother and wife, my God makes known your
thoughts to me: all this being proved to the court, they
consulted together as before and gave judgment that
Burroughs had stepped aside only that by the
assistance
of the Black Man he might put on his invisibility
and in that fascinating mist, gratify his own jealous
humor
to hear what they said of him.
Well prisoner at the bar, said the chief judge, after the
witnesses for the crown had finished their testimony
what have you to say for yourself?
Nothing.
Have you no witnesses?
Not one.
And why not?
Of what use could they be?
You needn't be so stiff though; a lowlier carriage in
your awful situation might be more becoming. You
are at liberty to cross-examine the witness, if you are
so disposed
I am not so disposed.
And you may address the jury now, it being your
own case.
I have nothing to say....it being my own case.
Ah! sighed the judge, looking about him with a
portentous
gravityYou see the end of your tether now....
you see now that He whom you serve is not to be
trusted
.
It is but the other day you were clad with power
as with a garment. You were able to make a speech
whereby, but for the mercy of God
I was not on trial for
my
life when I made that
speech. I have something else to think of now....Let
me die in peace.
Ah, sighed the chief judge, and all his brethren
shook their heads with a look of pity and sorrow.
But as if this were not enoughas if they were afraid
he might escape after all (for it had begun to grow very
dark over-head) though the meshes of death were about
him on every side like a net of iron; as if the very
judges were screwed up to the expectation of a terrible
issue, and prepared to deal with a creature of
tremendous
power, whom it would be lawful to destroy any
how, no matter how, they introduced another troop of
witnesses, who swore that they had frequently heard the
two wives of the prisoner say that their house which
stood in a very cheerful path of the town was haunted
by evil spirits; and after they had finished their
testimoney
Judith Hubbard swore that the two wives of the
prisoner had appeared to her, since their death, and
charged him with murder....
Repeat the story that you told brother Winthrop and
me, said Judge Sewall.
Whereupon she stood forth and repeated the story she
had sworn to before the committal of Burroughs
repeated
it in the very presence of God, and of his angels
repeated it while it thundered and lightened in her
face, and the big sweat rolled off the forehead of a man,
for whose love, but a few years before, she would have
laid down her life
That man was George Burroughs. He appeared as
if his heart were broken by her speech, though about his
mouth was a patient proud smilefor near him were
Mary Elizabeth Dyer and Rachel Dyer, with their eyes
fixed upon him and waiting to be called up in their turn
to abide the trial of death; but so waiting before their
judges and their accusers that, women though they were,
he felt supported by their presence, trebly fortified by
their brave bearingElizabeth palevery pale, and
watching his look as if she had no hope on earth but in
him, no fear but for himRachel standing up as it were
with a new statureup, with her forehead flashing to
the sky and her coarse red hair shining and shivering
about her huge head with a frightful fixed gleamher
cap off, her cloak thrown aside and her distorted shape, for
the first time, in full view of the awe-struck multitude.
Every eye was upon herevery thoughther youthful
and exceedingly fair sister, the pride of the
neighborhood
was overlooked now, and so was the prisoner at
the bar, and so were the judges and the jury, and the
witnesses and the paraphernalia of death. It was
Rachel
Dyerthe red-haired witchthe freckled witch
the hump-backed witch they saw nowbut they saw not
her ugliness, they saw not that she was either unshapely
or unfair. They saw only that she was brave. They
saw that although she was a woman upon the very
threshold of eternity, she was not afraid of the aspect of
death.
And the story that Judith Hubbard repeated under
such circumstances and at such a time wasthat the
two wives of the prisoner at the bar, who were buried
years and years before, with a show of unutterable
sorrow
,
had appeared to her, face to face, and charged him
with having been the true cause of their death; partly
promising if he denied the charge, to reappear in full
court. Nor should I wonder if they did, whispered the
chief judge throwing a hurried look toward the graves
which lay in full view of the judgment seat, as if he
almost
expected to see the earth open.
The multitude who saw the look of the judge, and
who were so eager but a few minutes before to get nigh
the prisoner, though it were only to hear him breathe,
now recoiled from the bar, and left a free path-way from
the graveyard up to the witness-box, and a visible quick
shudder ran throughout the assembly as they saw the
judges consult together, and prepare to address the
immoveable
man, who stood upwhatever were the true
cause, whether he felt assured of that protection which
the good pray for night and day, or of that which the
evil and the mighty among the evil have prepared for,
when they enter into a league of deathupas if he
knew well that they had no power to harm either him or
his.
What say you to that? said major Saltonstall. You
have heard the story of Judith Hubbard. What say
you to a charge like that, Sir?
Ay, ayno evasion will serve you now, added the
Lieutenant Governor.
Evasion!
You are afraid, I see
Afraid of what? Manmanit is you and your
fellows
that are afraid. Ye are men of a terrible faithI
am not.
You have only to say yes or no, said Judge Sewall.
What mockery! Ye that have buried them that were
precious to youvery precious
You are not obliged to answer that question,
whispered
the lawyer, who had been at his elbow during the
trial of Martha Corynor any otherunless you like
Ahand are
you
of them that believe the story? Are
you
afraid of their keeping their promise?you that
have a
What say you to the charge? I ask again!
How dare you!ye that are husbandsyou that are
a widower like me, how dare you put such a question as
that to a bereaved man, before the Everlasting God?
What say you to the charge? We ask you for the
third time.
Father of love! cried Burroughs, and he tottered
away and snatched at the bare wall, and shook as if he
were in the agony of death, and all that saw him were
aghast with fear. Menmenwhat would ye have me
say?what would ye have me do?
Whatever the Lord prompteth, said a low voice near
him.
Harkharkwho was that? said a judge. I thought
I heard somebody speak.
It was II, Rachel Dyer! answered the
courageous
woman. It was I. Ye are all in array there
against a fellow-creature's life. Ye have beset him on
every side by the snares of the law....Ye are pressing
him to death
Silence!
No judge, no! I marvel that ye dare to rebuke me in
such a cause, when ye know that ere long I shall be
heard by the Son of Man, coming in clouds with great
glory to judge the quick and the dead
Peace....peace, woman of mischieflook to
yourself
.
Beware Peter! and thou too Elias! Ye know not
how nigh we may all be to the great Barlooking up
to the sky, which was now so preternaturally dark with
the heavy clouds of an approaching thunder-storm, that
torches were ordered. Lo! the pavillion of the Judge
of Judges! How know ye that these things are not
the sign of his hot and sore displeasure?
Mark that, brother; mark that, said a judge. They
20
must know that help is nigh, or they could never brave
it thus.
Whatever they may know brother, and whatever their
help may be, our duty is plain.
Very true brother....ah....how now!
He was interrupted by the entrance of a haggard old
man of a majestic stature, who made his way up to the
witness-box, and stood there, as if waiting for the judge
to speak.
Ah, Matthew Paris.....thou art come, hey? said
Rachel
.
Where is Bridget Pope?
At the point of death.
And thy daughter, Abigail Paris?
Dead.
George....George....we have indeed little to hope
now.....Where is Robert Eveleth?
Here....here I be, cried the boy, starting up at the
sound of her voice, and hurrying forward with a feeble
step.
Go up there to that box. Robert Eveleth, and say to
the judges, my poor sick boy, what thee said to me of
Judith Hubbard and of Mary Walcott, and of their
wicked conspiracy to prevail with Bridget Pope and
Abby Paris, to make oath.....
How now....how now....stop there! cried the
chief-judge
.
What is the meaning of this?
Tell what thee heard them say, Robert
Heard who say? asked the judge.....who....who?
Bridget Pope and Abigail Paris.
Bridget Pope and Abigail Parriswhy what have we
to do with Bridget Pope and Abigail Paris?
I pray thee judge....the maiden Bridget Pope is no
more; the child of that aged man there is at the point
of death. If the boy Robert Eveleth speak true, they
told him before the charge was made
Theywho?
Bridget Pope and Abigail Paris told him
No matter what they told him....that is but hearsay
Well, and if it be hear say?
We cannot receive it; we take no notice of what may
occur in this way
How!If we can prove that the witnesses have
conspired
together to make this charge, is it contrary to
law for you to receive our proof? asked Burroughs.
Pho, phoyou mistake the matter
No judge no....will thee hear the father himself?
said Rachel.
Not in the way that you desire....there would be no
end to this, if we did
What are we to do then judge? We have it in our
power to prove that Judith Hubbard and Mary Walcott
proposed to the two children, Bridget Pope and Abigail
Paris, to swear away the life
Pho, pho, phopho, pho, phoa very stale trick
that. One of the witnesses dead, the other you are told
at the point of death
It is no trick judge; but if....if....supposing it to be
true, that Judith Hubbard and her colleague did this,
how should we prove it?
How should you prove it? Why, by producing the
persons to whom, or before whom, the proposal you
speak of was made.
But if they are at the point of death, judge?
In that case there would be no help for you
Such is the humanity of the law.
No help for us! Not if we could prove that they
who are dead, or at the point of death, acknowledged
what we say to a dear father?can this be the law?
Stopstopthou noble-hearted, brave woman!
cried
Burroughs. They do not speak true. They are
afraid of thee Rachel Dyer. Matthew Paris
Here am I, Lord!
Why, Matthewlook at me....Do you notknow
me?
Nonowho are you?
20*
CHAPTER XIX.
Enoughenoughcried Burroughs, on finding
Matthew
Paris so disturbed in his intellectenoughthere
is not hope now, Rachel. The father himself would
be no witness now, though he had been told by our
witnesses
upon their death-bed, while they expected to die,
just what, if it could be shown here, would be a matter
of life and death to us. But still, before I give up, I
should like to know the meaning of that rule of
evidence
you spoke of the other day, which would appear
to make it necessary for me to produce only the best
evidence which the nature of the case admits of. We
have done that here....a rule which being interpreted by
the men of the law is said to be this....that we are to
give such evidence only, as that none better may appear
to be left behindwe have done that now
We are weary of thiswhat have you to say to the
charge made against you by the apparition of your
wife? Before you reply however, it is our duty to
apprise
you, that whatever you may happen to say in your
own favor will go for nothing
Nevertheless I am ready to reply.
We do not seek to entrap you
So I perceive. Repeat the charge.
You are charged with havingwhat ho, there!
lightslightsmore lights
Lightsmore lights! cried the people, what, ho
there! How dark it grows
And how chill the air is
Ay......and quiet as the grave.
You are charged I say, with having caused the
death of your two wives....who have partly promised, if
you deny the charge, to confront you here.
The people began to press backward from each
other
,
and to gasp for breath.
You have only to say yes or no, and abide the proof.
Indeedis that all?
Yesall
Then...behold me. As he spoke, he threw up his
arms, and walked forth into a broad clear space before
the bench, where every body could hear and see him,
and was about to address the jury, when he was
interrupted
by a crash of thunder that shook the whole house,
and appeared to shake the whole earth. A dreadful
outcry ensued, with flash after flash of lightning and peal
after peal of thunder, and the people dropped upon their
knees half blinded with light and half crazy with terror;
and covered their faces and shrieked with consternation.
Why, what are ye afraid of judges? And you, ye
people
cried
the prisoner, that ye cover your faces, and
fall down with fear....so that if I would, I might escape.
Look to the prisoner there....look to the prisoner.
Ye do all this, ye that have power to judge me,
while I....I the accused man....I neither skulk nor cower.
I stand up....I alone of all this great multitude who are
gathered together to see me perish for my sins....the
Jonah
of this their day of trouble and heavy sorrow.
Not alone, said Rachel Dyer, moving up to the bar.
If not altogether alone, alone but for thee, thou most
heroic woman....O, that they knew thy worth!....And
yet these people who are quaking with terror on every
side of us, bowed down with mortal fear at the voice of
the Lord in the Sky, it is they that presume to deal with
us, who are not afraid of our Father, nor scared by the
flashing of his countenance, for life and for death
Yea George
Be it so
Prisoner at the baryou are trifling with the court...
You have not answered the charge.
Have I not!well thenI prepare to answer it now.
I swear that I loved them that I have buried there
there!loved them with a love passing all that I ever
heard of, or read of. I swear too that I nourished and
comforted and ministered to the dear creatures, who, ye
are told, have come out of the earth to destroy me
even me
me
, their husband, their lover, and the
father of their children! I swear toobut why continue
the terrible outrage? Let my accusers appear! Let them
walk up, if they will, out of their graves!their graves
are before me. I am not afraidI shall not be afraid
so long as they wear the blessed shape, or the blessed
features of them that have disappeared from their bridal
chamber, with a
He was interrupted by great noises and shrieks that
were enough to raise the deadnoises from every part
of the grave-yardshrieks from people afar off in the
wood, shrieks from the multitude on the outside of the
houseand shrieks from the sea-shore; and
immediately
certain of the accusers fell down as if they saw
something approach; and several that were on the
outside
of the meeting-house came rushing in with a
fearful
outcry, saying that a shed which had been built up
over a part of the burial-ground was crowded with
strange faces, and with awful shapes, and that among
them were the two dead wives of the prisoner.
There they gothere they go! screamed other
voices
outside the door; and immediately the cry was
repeated
by the accusers who were within the houseall
shrieking together. Here they come!here they
come!here they come!And Judith Hubbard
looking
up and uncovering her face, about which her cloak
had been gathered in the first hurry of her distraction,
declared that the last wife of Burroughs, on whom her
eyes were fixed at the time, was then actually standing
before him and looking him in the face, O, with such
a lookso calm, so piteous and so terrible!
After the uproar had abated in some degree, the
judges who were huddled together, as far as they
could possibly get from the crowd below, ordered up
three more of the witnesses, and were about to speak to
them, when Burroughs happening to turn that way
also
,
they cried out as if they were stabbed with a knife,
and fell upon the floor at their whole length and were
speechless.
Whereupon the chief judge, turning toward him,
asked
him what hindered these poor people from giving
their testimony.
I do not know said Burroughs, who began to give
way himself now, with a convulsion of the heart, before
the tremendous array of testimony and weight of
delusion
;
to fear that of a truth preternatural shapes were
about him, and that the witnesses were over-persuaded
by irresistible power, though he knew himself to be no
party in the exercise of such power. I do not know,
said he: I am utterly confounded by their behaviour.
It may be the devil.
Ahand why is the devil so loath to have testimony
borne against
you
?
Which query, says a writer who was there at the
time, and saw the look of triumph which appeared in the
faces of the whole bench, did cast Burroughs into
very great confusion.
And well it might, for he was weighed to the earth,
and he knew that whatever he said, and whatever he
did; and whether he spoke with promptitude or with
hesitation; whether he showed or did not show a sign of
dismay, everything would be, and
was
regarded by the
judges, and the jury, and the people, as further
corroboration
of his turpitude.
Here the trial ended. Here the minds of the jury
were made up; and although he grew collected at last,
and arose and spoke in a way that made everybody
about
him weep and very bitterly too, for what they
called
the overthrow of a mind of great wisdom and beauty
and power; and although he gave up to the judges a
written
argument of amazing ingenuity and vigor which is
yet preserved in the records of that people, wherein he
mocked at their faith in witchcraft, and foretold the
grief and the shame, the trouble and the reproach that
were to follow to them that were so busy in the work of
death; yetyetso impressed were the twelve, by the
scene that had occurred before their faces, that they
found him guilty; and as if the judges were afraid of a
rescue from the powers of the air, they gave judgment
of death upon him before they left the bench, and
contrary
to their established practice, ordered him to be
executed on the morrow.
On the morrow? said he, with a firm steady eye and
a clear tone, though his lip quivered as he spoke. Will
ye afford me no time to prepare?
We would not that the body and soul both perish; and
we therefore urge you to be diligent in the work
brother
,
very diligent for the little time that is now left to
make your calling and election sure. Be ready for the
afternoon of the morrow.
Hitherto the prisoner at the bar had shown little or
no emotion; hitherto he had argued and looked as if he
did not believe the jury nor the judges capable of doing
what they had now done, nor the multitude that knew
him, capable of enduring it. Hitherto he had been as it
were a spectator of the terrible farce, with no concern
for the issue; but now....now....all eyes were rivetted
upon him with fear, all thoughts with alarm; for though
he stood up as before, and made no sort of reply to the
judges, and bore the wracking of the heavy irons with
which they were preparing to load him, as if he neither
felt nor saw them; yet was there a something in his
look which made the officers of the court unsheathe their
swords, and lift up their axes, and the people who were
occupied about him, keep as far out of his reach as they
possibly could.
Yet he neither moved nor spoke, till he saw the
women
crowding up to a part of the house where he had seen
Elizabeth Dyer, and stoop as if she that had been
kneeling
there a few moments before, lay very low, and lift
her up as if she had no life in her, and carry her away,
guarded by men with pikes, and with swords and with
huge firelocks. Then he
was
movedand his chains
were felt for the first time, and he would have called out
for a breath of airprayed for a drop of water to save a
life more precious by far than hisbut before he could
open his mouth so as to make himself heard, he saw
Rachel Dyer pressing up to the bar of death, and heard
the judges call out to the high-sheriff and his man to
guard the door, and look to the prisoner.
He will get away if you turn your head, Mr. sheriff,
said one of the judges.
That he will, added a witness, that he will! if you
don't look sharp, as sure as my name is Peter P.
Watch and praywatch and prayadded another.
Burroughs looked up to the bench with surprise, then
at the people, who were watching every motion of his
body as if they expected him to tear away the ponderous
fetters and walk forth as free as the wind of the desert,
and then at the blacksmith who stood near with his
hammer
uplifted in the air; and then his chest heaved and his
chains shook, and the people hurried away from his path,
and tumbled over each other in their eagerness to escape,
and the chief-judge cried out again to the officer to look
to the door and be prepared for a rescue.
Let
me
be tried now! I entreat thee, said Rachel
Dyer
,
throwing up her locked-hands before Judge
Winthrop
,
and speaking as if she was about to plead not for
death but for life. Let me be tried now, I beseech thee.
Now.
Yeanow!before the maiden is brought back to life.
O let her be at peace, ye men of power, till I have a
have a
She gathered herself up now with a strong effort, and
spoke with deliberate firmness....
Till I have gone through the work which is
appointed
for me by the twelve that I see there
Be it so.I say, Mr. high-sheriff!
Well, Mr. judge Winthrop?
This way, this way; you'll be so good as to remove
aaa(Looking at Burroughs who stood leaning
against the wall)you are to be aa(in a whisper of
authority)you are to be careful of what you doa very
hard case, veryvery
Yes judge
Well, wellwell, wellwhy don't ye do as I bid
you?
What am I to do?
What are you to do....remove the prisonerpoor soul.
Which prisoner?
Why that are....poh poh, poh(pointing to
Burroughs
.)
Where to?
Where to Sir?Take him away; away with him
pretty chap you are to be sure, not to know where
to take a man to, after its all over with hmpoh, poh,
poh.
I say, Mr. Judge, none o' that now
Take the man away Sir. Do as you are bid.
Whomecried Burroughs, waking up from his
fit of apathy and looking about on every side.
Away with him.
Judgesjudgeshear me. Let me remain, I pray
you, cried he, setting his back to the wall and lifting his
loaded arms high up in the airsuffer me to stay here
till the jury have said whether or no this heroic woman
is worthy of deathI do beseech you!
Take him away, I tell youwhat are ye afraid of?
JudgesmenI would that ye would have mercy,
not on me, but on the people about me. I would that
ye would suffer me to tarry herein fetterstill the
jury
have given their verdict on Rachel Dyer. Suffer
me to do so, I beseech you, and I will go away then, I
swear to you, whithersoever it may please you, like a
lamb to the slaughter. I swear this to you before God!
but, so help me God, I will not be carried away alive
before. I will not stir, nor be stirred while I have
power to lift my arms, or to do what you now see me
do
As he spoke, he lifted up his arms in the airupup,
as high as he could reach, standing on tip-toe the while;
and brought them down with such force, loaded as they
were, that he doubled the iron guard which kept him in
the box, and shattered the heavy door from the top to
the bottom.
Beholdshorn though I be of my youth, betrayed
though I have been, while I forgot where I was, I do
not lack power. Now bid your people tear me away
21
if you have courage! For lo, my feet are upon the
foundations of your strength....and by Jehovahthe
God of the strong man of other days!I'll not be
dragged off till I know the fate of the giantess before
you.
We shall seecut him down officercut him down!
Very well. Come thou near enough to cut me down,
officer, and I'll undertake for thee.
Judgeshow little ye know of that man's power
why not suffer him to stay? cried Rachel Dyer. Why
will ye provoke it? On your heads be the issue, if ye
drive your ministers to the toil! on yours their blood, if
they approach him!
The sheriff hung backand the judges, after
consulting
together, told Burroughs he might stay, and ordered
the trial of the women to proceed.
CHAPTER XX.
Already were they about to give judgment of death
upon Rachel Dyer, when two or three of her accusers,
who began to fear that she might escape, had another fit.
Why are these poor women troubled? asked a judge.
I do not know, was her unstudied reply.
But according to your belief?
I do not desire to say what my belief is. It can do no
good, and it may do harm; for who shall assure me that
I do not err?
Don't you think they are bewitched?
No.
Give us your thoughts on their behavior.
No, Ichabod, no; my thoughts can be of no worth to
thee or such as thee. If I had more proof, proof that ye
would receive in law, I might be willing to speak at large
both of them and of their master
Their master! cried a little man, with a sharp
inquisitive
eye, who had not opened his mouth before.
Who is their master?
If they deal in witchcraft or in the black art, Joseph
Piper, thee may know as well as I do.
Woman....are you not afraid of death?
No............not much, though I should like to be spared
for a few days longer.
Not afraid of death!
Nonot much, I say. And why
should
I be afraid
of death? why should I desire to live?what is there
to attach a thing of my shape to life, a wretched,
miserable
,
weary.......
Ah, hanow we shall have itshe is going to confess
nowshe is beginning to weep, said a judge. But he
was overheard by the woman herself, who turning to the
jury with a look that awed them in spite of their
prejudice
,
told them to proceed.
They'll proceed fast enough, by and by, said another
judge. What have you done to disturb the faculties of
that woman there?
What woman?
Judith Hubbard.
Much. For I know her, and she knows that I know
her; and we have both known for a great while that we
cannot both live. This world is not large enough. What
have I done to disturb her faculties? Much. For that
woman hath wronged me; and she cannot forgive me.
She hath pursued me and mine to death; all that are
very near and dear to me, my poor sister and myand
the beloved friend of my sisterto death; and how
would it be possible for Judith Hubbard to forgive us?
But your apparition pursues her.
If so, I cannot help it.
But why is it your apparition?
How do I know? He that appeared in the shape of
Samuel, why should he not appear in the shape of
another?
But enoughRachel Dyer was ordered for execution
also. And a part of the charge proved against her was,
that she had been spirited away by the powers of the air,
who communicated with her and guarded her at the cost
of much human life, on the night when she fled into the
deep of the wilderness in company with George
Burroughs
and Mary Elizabeth Dyer; each of whom had a
21*
like body-guard of invisible creatures, who shot with
arrows
of certain death on the night of their escape.
And Mary Elizabeth Dyer was now brought up for
trial; but being half dead with fear, and very ill, so that
she was reported by a jury empannelled for the purpose,
to be mute by the visitation of God, they adjourned the
court for the morrow, and gave her permission to abide
with her sister till the day after the morrow.
And so Mary Elizabeth Dyer and Rachel Dyer met
againmet in the depth of a dungeon like the grave;
and Elizabeth being near the brave Rachel once more,
grew ashamed of her past weakness.
I pray thee dear sister, said Mary Elizabeth, after
they had been together for a long while without
speaking
a word, Rachel with her arm about Elizabeth's
neck, and Elizabeth leaning her face upon the shoulder
of Rachel, I pray thee to forgive me.
Forgive thee....for what pray?
Do,
do
forgive me, Rachel.
Why, what on earth is the matter with thee, child?
Here we sit for a whole hour in the deep darkness of
the night-season, without so much as a sob or a tear,
looking death in the face with a steady smile, and
comforting
our hearts, weary and sick as they are, with a
pleasant hopethe hope of seeing our beloved brother
Jacob, our dear good mother, and our pious
grandmother
;
and now, all of a sudden thee breaks out in this
way, as if thee would not be comforted, and as if thee
had never thought of death before
O, I'm not afraid of death sister, nowI'm prepared
for death nowI'm very willingly to die nowit is'nt
that I mean.
Why
now?
why do thee say so much of
now
? Is
it only
now
that thee is prepared for death?
No, no, dear sister, but some how or other I do not
even desire to live now, and yet
And yet what?why does thee turn away thy head?
why does thee behave so to me....why break out into
such bitterbitter lamentation?what
is
the matter I
say?what ails thee?
Oh dear!
WhyElizabeth!what am I to believe?what
has thee been doin'? Why do thee cling to me so?
why do thee hide thy face?
O Rachel, Racheldo not go away,do not
abandon
medo not cast me off!
Childwhy
No, no!
Look me in the face, I beseech thee.
No noI dare notI cannot.
Dare notcannot
No no.
Dare not look thy sister in the face?
Oh no
Lift up thy head thy head this minute, Mary
Elizabeth
Dyer!let go of my necklet go of my neck, I
sayleave clinging to me so, and let me see thy face.
No no dear Rachel, no no, I dare notI am afraid of
thee now, for now thee calls me Mary Elizabeth
Afraid of meof meO Elizabeth, what has thee
done?
Oh dear!
And what have
I
done to deserve this?
Theethee!O nothing dear sister, nothing at all;
it is II that have been so very foolish and wicked
after
Wicked, say thee?
O veryveryvery wicked
But howin what waythee'll frighten me to death.
Shall IO I am very sorrybutbutthee knows I
cannot help it
Cannot help it, Mary Elizabeth Dyercannot help
what? Speak....speak....whatever it is, I forgive thee....
we have no time to lose now; we may never meet again.
Speak out, I beseech thee. Speak out, for the day is
near, the day of sorrow
I will, I willcried Elizabeth, sobbing as if her heart
would break, and falling upon her knees and burying
her head in the lap of her sisterI willI will, but
pushing aside a heap of hair from her face, and
smothering
the low sweet whisper of a pure heart, as if she
knew that every throb had a voiceI will, I will, I say,
but I am so afraid of theeputting both arms about her
sister's neck and pulling her face down that she might
whisper what she had to sayI willI willI'm a goin'
to tell thee nowas soon as ever I can get my breath
nay, nay, don't look at me soI cannot bear it
Look at theemy poor bewildered sisterhow can
thee tell whether I am looking at thee or not, while thy
head is there?Get upget up, I sayI do not like
that posture; it betokens too much fearthe fear not
of death, but of shametoo much humility, too much
lowliness, a lowliness the cause whereof I tremble to ask
thee. Get up, Elizabeth, get up, if thee do not mean to
raise a grief and a trouble in my heart which I wouldn't
have there now for the whole world; get up, I beseech
thee, Mary Elizabeth Dyer.
Elizabeth got up, and after standing for a moment
or two, without being able to utter a word, though her
lips moved, fell once more upon her sister's neck; and
laying her mouth close to her ear, while her innocent
face glowed with shame and her whole body shook with
fear, whisperedI pray thee Rachel, dear Rachel....do...
do
let me see him for a minute or two before they put
him to death.
Rachel Dyer made no reply. She could not speak
she had no voice for speech, but gathering up the sweet
girl into her bosom with a convulsive sob, she wept for a
long while upon
her
neck.
They were interrupted by the jailor, who came to say
that George Burroughs, the wizard, having desired much
to see Rachel Dyer and Mary Elizabeth Dyer, the
confederate
witches, before his and their death, he had
been permitted by the honorable and merciful judges to
do soon condition that he should be doubly-ironed at
the wrist; wherefore he, the jailor had now come to fetch
her the said Rachel to him the said George.
I am to go too, said Elizabeth, pressing up to the side
of her sister, and clinging to her with a look of dismay.
No, no said he, no, no, you are to stay here.
Nay, nay, sisterdear sisterdo let me go with thee!
It is not for me to speak, dear,
dear
Elizabeth, or thee
thould go now instead of me. However
Come, comeI pity you both, but there's no help for
you nownever cry for spilt milkyou're not so bad as
they say, I'm sureso make yourself easy and stay where
you be, if you know when you're well off.
Do let me go!
Nonsenseyou're but a child however, and so I
forgive
you, and the more's the pity; must obey orders if
we break ownerspoh, poh,poh, poh, poh.
A separation like that of death followed. No hope
had the two sisters of meeting again alive. They were
afraid each for the otherand Elizabeth sat unable to
speak, with her large clear eyes turned up to the eyes of
Rachel as if to implore, with a last look, a devout
consideration
of a dying prayer.
If it may be, said Rachel turning her head at the
door if it may be dear maiden, it shall be. Have
courage
I have, I have!
Be prepared though; be prepared Elizabeth, my
beautiful
sister. We shall not see each other again....
that is....O I pray thee, I do pray thee, my dear sister
to be comforted.
Elizabeth got up, and staggered away to the door
and fell upon her sister's neck and prayed her not to
leave her.
I must leave thee...I must, I must....would thee have
me forsake George Burroughs at the point of death?
O nonono!
We never shall meet again I do fearI do hope, I
might say, for of what avail is it in the extremity of our
sorrow; but others mayhe and thee may Elizabeth
and who knows but after the first shock of this thy
approaching
bereavement is over, thee may come to regard
this very trial with joy, though we are torn by it, as by
the agony of death nowlet us pray.
The sisters now prayed together for a little time, each
with her arm about the other's neck, interchanged a
farewell
kiss and partedparted forever.
And Rachel was then led to the dungeons below,
where she saw him that her sister loved, and that a score
of other women had loved as it were in spite of their very
naturesfor they were bred up in fear of the dark
Savage
.
He sat with his hands locked in his lap, and
chained
and rivetted with iron, his brow gathered, his teeth
set, and his keen eyes fixed upon the door.
There is yet one hope my dear friend, whispered he
after they had been together a good while without
speaking
a word or daring to look at each otherone hope
laying his pinioned arm lightly upon her shoulder, and
pressing up to her side with all the affectionate
seriousness
of a brotherone hope, dear Rachel
She shut her eyes and large drops ran down her cheeks.
One hopeand but one
Have a care George Burroughs. I would not have
thee betray thyself anewthere is no hope.
It is not for myself I speak. There is no hope for me.
I know thatI feel thatI am sure of it; nor, to tell
you the truth, am I sorry
Not sorry George
Nofor even as you are, so am Iweary of this world
sick and weary of life.
Her head sunk upon his shoulder, and her breathing
was that of one who struggles with deep emotion.
Nonoit is not for myself that I speak. It is for
you
For
me
For you and for Elizabeth
For
me
and for Elizabeth?well
And if I could bring you to do what I am persuaded
you both may do without reproach, there would be hope
still forfor Elizabethand for you
For Elizabethand for me?O George, George!
what hope is there now for me? What have I to do on
earth, now that we are ashe stopped with a shudder
I too am tired of life. She withdrew the hand which
till now he had been holding to his heart with a strong
terrible pressure.
Hear me, thou high-hearted, glorious woman. I
have little or no hope for theeI confess that. I
know thee too well to suppose that I could prevail with
thee; but....but....whatever may become of us, why not
save Elizabeth, if we may
If we may Georgebut how?
Why....draw nearer to me I pray thee; we have not
much time to be together now, and I would have thee
look upon me, as one having a right to comfort thee and
to be comforted by thee
A right....how George?
As thy brother
As my brother....O, certainly
Nay, nay....do not forbear to lean thy head upon thy
brother....do not, I beseech thee. What have we to do
here....what have we to do now with that reserve which
keeps the living apart....our ashes, are they to be
hindered
of communion hereafter by the unworthy law of
ah....sobbing....Rachel Dyer!....can it be that I hear
you
you
! the unperturbale, the steadfast and the brave
....can it be that I hear you sobbing at my side, as if
your very heart would break....
No no....
There is to be a great change here, after we are out
of the way....
Wherehow?
Among the people. The accusers are going too far;
they are beginning to overstep the markthey are
flying
too high.
Speak plainly, if thee would have me understand thy
speechwhy do thee cleave to me so?why so eager
why do thee speak in parables? My heart misgives me
when I hear a man like thee, at an hour like this,
weighing every word that is about to escape from his
mouth.
I deserve the rebuke. What I would say is, that the
prisons of our land are over-crowded with people of high
repute. Already they have begun to whisper the charge
against our chief men. This very day they have hinted
at two or three individuals, who, a week before they
overthrew
me, would have been thought altogether beyond
the reach of their audacity.
Who are they?
They speak of Matthew Paris.
The poor bewildered man....how dare they?
And of the Governor, and of two or three more in
authority
;
and of all that participated in the voyage
whereby he and they were made wealthy and wise and
powerful
I thought so....I feared as much. Poor man....his
riches are now indeed a snare to him, his liberal heart,
a mark for the arrows of death....
Now hear me....the accusers being about to go up to
the high places and to the seats of power, a change, there
must and there will be, and so
And so....why do thee stop?
Why do I stop....did I stop?
Yea....and thy visage too....why does it alter?
My visage!
Yea....thy look, thy tone of voice, the very color of thy
lips.
Of a truth, Rachel?
Of a truth, George.
Why then it must be....it is, I am sure....on account of
the....that is to say....I'm afraid I do not make myself
understood
Speak out.
Well then....may I not persuade you, my dear,
dear
sister....to....to....in a word, Rachel....
To what pray....persuade me to what?....Speak to me
as I speak to thee; what would thee persuade me to,
George?
To....to....to confess....there!
To confess what, pray?
That's all....
George....
Nay, nay....the fact is my dear friend, as I said before,
22
I....I....if there be a change here, it will be a speedy one.
Well
And ifand ifa few weeks more, a few days more,
it may be, and our accusers, they who are now dealing
death to us, may be brought up in their turn to hear the
words of deathin short Rachel, if you could be
persuaded
just tonot to acknowledgebut just to suffer
them to believe you to be a....to be a......I forget what I
was going to say
CHAPTER XXI.
A long silence followeda silence like that of death
at last Rachel Dyer spoke:
George BurroughsI understand thee now, said she,
I understand it all. Thee would have me confess that I
deserve deathonly that I may live. Thee would have
me acknowledge (for nothing else would do) that I am
a liar and a witch, and that I deserve to dieand all
this for what?only that I may escape death for a few
days. O George!
No, noyou mistake the matter. I would not have
you confess that you deserve deathI would only have
you speak to themGod of the faithful!I cannotI
cannot urge this woman to betray her faith.
I understand thee, George. But if I were to do so,
what should I gain by it?
Gain by it, Rachel Dyer?
Why do thee drop my hand? why recoil at my touch
now?
Gain by it! siezing both her hands with all his might,
and speaking as if he began to fearnot to hopeno,
but to fear that she might be over-persuaded
Yeawhat have I to gain by it?
Life. You escape deatha cruel ignominious death
a death, which it is not for a woman to look at, but
with horror.
Well George
By death, you lose the opportunity of doing much good,
of bringing the wicked to justice, of aiding them that
are now ready to die with terror, of shielding the
oppressed
Well
Welland what more would you have? Is not this
enough?
No, George.
Hear me out Rachel. Do not reprove me, do not
turn away, till you have heard me through. My duty is
before me, a duty which must and shall be done, though
it break my heart. I am commanded to argue with
you, and to persuade you to live.
Commanded?
What if you were to confess that you deserve death?
What if you were to own yourself a witch? I take your
own view of the case.I put the query to you in a shape
the least favorable to my purpose. What if you were to
do this; you would be guilty at the most but of aof a
Of untruth George.
And you would save your own life by such untruth,
and the lives, it may be, of a multitude more, and the
life you know, of one that is very dear to you.
Well
No nodo not leave me in this way! Do not go till I
I beseech you to hear me through
I willit grieves me, but I will.
Which is the greater sinto die when you have it in
your power to escape death, if you will, by a word? or
to speak a word of untruth to save your life
George BurroughsI pray theesuffer me to bid
thee farewell.
No no, not yet. Hear me throughhear all I have
to say. By this word of untruth, you save your own
life, and perhaps many other lives. You punish the
guilty. You have leisure to repent in this world of that
very untruthif such untruth be sinful. You have an
opportunity of showing to the world and to them that
you love, that you were innocent of that wherewith you
were charged. You may root up the error that prevails
now, and overthrow the destroyer, and hereafter obtain
praise for that very untruth, whereby you hinder the
shedding of more innocent blood; praise from every
quarter of the earth, praise from every body; from the
people, the preachers, the jury, the eldersyea from
the very judges for having stayed them in their headlong
career of guilt
O George
But if you die, and your death be sinfuland would
it not be so, if you were to die, where you might escape
death?you would have no time to repent here, no
opportunity
,
no leisureyou die in the very perpetration
of your guilt
If it is guilt, I do
And however innocent you may be of the crimes that
are charged to you, you have no opportunity of showing
on this earth to them that love you, that you are so. Yet
morethe guilt of your death, if it be not charged
hereafter
to you, will be charged, you may be sure, to the
wretched women that pursue you; and all who might be
saved by you, will have reason to lay their death at your
door
Well
About life or death, you may not much care; but
after
death to be regarded with scorn, or hatred or terror,
by all that go by your grave, my sisterhow could you
bear the idea of that? What say youyou shudderand
yet if you die now, you must leave behind you a
character
which cannot be cleared up, or which is not likely to
be cleared up on earth, however innocent you may be (as
I have said before)the character of one, who being
charged with witchcraft was convicted of witchcraft and
22*
executed for a witchcraft. In a wordif you live, you
may live to wipe away the aspersion. If you die, it may
adhere to you and to yoursforever and ever. If you live,
you do may do much good on earth, much to yourself and
much to others, much even to the few that are now
thirsting for your lifeyou may make lighter the load
of crime which otherwise will weigh them downyou
may may do this and all this, if you speak: But if you
do not speak, you are guilty of your own death, and of
the deaths it may be of a multitude, here and hereafter.
Now hear
me
. I do not know whether all this is done
to try my truth or my courage, but this I knowI will
not leave thee in doubt concerning either. Look at me.
There
Thee would have me confess?
I would.
Thee would have Elizabeth confess?
I would.
Do thee mean to confess.
II!
Ah George
I cannot RachelI dare notI am a preacher of the
word of truth. But you maywhat is there to hinder
you?
Thee will not?
No.
Nor will I.
Just what I expectedgive me your handwhat I
have said to you, I have been constrained to say, for it is
a part of my faith Rachel, that as we believe, so are we
to be judged: and that therefore, had you believed it to
be right for you to confess and live, it would have been
right, before the Lord.But whether you do or do not,
Elizabeth may.
Trueif she can be persuaded to think as thee would
have her think, she may. I shall not seek to dissuade
herbut as for me, I have put my life into the hands of
our Father. I shall obey him, and trust to the inward
prompting of that which upholds me and cheers me now
even now, George, when, but for His Holy Spirit, I
should feel as I never felt before, since I came into the
worldaltogether alone.
Will you advise with her, and seek to persuade her?
No.
Cruel woman!
Cruelno no George, no no. Would that be doing
as I would be done by? Is it for me to urge a beloved
sister to do what I would not doeven to save my life?
I feel the rebuke
George, I must leave theeI hear footsteps.
Farewell
So soonso very soon! Say to her, I beseech you
say to her as you have said to me, that she
may
confess
if she will; that we have been together, and that we
have both agreed in the opinion that she had better
confess
and throw herself on the mercy of her judges, till the
fury of the storm hath passed over.It will soon have
passed over, I am sure now
No George, no; but I will say this. I will say to
her
Go ongo on, I beseech you
I will say to herElizabeth, my dear Sister; go
down upon thy knees and pray to the Lord to be nigh to
thee, and give thee strength, and to lead thee in the path
which is best for his glory; and after that, if thee should
feel free to preseve thy life by such meansbeing on
the guard against the love of life, and the fear of death
the Tempter of souls, and the weapons of the fleshit
will be thy duty so to preserve it.
Burroughs groaned aloudbut he could prevail no
further. Enough, said he, at last: write as much on this
paper, and let me carry it with me.
Carry it with theewhat do thee mean?
I hardly know what I mean; I would see her and
urge her to live, but when I consider what must follow,
though I have permission to see her, my heart fails me.
Thee is to meet her with me, I suppose?
No, I believe not
Howalone?
No nonot alone, said the jailor, whom they
supposed
to be outside of the door, till he spoke.
More of the tender mercies of the law! They would
entrap thee George
And you too Rachel, if it lay in their power
Give me that bookit is the Bible that I gave thee, is
it not?
It is
It belonged to my mother. I will write what I have
to say in the blank leaf.
She did so; and giving it into the hands of the Jailor
she said to himI would have her abide on earthmy
dear,
dear
sister!I would pray to her to live and be
happy,
if she can;
for sheO she will have much to
make life dear to her, even though she be left alone by
the way-side for a little timewhat disturbs thee
George?
I am afraid of this man. He will betray us
Nonowe have nothing to fear
Nothing to fear, when he must have been at our
elbow
and overheard everything we have whispered to
each other.
Look at him George, and thee will be satisfied.
Burroughs looked up, and saw by the vacant gravity
of his hard visage, that the man had not understood a
syllable to their prejudice.
But ElizabethI would have her continue on earth, I
sayI wouldif so it may please our Father above; but
I am in great fear, and I would have thee tell her so,
after she has read what I have written there in that book.
She
will have sympathy, whatever may occur to us
true sympathy, unmixed with fear; but as for me, I have
no such hopeand why should I wrestle with my duty
Iwho have no desire to see the light of another day?
None Rachel?
Nonebut for the sake of Mary Elizabeth Dyerand
soand so George, we are to part nowand there
thereforethe sooner we part, the better. Her voice
died away in a low deeply-drawn heavy breathing.
Even so deareven so, my beloved sister
George
Nay, naywhy leave me at all?why not abide here?
Why may we not die together?
George, I say
Wellwhat-say?
Suffer me to kiss theemy brotherbefore we part....
He made no reply, but he gasped for breath and shook
all over, and stretched out his arms with a giddy
convulsive
motion toward her.
Before we part forever Georgedear George,
putting
her hand affectionately upon his shoulder and
looking
him steadily in the face. We are now very near to
the threshold of death, and I do believeI dothough
I would not have said as much an hour ago, for the
wealth of all this world....nay, not even to save my life
....no....nor my sister's life....nor thy life....that I shall die
the happier and the better for having kissed thee....my
brother.
Still he spoke not....he had no tongue for speech. The
dreadful truth broke upon him all at once now, a truth
which penetrated his heart like an arrow...and he strove to
throw his arms about her; to draw her up to his bosom
but the chains that he wore prevented him, and so he
leaned his head upon her shoulder....and kissed her
cheek, and then lifted himself up, and held her with one
arm to his heart, and kissed her forehead and her eyes
and her mouth, in a holy transport of affection.
Dear George....I am happy now....very, very happy
now, said the poor girl, shutting her eyes and letting two
or three large tears fall upon his locked hands, which
were held by her as if....as if....while her mouth was
pressed to them with a dreadful earnestness, her power
to let them drop was no more. And then she appeared
to recollect herself, and her strength appeared to come
back to her, and she rose up and set her lips to his
forehead
with a smile, that was remembered by the rough
jailor to his dying day, so piteous and so death-like was
it, and said to Burroughs, in her mild quiet wayher
mouth trembling and her large tears dropping at every
wordvery, very happy now, and all ready for death.
I would say more....much more if I might, for I have not
said the half I had to say. Thee will see her....I shall
not see her again....
How
Not if thee should prevail with her to stay, George.
It would be of no useit would only grieve her, and
it might unsettle us both
What can I say to you?
NothingThee will see her; and thee will take her
to thy heart as thee did me, and she will be happyvery
happyeven as I am now.
FatherFather! O, why was I not prepared for this!
Do thou stay medo thou support meit is more
than I can bear! cried Burroughs, turning away from
the admirable creature who stood before him trying to
bear up without his aid, though she shook from head to
foot with uncontrollable nmetion.
Thee's very near and very dear to Mary Elizabeth
Dyer; and sheshe will be happyshe cannot be
otherwise, alive or deadfor all that know her, pity her
and love her
And so do all that know you
No, no, George, love and pity are not for such as I
such pity I mean, or such love as we need here
need
I
say, whatever we may pretend, whatever the multitude
may suppose, and however ill we may be fitted for
inspiring
itII
Her voice faltered, she grew very pale, and caught by
the frame of the door
There may be love, George, there may be pity, there
may be some hope on earth for a beautiful witch....with
golden hair....with large blue eyes....and a sweet mouth
....but for a....for a....for a freckled witch....with red hair
and a hump on her backwhat hope is there, what hope
on this side of the grave?
She tried to smile when she said this....but she could
not, and the preacher saw and the jailor saw that her
her heart was broken,
Before the former could reply, and before the latter
could stay her, she was gone.
The rest of the story is soon told. The preacher saw
Elizabeth and tried to prevail with her, but he could
not. She had all the courage of her sister, and would
not live by untruth. And yet she escaped, for she was
very ill, and before she recovered, the fearful infatuation
was over, the people had waked up, the judges and
the preachers of the Lord; and the chief-judge, Sewall
had publicly read a recantation for the part he had
played
in the terrible drama. But she saw her brave sister
no more; she saw Burrows no morehe was put to
death on the afternoon of the morrow, behaving with
high and steady courage to the lastpraying for all and
forgiving all, and predicting in a voice like that of one
crying in the wilderness, a speedy overthrow to the
belief
in witchcrafta prophecy that came to be fulfilled
before the season had gone by, and his last words were
Father forgive them, for they know not what they
do!
Being dead, a messenger of the court was ordered
away to apprise Rachel Dyer that on the morrow at the
same hour, and at the same place, her life would be
required
of her.
She was reading the Bible when he appeared, and
when he delivered the message, the book fell out of her
lap and she sat as if stupified for a minute or more; but
she did not speak, and so he withdrew, saying to her as
he went away, that he should be with her early in the
morning.
So on the morrow, when the people had gathered
together
before the jail, and prepared for the coming forth
of Rachel Dyer, the High-Sheriff was called upon to
wake her, that she might be ready for death; she being
asleep the man said. So the High-Sheriff went up and
spoke to her as she lay upon the bed; with a smile
about her mouth and her arm over a large book....but
she made no reply. The bed was drawn forth to the
lightthe book removed (it was the Bible) and she was
lifted up and carried out into the cool morning air. She
was dead.
23Reverend Gentlemen
,The innocency of our case, with the
enmity of our accusers and our judges and jury, whom
nothing
but our innocent blood will serve, having condemned us
already before our trials, being so much incensed and enraged
against us by the devil, makes us bold to beg and implore your
favourable assistance of this our humble petition to his
excellency
,
that if it be possible our innocent blood may be spared,
which undoubtedly otherwise will be shed, if the Lord doth not
mercifully step in; the magistrates, ministers, juries, and all
the people in general, being so much enraged and incensed
against us by the delusion of the devil, which we can term no
other, by reason we know in our own consciences we are all
innocent persons. Here are five persons who have lately
confessed
themselves to be witches, and do accuse some of us of
being along with them at a sacrament, since we were committed
into close prison, which we know to be lies. Two of the five
are (Carrier's sons) young men, who would not confess any
thing till they tied them neck and heels, till the blood was ready
to come out of their noses; and it is credibly believed and
reported
this was the occasion of making them confess what they
never did, by reason they said one had been a witch a month,
and another five weeks, and that their mother had made them
so, who has been confined here this nine weeks.
My son
William Proctor, when he was examined, because he would not
confess that he was guilty, when he was innocent, they tied him
neck and heels till the blood gushed out at his nose, and would
have kept him so twenty-four hours, if one, more merciful than
the rest, had not taken pity on him, and caused him to be
unbound
.
These actions are very like the popish cruelties. They
have already undone us in our estates, and that will not serve
their turns without our innocent blood. If it cannot be
granted
that we have our trials at Boston, we humbly beg that you
would endeavor to have these magistrates changed, and others
in their rooms; begging also and beseeching you would be
pleased to be here, if not all, some of you, at our trials, hoping
thereby you may be the means of saving the shedding of
innocent
blood. Desiring your prayers to the Lord in our behalf,
we rest your poor afflicted servants,
John Proctor
, &c.Being brought before the justices, her chief accusers were
two girls. My wife declared to the justices, that she never had
any knowledge of them before that day. She was forced to
stand with her arms stretched out. I requested that I might
old one of her hands, but it was denied me; then she desired
me to wipe the tears from her eyes, and the sweat from her
face, which I did; then she desired that she might lean
herself
on me, saying she should faint.
Justice Hathorn replied, she had strength enough to torment
those persons, and she should have strength enough to stand.
I speaking something against their cruel proceedings, they
commanded me to be silent, or else I should be turned out of
the room. The Indian before mentioned was also brought in,
to be one of her accusers: being come in, he now (when
before
the justices) fell down and tumbled about like a hog, but
said nothing. The justices asked the girls who afflicted the
Indian; they answered she, (meaning my wife) and that she
now lay upon him; the justices ordered her to touch him, in
order to his cure, but her head must be turned another way,
lest, instead of curing, she should make him worse, by her
looking on him, her hand being guided to take hold of his;
but the Indian took hold of her hand, and pulled her down on
the floor, in a barbarous manner; then his hand was taken off,
and her hand put on his, and the cure was quickly wrought. I,
being extremely troubled at their inhuman dealings, uttered a
hasty speech,
That God would take vengeance on them, and
desired that God would deliver us out of the hands of
unmerciful
men
. Then her mittimus was writ. I did with difficulty
and chagrin obtain the liberty of a room, but no beds in it; if
there had been, could have taken but little rest that night. She
was committed to Boston prison; but I obtained a habeas
corpus
to remove her to Cambridge prison, which is in our
county
of Middlesex. Having been there one night, next morning
the jailer put irons on her legs (having received such a
command
;)
the weight of them was about eight pounds; these
irons and her other afflictions soon brought her into
convulsion
fits, so that I thought she would have died that night. I
sent to entreat that the irons might be taken off; but all
entreaties
were in vain, if it would have saved her life, so that in
this condition she must continue. The trials at Salem coming
on, I went thither, to see how things were managed; and
finding
that the spectre evidence was there received, together with
idle, if not malicious stories, against people's lives, I did easily
perceive which way the rest would go; for the same evidence
that served for one, would serve for all the rest. I acquainted
her with her danger; and that if she were carried to Salem to
be tried, I feared she would never return. I did my utmost
that she might have her trial in our own county, I with several
others petitioning the judge for it, and were put in hopes for
it; but I soon saw so much, that I understood thereby it was
not intended, which put me upon consulting the means of her
escape; which through the goodness of God was effected, and
she got to Rhode-Island, but soon found herself not safe when
there, by reason of the pursuit after her; from thence she
went to New-York, along with some others that had escaped
their cruel hands.
Of the trial of good-wife Proctor, the following
interpretation
was had.
About this time, besides the experiment of the afflicted
falling
at the sight, &c. they put the accused upon saying the
Lord's prayer, which one among them performed, except in
that petition,
deliver us from evil
, she expressed it thus,
deliver
us from
all
evil:
this was looked upon as if she prayed
against what she was now justly under, and being put upon it
again, and repeating those words,
hallowed be thy name
, she
expressed it,
hollowed be thy name:
this was counted a
depraving
the words, as signifying to make void, and so a curse
rather than a prayer: upon the whole it was concluded that
she also could not say it, &c. Proceeding in this work of
examination
and commitment, many were sent to prison.
In August, 1697, the superior court sat at Hartford, in the
colony of Connecticut, where one mistress Benom was tried
for witchcraft. She had been accused by some children that
pretended to the spectral sight: they searched her several
times for teats; they tried the experiment of casting her into
the water, and after this she was excommunicated by the
minister
of Wallinsford. Upon her trial nothing material appeared
against her, save spectre evidence. She was acquitted, as also
her daughter, a girl of twelve or thirteen years old, who had
been likewise accused; but upon renewed complaints against
them, they both flew into New-York government.
23*
Second
Of the Confessions
.The following is a
letter
written by six of the confessing witches, by which it
may be understood in some degree how they came to
accuse themselves.
We, whose names are under written, inhabitants of
Andover
,
when as that horrible and tremendous judgment beginning
at Salem Village, in the year 1692, (by some called witchcraft)
first breaking forth at Mr. Parris's house, several young
persons
being seemingly afflicted, did accuse several persons for
afflicting them, and many there believing it so to be; we being
informed that if a person were sick, the afflicted person could
tell what or who was the cause of that sickness: Joseph
Ballard
of Andover (his wife being sick at the same time) he either
from himself, or by the advice of others, fetched two of the
persons, called the afflicted persons, from Salem Village to
Andover: which was the beginning of that dreadful calamity
that befel us in Andover. And the authority in Andover,
believing
the said accusations to be true, sent for the said persons
to come together to the meeting-house in Andover (the
afflicted
persons being there.) After Mr. Barnard had been at
prayer, we were blindfolded, and our hands were laid upon the
afflicted persons, they being in their fits, and falling into their
fits at our coming into their presence [as they said] and some
led us and laid our hands upon them, and then they said they
were well, and that we were guilty of afflicting of them
whereupon we were all seized as prisoners, by a warrant from
a justice of the peace, and forthwith carried to Salem. And
by reason of that sudden surprisal, we knowing ourselves
altogether
innocent of that crime, we were all exceedingly
astonished
and amazed, and affrighted even out of our reason; and
our nearest and dearest relations, seeing us in that dreadful
condition, and knowing our great danger, apprehending that
there was no other way to save our lives, as the case was then
circumstanced, but by our confessing ourselves to be such and
such persons, as the afflicted represented us to be, they out of
tender love and pity persuaded us to confess what we did
confess
.
And indeed that confession, that it is said we made, was
no other than what was suggested to us by some gentlemen;
they telling us, that we were witches, and they knew it, and we
knew it, and they knew that we knew it, which made us think
that it was so; and our understanding, our reason and our
faculties almost gone, we were not capable of judging our
condition
;
as also the hard measures they used with us rendered
us uncapable of making our defence; but said anything which
they desired: and most of what we said was but in effect a
consenting
to what they said. Sometime after, when we were
better composed, they telling of us what we had confessed, we
did profess that we were innocent, and ignorant of such things.
And we hearing that Samuel Wardwell had renounced his
confession
,
and quickly after was condemned and executed, some
of us were told that we were going after Wardwell.
Mary Osgood,
Mary Tiler,
Deliv. Dane,
Abigail Barker,
Sarah Wilson,
Hannah Tiler
.By the honourable the lieutenant governor, council and
assembly
of his majesty's province of the Masachusetts-Bay, in
general court assembled
.
Whereas the anger of God is not yet turned away, but his
hand is still stretched out against his people in manifold
judgments
,
particularly in drawing out to such a length the troubles
of Europe, by a perplexing war; and more especially
respecting
ourselves in this province, in that God is pleased still to
go on in diminishing our substance, cutting short our harvest,
blasting our most promising undertakings more ways than
one, unsettling us, and by his more immediate hand snatching
away many out of our embraces by sudden and violent deaths
even at this time when the sword is devouring so many both
at home and abroad, and that after many days of public and
solemn addressing him: and although, considering the many
sins prevailing in the midst of us, we cannot but wonder at
the patience and mercy moderating these rebukes, yet we
cannot
but also fear that there is something still wanting to
accompany
our supplications; and doubtless there are some
particular sins, which God is angry with
our Israel
for, that
have not been duly seen and repented by us, about which God
expects to be sought, if ever he turn again our captivity:
Wherefore it is commanded and appointed, that Thursday,
he fourteenth of January next, be observed as a day of prayer,
with fasting, throughout this province; strictly forbidding all
servile labour thereon; that so all God's people may offer up
fervent supplications unto him, for the preservation and
prosperity
of his majesty's royal person and government, and
success
to attend his affairs both at home and abroad; that all
iniquity
may be put away, which hath stirred God's holy jealousy
against this land; that he would shew us what we know not,
and help us wherein we have done amiss to do so no more;
and especially that whatever mistakes on either hand have been
fallen into, either by the body of this people, or any orders of
men, refering to the late tragedy, raised among us by Satan
and his instruments, through the awful judgment of God, he
would humble us therefor, and pardon all the errors of his
servants
and people, that desire to love his name; that he would
remove the rod of the wicked from off the lot of the righteous;
that he would bring in the American heathen, and cause them
to hear and obey his voice.
Given at Boston, December 12, 1696, in the eighth year
of his Majesty's reign.
Isaac Addington
,
Secretary
.Upon the day of the fast, in the full assembly at the south
meeting-house in Boston, one of the honorable judges, [the
chief justice Sewall] who had sat in judicature in Salem,
delivered
in a paper, and while it was in reading stood up; but
the copy being not to be obtained at present, it can only be
reported by memory to this effect, viz. It was to desire the
prayers of God's people for him and his; and that God having
visited his family, &c, he was apprehensive that he might have
fallen into some errors in the matters at Salem, and pray that
the guilt of such miscarriages may not be imputed either to the
country in general, or to him or his family in particular.
Some, that had been of several juries, have given forth a
paper, signed with their own hands, in these words:
We, whose names are under written, being in the year
1692 called to serve as jurors in court at Salem on trial of
many, who were by some suspected guilty of doing acts of
witchcraft upon the bodies of sundry persons:
We confess that we ourselves were not capable to
understand
,
nor able to withstand, the mysterious delusions of the
powers of darkness, and prince of the air; but were, for want
of knowledge in ourselves, and better information from
others
,
prevailed with to take up with such evidence against the
accused, as, on further consideration and better information,
we justly fear was insufficient for the touching the lives of any,
(
Deut.
xvii. 8) whereby we fear we have been instrumental
with others, though ignorantly and unwittingly, to bring upon
ourselves and this people of the Lord the guilt of innocent
blood; which sin the Lord saith, in scripture, he would not
pardon, (2
Kings
, xxiv. 4) that is, we suppose, in regard of his
temporal judgments. We do therefore hereby signify to all
in general (and to the surviving sufferers in special) our deep
sense of, and sorrow for, our errors, in acting on such
evidence
to the condemning of any person; and do hereby
declare
,
that we justly fear that we were sadly deluded and
mistaken
;
for which we are much disquieted and distressed in
our minds; and do therefore humbly beg forgiveness, first of
God for Christ's sake, for this our error; and pray that God
would not impute the guilt of it to ourselves, nor others;
and we also pray that we may be considered candidly and
aright
,
by the living sufferers, as being then under the power of
a strong and general delusion, utterly unacquainted with, and
not experienced in matters of that nature.
We do heartily ask forgiveness of you all, whom we have
justly offended; and do declare, according to our present
minds, we would none of us do such things again on such
grounds for the whole world; praying you to accept of this
in way of satisfaction for our offence, and that you would bles
the inheritance of the Lord, that he may be entreated for the
land.
Foreman,
Thomas Fisk,
William Fisk,
John Bacheler,
Thomas Fisk, jr.
John Dane.
Joseph Evelith,
Th. Pearly, sen.
John Peabody,
Thomas Perkins,
Samuel Sayer,
Andrew Eliot,
H. Herrick, sen.